The Project Gutenberg eBook, The Radio Boys Trailing a Voice, by Allen
Chapman


This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org





Title: The Radio Boys Trailing a Voice
       or, Solving a Wireless Mystery


Author: Allen Chapman



Release Date: June 20, 2008  [eBook #25858]

Language: English


***START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE RADIO BOYS TRAILING A VOICE***


E-text prepared by Roger Frank and the Project Gutenberg Online
Distributed Proofreading Team (http://www.pgdp.net)



Note: Project Gutenberg also has an HTML version of this
      file which includes the original illustration.
      See 25858-h.htm or 25858-h.zip:
      (http://www.gutenberg.net/dirs/2/5/8/5/25858/25858-h/25858-h.htm)
      or
      (http://www.gutenberg.net/dirs/2/5/8/5/25858/25858-h.zip)





The Radio Boys Series
(Trademark Registered)

THE RADIO BOYS TRAILING A VOICE

Or

Solving a Wireless Mystery

by

ALLEN CHAPMAN

Author of
The Radio Boys' First Wireless
The Radio Boys at Mountain Pass
Ralph of The Roundhouse
Ralph on the Army Train, Etc.

With Foreword by Jack Binns

Illustrated







[Illustration: THE MAN WAS EVIDENTLY RECEIVING A MESSAGE.
The Radio Boys Trailing a Voice. Page 153]



New York
Grosset & Dunlap
Publishers

Made in the United States of America

      *      *      *      *      *      *

BOOKS FOR BOYS
BY ALLEN CHAPMAN

12mo. Cloth. Illustrated.

THE RADIO BOYS SERIES
(Trademark Registered)

THE RADIO BOYS' FIRST WIRELESS
Or Winning the Ferberton Prize

THE RADIO BOYS AT OCEAN POINT
Or The Message that Saved the Ship

THE RADIO BOYS AT THE SENDING STATION
Or Making Good in the Wireless Room

THE RADIO BOYS AT MOUNTAIN PASS
Or The Midnight Call for Assistance

THE RADIO BOYS TRAILING A VOICE
Or Solving a Wireless Mystery

THE RAILROAD SERIES

RALPH OF THE ROUNDHOUSE
Or Bound to Become a Railroad Man

RALPH IN THE SWITCH TOWER
Or Clearing the Track

RALPH ON THE ENGINE
Or The Young Fireman of the Limited Mail

RALPH ON THE OVERLAND EXPRESS
Or The Trials and Triumphs of a Young Engineer

RALPH THE TRAIN DESPATCHER
Or The Mystery of the Pay Car

RALPH ON THE ARMY TRAIN
Or The Young Railroader's Most Daring Exploit

GROSSET & DUNLAP, Publishers, New York

Copyright, 1922, By
GROSSET & DUNLAP

The Radio Boys Trailing a Voice

      *      *      *      *      *      *



FOREWORD

BY JACK BINNS

Within a comparatively short time after this volume is published the
human voice will be thrown across the Atlantic Ocean under conditions
that will lead immediately to the establishment of permanent telephone
communication with Europe by means of radio.

Under the circumstances therefore the various uses of radio which are so
aptly outlined in it will give the reader an idea of the tremendous
strides that have been made in the art of communicating without wires
during the past few months.

Of these one of the most important, which by the way is dealt with to a
large extent in the present volume, is that of running down crooks. It
must not be forgotten that criminals, and those criminally intent are
not slow to utilize the latest developments of the genius of man, and
radio is useful to them also. However, the forces of law and order
inevitably prevail, and radio therefore is going to be increasingly
useful in our general police work.

Another important use, as outlined in this volume, is in the detection
of forest fires, and in fact generally protecting forest areas in
conjunction with aircraft. With these two means hundreds of thousands of
acres can now be patrolled in a single day more efficiently than a few
acres were previously covered.

Radio is an ideal boy's hobby, but it is not limited to youth.
Nevertheless it offers a wonderful scope for the unquenchable enthusiasm
that always accompanies the application of youthful endeavor, and it is
a fact that the majority of the wonderful inventions and improvements
that have been made in radio have been produced by young men.

Since this book was written there has been produced in this country the
most powerful vacuum tube in the world. In size it is small, but in
output it is capable of producing 100 kilowatts of electrical power.
Three such tubes will cast the human voice across the Atlantic Ocean
under any conditions, and transmit across the same vast space the
world's grandest music. Ten of these tubes joined in parallel at any of
the giant transmitting wireless telegraph stations would send telegraph
code messages practically around the world.

[Illustration: author's signature "Jack Binns"]



CONTENTS

    I.  Splintering Glass                 9
   II.  In a Dilemma                     20
  III.  The Stuttering Voice             31
   IV.  A Puzzling Mystery               43
    V.  Marvels of Wireless              51
   VI.  The Forest Ranger                61
  VII.  Radio and the Fire Fiend         70
 VIII.  Near Disaster                    77
   IX.  A Happy Inspiration              83
    X.  The Escaped Convict              91
   XI.  Down the Trap Door               99
  XII.  Groping in Darkness             106
 XIII.  Cunning Scoundrels              112
  XIV.  A Daring Holdup                 119
   XV.  Off to the Woods                127
  XVI.  Put to the Test                 136
 XVII.  The Bully Gets a Ducking        143
XVIII.  A Startling Discovery           151
  XIX.  The Robbers' Code               160
   XX.  On the Trail                    168
  XXI.  The Glimpse Through the Window  177
 XXII.  A Nefarious Plot                185
XXIII.  Preparing an Ambush             193
 XXIV.  Lying in Wait                   202
  XXV.  An Exciting Struggle            208




CHAPTER I

SPLINTERING GLASS


"You fellows want to be sure to come round to my house to-night and
listen in on the radio concert," said Bob Layton to a group of his
chums, as they were walking along the main street of Clintonia one day
in the early spring.

"I'll be there with bells on," replied Joe Atwood, as he kicked a piece
of ice from his path. "Trust me not to overlook anything when it comes
to radio. I'm getting to be more and more of a fan with every day that
passes. Mother insists that I talk of it in my sleep, but I guess she's
only fooling."

"Count on yours truly too," chimed in Herb Fennington. "I got stirred up
about radio a little later than the rest of you fellows, but now I'm
making up for lost time. Slow but sure is my motto."

"Slow is right," chaffed Jimmy Plummer. "But what on earth are you sure
of?"

"I'm sure," replied Herb, as he deftly slipped a bit of ice down Jimmy's
back, "that in a minute you'll be dancing about like a howling dervish."

His prophecy was correct, for Jimmy both howled and danced as he tried
vainly to extricate the icy fragment that was sliding down his spine.
His contortions were so ludicrous that the boys broke into roars of
laughter.

"Great joke, isn't it?" snorted Jimmy, as he bent nearly double. "If you
had a heart you'd lend a hand and get this out."

"Let's stand him on his head," suggested Joe. "That's the only thing I
can think of. Then it'll slide out."

Hands were outstretched in ready compliance, but Jimmy concluded that
the remedy was worse than the presence of the ice and managed to keep
out of reach.

"Never mind, Jimmy," said Bob consolingly. "It'll melt pretty soon,
anyhow."

"Yes, and it'll be a good thing for Jimmy to grin and bear it," added
Herb brightly. "It's things like that that develop one's character."

"'It's easy enough to be pleasant, when life moves along like a song,
but the man that's worth while, is the man who can smile when
everything's going dead wrong,'" quoted Joe.

Jimmy, not at all comforted by these noble maxims, glared at his
tormentors, and at last Bob came to his relief, and, putting his hand
inside his collar, reached down his back and brought up the piece of
ice, now greatly reduced in size.

"Let's have it," demanded Jimmy, as Bob was about to throw it away.

"What do you want it for?" asked Bob. "I should think you'd seen enough
of it."

"On the same principle that a man likes to look at his aching tooth
after the dentist has pulled it out," grinned Joe.

"Don't give it to him!" exclaimed Herb, edging away out of reach, justly
fearing that he might feel the vengeance of the outraged Jimmy.

"You gave it to him first, so it's his," decided Bob, with the wisdom of
a Solomon, as he handed it over to the victim.

Jimmy took it and started for Herb, but just then Mr. Preston, the
principal of the high school, came along and Jimmy felt compelled to
defer his revenge.

"How are you, boys?" said Mr. Preston, with a smile. "You seem to be
having a good time."

"Jimmy is," returned Herb, and Jimmy covertly shook his fist at him.
"We're making the most of the snow and ice while it lasts."

"Well, I don't think it will last much longer," surmised Mr. Preston, as
he walked along with them. "As a matter of fact, winter is 'lingering in
the lap of spring' a good deal longer than usual this year."

"I suppose you had a pleasant time in Washington?" remarked Joe
inquiringly, referring to a trip from which the principal had returned
only a few days before.

"I did, indeed," was the reply. "To my mind it's the most interesting
city in the country. I've been there a number of times, and yet I always
leave there with regret. There's the Capitol, the noblest building on
this continent and to my mind the finest in the world. Then there's the
Congressional Library, only second to it in beauty, and the Washington
Monument soaring into the air to a height of five hundred and fifty-five
feet, and the superb Lincoln Memorial, and a host of other things
scarcely less wonderful.

"But the pleasantest recollection I have of the trip," he went on, "was
the speech I heard the President make just before I came away. It was
simply magnificent."

"It sure was," replied Bob enthusiastically. "Every word of it was worth
remembering. He certainly knows how to put things."

"I suppose you read it in the newspaper the next day," said Mr. Preston,
glancing at him.

"Better than that," responded Bob, with a smile. "We all heard it over
the radio while he was making it."

"Indeed!" replied the principal. "Then you boys heard it even before I
did."

"What do you mean?" asked Joe, in some bewilderment. "I understood that
you were in the crowd that listened to him."

"So I was," Mr. Preston answered, in evident enjoyment of their
mystification. "I sat right before him while he was speaking, not more
than a hundred feet away, saw the motion of his lips as the words fell
from them and noted the changing expression of his features. And yet I
say again that you boys heard him before I did."

"I don't quite see," said Herb, in great perplexity. "You were only a
hundred feet away and we were hundreds of miles away."

"And if you had been thousands of miles away, what I said would still be
true," affirmed Mr. Preston. "No doubt there were farmers out on the
Western plains who heard him before I did.

"You see it's like this," the schoolmaster went on to explain. "Sound
travels through the air to a distance of a little over a hundred feet in
the tenth part of a second. But in that same tenth of a second that it
took the President's voice to reach me in the open air radio could have
carried it eighteen thousand six hundred miles."

"Whew!" exclaimed Jimmy. "Eighteen thousand six hundred miles! Not feet,
fellows, but miles!"

"That's right," said Bob thoughtfully. "Though I never thought of it in
just that way before. But it's a fact that radio travels at the rate of
one hundred and eighty-six thousand miles a second."

"Equal to about seven and a half times around the earth," observed the
principal, smiling. "In other words, the people who were actually
sitting in the presence of the President were the very last to hear what
he said.

"Put it in still another way. Suppose the President were speaking
through a megaphone in addition to the radio and by the use of the
megaphone the voice was carried to people in the audience a third of a
mile away. By the time those persons heard it, the man in the moon could
have heard it too--that is," he added, with a laugh, "supposing there
really were a man in the moon and that he had a radio receiving set."

"It surely sounds like fairyland," murmured Joe.

"Radio is the fairyland of science," replied Mr. Preston, with
enthusiasm, "in the sense that it is full of wonder and romance. But
there the similarity ceases. Fairyland is a creation of the fancy or the
imagination. Radio is based upon the solid rock of scientific truth. Its
principles are as certain as those of mathematics. Its problems can be
demonstrated as exactly as that two and two make four. But it's full of
what seem to be miracles until they are shown to be facts. And there's
scarcely a day that passes without a new one of these 'miracles' coming
to light."

He had reached his corner by this time, and with a pleasant wave of his
hand he left them.

"He sure is a thirty-third degree radio fan," mused Joe, as they watched
his retreating figure.

"Just as most all bright men are becoming," declared Bob. "The time is
coming when a man who doesn't know about radio or isn't interested in it
will be looked on as a man without intelligence."

"Look here!" exclaimed Jimmy suddenly. "What's become of my piece of
ice?"

He opened his hand, which was red and wet and dripping.

"That's one on you, Jimmy, old boy," chuckled Joe. "It melted away while
you were listening to the prof."

"It's an ill wind that blows nobody good," said Herb complacently.
"Jimmy meant to put that down my back."

"Oh, there are plenty of other pieces," said Jimmy, as he picked one up
and started for Herb.

Herb started to run, but slipped and fell on the icy sidewalk.

"You know what the Good Book says," chaffed Joe. "The wicked stand on
slippery places."

"Yes, I see they do," replied Herb, as quick as a flash, looking up at
him. "But I can't."

The laugh was on Joe, and Herb felt so good over the retort that he did
not mind the fall, though it had jarred him considerably. He scrambled
to his feet and brushed off his clothes, while Jimmy, feeling that his
comrade had been punished enough, magnanimously threw away the piece of
ice that was to have been the instrument of his vengeance.

"The reason why I wanted you fellows to be sure to be on hand to-night,"
resumed Bob, as they walked along, "was that I saw in the program of the
Newark station in the newspaper this morning that Larry Bartlett was
down for an entirely new stunt. You know what a hit he made with his
imitations of birds."

"He sure did," agreed Joe. "To my mind he had it all over the birds
themselves. I never got tired listening to him."

"He certainly was a dabster at it," chimed in Jimmy.

"Now he's going in to imitate animals," explained Bob. "I understand
that he's been haunting the Zoo for weeks in every minute of his spare
time studying the bears and lions and tigers and elephants and snakes,
and getting their roars and growls and trumpeting and hisses down to a
fine point. I bet he'll be a riot when he gives them to us over the
radio."

"He sure will," assented Herb. "He's got the natural gift in the first
place, and then he practices and practices until he's got everything
down to perfection."

"He's a natural entertainer," affirmed Bob. "I tell you, fellows, we
never did a better day's work than when we got Larry that job at the
sending station. Not only was it a good thing for Larry himself when he
was down and out, but think of the pleasure he's been able to give to
hundreds of thousands of people. I'll bet there's no feature on the
program that is waited for more eagerly than his."

By this time the boys had reached the business portion of the town and
the short spring day was drawing to a close. Already lights were
beginning to twinkle in the stores that lined both sides of the street.

"Getting near supper time," remarked Bob. "Guess we'd better be getting
along home. Don't forget to come--Gee whiz!"

The ejaculation was wrung from him by a snowball that hit him squarely
in the breast, staggering him for a moment.

Bang! and another snowball found a target in Joe. It struck his shoulder
and spattered all over his face and neck.

"That felt as though it came from a gun!" he exclaimed. "It's the
hardest slam I ever got."

"Who did it?" demanded Bob, peering about him in the gathering darkness.

Halfway up the block they saw a group of dark figures darting into an
alleyway.

"It's Buck Looker and his crowd!" cried Jimmy. "I saw them when they ran
under that arc light."

"Just like that crowd to take us unawares," said Bob. "But if they're
looking for a tussle we can accommodate them. Get busy, fellows, and let
them have something in return for these two sockdolagers."

They hastily gathered up several snowballs apiece, which were easily
made because the snow was soft and packed readily, and ran toward the
alleyway just in time to see Buck and his crowd emerging from their
hiding place.

There was a spirited battle for a few minutes, each side making and
receiving some smashing hits. Buck's gang had the advantage in that they
had a large number of missiles already prepared, and even in the
excitement of the fight the radio boys noticed how unusually hard they
were.

"Must have been soaking them in water until they froze," grunted Jimmy,
as one of them caught him close to the neck and made him wince.

As soon as their extra ammunition was exhausted and the contending
forces in this respect were placed more on a footing of equality, Buck
and his cronies began to give ground before the better aim and greater
determination of Bob and his comrades.

"Give it to them, fellows!" shouted Bob, as the retreat of their
opponents was rapidly becoming a rout.

At the moment he called out, the progress of the fight had brought the
radio boys directly in front of the windows of one of the largest
drygoods stores in the town.

In the light that came from the windows Bob saw a snowball coming
directly for his head. He dodged, and----

Crash! There was the sound of splintering glass, and the snowy missile
whizzed through the plate glass window!




CHAPTER II

IN A DILEMMA


There was a moment of stupor and paralysis as the meaning of the crash
dawned upon the radio boys.

Buck and his crowd had vanished and were footing it up the fast-darkening
street at the top of their speed.

The first impulse of the radio boys was to follow their example. They
knew that none of them was responsible for the disaster, and they were
of no mind to be sacrificed on behalf of the gang that had attacked
them. And they knew that in affairs of that kind the ones on the ground
were apt to suffer the more severely.

They actually started to run away, but had got only a few feet from the
scene of the smash when Bob, who had been thinking quickly, called a
halt.

"None of this stuff for us, fellows," he declared. "We've got to face
the music. I'm not going to have a hunted feeling, even if we succeeded
in getting away. We know we didn't do it and we'll tell the plain truth.
If that doesn't serve, why so much the worse for us. But at any rate we
won't be despising ourselves as cowards."

As usual, his comrades accorded him the leadership and fell in with his
plan, although it was not without many misgivings that they awaited the
coming of the angry proprietor of the place, who had already started in
pursuit of them, accompanied by many others who had been attracted by
the crash and whose numbers were being rapidly augmented.

"Here are the fellows that smashed my window!" cried Mr. Larsen, the
proprietor of the drygoods store, rushing up to them and shaking his
fist in their faces. "Where are the police?" he shouted, looking around
him. "I'll have them arrested for malicious damage."

And while he faced them, gesticulating wildly, his face purple with
anger and excitement, it may be well for the benefit of those who have
not read the preceding volumes of this series to tell briefly who the
radio boys are and what had been their adventures before the time this
story opens.

The acknowledged leader of the boys was Bob Layton, son of a prosperous
chemist of Clintonia, in which town Bob had been born and brought up.
Mr. Layton was a respected citizen of the town and foremost in its civic
activities. Clintonia was a thriving little city of about ten thousand
population, situated on the Shagary River, about seventy-five miles from
the city of New York.

Bob at the beginning of this story was about sixteen years old, tall and
stalwart and a clean-cut specimen of upstanding American youth. He was
of rather dark complexion and had a pair of eyes that looked straight at
one. Those eyes were usually merry, but could flash with indignation
when circumstances required it. He was never on the lookout for trouble,
but was always ready to meet it half way, and his courageous character
together with his vigorous physique had made him prominent in the sports
of the boys of his own age. He was a crack baseball player and one of
the chief factors of the high school football eleven. No one in
Clintonia was held in better liking.

Bob's special chum was Joe Atwood, son of the leading physician of the
town. Joe was fair in complexion and sturdy in makeup. He and Bob had
been for many years almost inseparable companions, Bob usually acting as
captain in anything in which they might be engaged, while Joe served as
first mate. The latter had a hot temper, and his impulsiveness sometimes
got him into trouble and would have involved him in scrapes oftener if
it had not been for the cooler head and steadying influence of Bob.

Two other friends of the boys who were almost always in their company
were Herb Fennington, whose father kept a large general store in the
town, and Jimmy Plummer, son of a respected carpenter and contractor.
Herb was of a rather indolent disposition, but was jolly and
good-natured and always full of jokes, some of them good, others poor,
which he frequently sought to spring on his companions.

Jimmy was a trifle younger than his mates, fat and round and excessively
fond of the good things of life. His liking for that special dainty had
gained him the nickname of "Doughnuts," and few of such nicknames were
ever more fittingly bestowed.

Apart from the liking that drew them together, the boys had another link
in their common interest in radio. From the time that this wonderful new
science had begun to spread over the country with such amazing rapidity,
they had been among the most ardent "fans." Everything that they could
read or learn on the subject was devoured with avidity, and they were
almost constantly at the home of one or the other, listening in on their
radio sets and, lately, sending messages, in the latter of which they
had now attained an unusual degree of proficiency.

In decided contrast to Bob and his friends was another group of
Clintonia youth, between whom and the radio boys there was a pronounced
antipathy. The leader of this group was Buck Looker, a big overgrown,
hulking boy, dull in his studies and a bully in character. His two
special cronies were Carl Lutz, a boy of about his own age, and Terry
Mooney, both of them noted for their mean and sneaking dispositions.
Buck lorded it over them, and as his father was one of the richest men
in the town they cringed before him and were always ready to back him up
in any piece of meanness and mischief.

The enthusiasm of Bob and his friends for radio was fostered by the help
and advice of the Reverend Doctor Dale, the clergyman in charge of the
Old First Church of Clintonia, who, in addition to being an eloquent
preacher, was keenly interested in all latter-day developments of
science, especially radio. Whenever the boys got into trouble with their
sets they knew that all they had to do was to go to the genial doctor
and be helped out of their perplexities.

An incident that gave a great impetus to their interest in the subject
was the offering of prizes by Mr. Ferberton, the member of Congress for
their district, for the best radio sets turned out by the boys of his
congressional district by their own endeavors. Bob, Joe, and Jimmy
entered into this competition with great zest. Herb with his habitual
indolence kept out of it.

While the boys were engrossed with their radio experiments an incident
happened in town that led them into many unexpected adventures. An
automobile run by a visitor in town, a Miss Nellie Berwick, got out of
her control and dashed through the window of a store. Bob and Joe, who
happened to be at hand, rescued the girl from imminent peril, while Herb
and Jimmy did good work in curbing the fire that followed the accident.

How the boys learned of the orphan girl's story, got on the track of the
rascal who had tried to swindle her and forced him to make restitution;
what part the radio played in bringing the fellow to terms; how they
detected and thwarted the plans of Buck Looker and his cronies to wreck
their sets; are told in the first volume of this series entitled: "The
Radio Boys' First Wireless; Or, Winning the Ferberton Prize."

That summer the chums went to Ocean Point on the seashore, where many of
the Clintonia folks had established a little bungalow colony of their
own. What adventures they met with there; what strides they made in the
practical work of radio; how they were enabled by their knowledge and
quick application of it to save a storm-tossed ship on which members of
their own families were voyaging; how they ran down and captured the
scoundrel Cassey who had knocked out with a blackjack the operator at
the sending station and looted his safe--these and many more incidents
are narrated in the second volume of this series entitled: "The Radio
Boys at Ocean Point; Or, The Message That Saved the Ship."

While the summer season was yet at its height, the boys had occasion to
rescue the occupants of a rowboat that had been run down by men in a
stolen motor boat. The two rescued youths proved to be vaudeville
actors, and the boys grew very friendly with them. The injury that
crippled one of them, Larry Bartlett; the false accusation brought
against him by Buck Looker; the way in which the boys succeeded in
getting work for Larry at the sending station, where his remarkable gift
of mimicry received recognition; how they themselves were placed on the
broadcasting program, and the clever way in which they trapped the
motor-boat thieves; are told in the third volume of the series,
entitled: "The Radio Boys at the Sending Station; Or, Making Good in the
Wireless Room."

The coming of fall brought the boys back to Clintonia, where, however,
the usual course of their studies was interrupted by an epidemic that
made necessary for a time the closing of the schools. This gave the
radio boys an opportunity to make a trip to Mountain Pass, a popular
resort in the hills. Here they came in contact with a group of plotters
who were trying to put through a nefarious deal and were able to thwart
the rascals through the use of radio. By that same beneficent science
too they were able to save a life when other means of communication were
blocked. And not the least satisfactory feature was the utter
discomfiture they were able to visit upon Buck Looker and his gang.
These and many other adventures are told in the fourth volume of the
series, entitled: "The Radio Boys at Mountain Pass; Or, The Midnight
Call for Assistance."

And now to return to the radio boys as they stood facing the angry
storekeeper amid a constantly growing throng of curious onlookers. They
had been in many tighter fixes in their life but none that was more
embarrassing.

"I'll have them arrested!" the storekeeper repeated, his voice rising to
a shrill treble.

"Now look here," replied Bob. "Suppose you cut out this talk of having
us arrested. In the first place, we didn't break your window. In the
second place, if we had it wouldn't be a matter of arrest but of making
good the damage."

"All right then," said Mr. Larsen eagerly, catching at the last word.
"Make good the damage. It will cost at least two hundred dollars to
replace that window."

"I think you're a little high," returned Bob. "But that doesn't matter.
I didn't say that we'd make the damage good. I said that if we'd broken
it, it would be a matter of making good. But we didn't break it, and
that lets us out I'll say."

"It's easy to say that," sneered the merchant. "How do I know that you
didn't break it? It would of course be natural for you to try to lie out
of it."

"It wouldn't be natural for us to lie out of it," replied Bob,
controlling his temper with difficulty. "That isn't our way of doing
things. Why do you suppose we stayed here when it would have been
perfectly easy for us to get away? It wasn't a snowball we threw that
broke your window. It was one thrown by the fellows we were fighting
with."

"Always the other fellow that does it!" replied the storekeeper angrily.
"Who was that other fellow or fellows then? Tell me that. Come on now,
tell me that."

Bob kept silent. He had no love for Buck Looker and his gang, who had
always tried to injure him, but he was not going to inform.

"See," said Mr. Larsen, misunderstanding his silence. "When I ask you,
you can't tell me. You're the fellows that did it, all right, and you'll
pay me for it or I'll have you put in jail, that's what I'll do."

"I saw the fellows who were firing snowballs in this direction," spoke
up Mr. Talley, a caterer, pushing his way through the throng. "I nearly
bumped into them as they were running away. Buck Looker was one of them.
I saw his face plainly and can't be mistaken. The others I'm not so sure
of, but I think they were Carl Lutz and Terry Mooney.

"For my part, Mr. Larsen," he continued, "I don't see how a snowball
could break that heavy plate-glass window, anyway. My windows are no
heavier, and they've often had snowballs come against them without doing
any harm. Are you sure it wasn't something else that smashed the glass?"

"Dead sure," replied Larsen. "Come inside and see for yourself."

He led the way into his store, and Mr. Talley, the boys, and a number of
others crowded in after him.

"Look," said Larsen, pointing to a piece of dress goods that had been
hanging in the window. "See where the snow has splashed against it?
There's no question that a snowball did it. You can see the bits of snow
around here yet if you'll only look."

This was true and the evidence seemed conclusive. But just then Bob's
keen eyes detected something else. He stooped down and brought up quite
a large sharp-edged stone which still had some fragments of snow
adhering to it and held it up for all to see.

"Here's the answer," he said. "This stone was packed in the snowball,
and that is why it smashed the window!"




CHAPTER III

THE STUTTERING VOICE


There was a stir of interest and exclamations of surprise as those in
the store crowded closer to get a better view.

"That explains it," said Mr. Talley, as he examined the missile. "I was
sure that no mere ball of snow could break that heavy window. To put
such a stone in a snowball was little less than criminal," he went on
gravely. "If that had hit any one on the temple it would almost
certainly have killed him."

"It was coming straight for my head when I dodged," said Bob.

"That's another proof that it wasn't any ball we threw that broke the
window," put in Joe. "Each one of us is willing to swear that there was
no stone in any ball that we threw."

"Not only then but at any time," put in Herb. "Only a mean coward would
do a thing like that. None of us has done it any time in his life."

"I believe that," replied Mr. Talley. "I've known all you boys ever
since you were little kids and I know you wouldn't be capable of it."

"That's all very well," said Mr. Larsen. "But that doesn't pay for my
window. Whether any of you boys threw the ball or not you can't deny
that you were engaged in a snowball fight right in front of my windows.
If the fight hadn't been going on the window wouldn't have been
smashed."

There was a certain amount of justice in this, and the boys were fair
enough to acknowledge it.

"I suppose you are right there, Mr. Larsen," said Bob regretfully. "We
ought to have kept out of range of the windows, but in the excitement we
forgot all about that. Then, too, we never would have supposed that any
ordinary snowball would have broken the window. Perhaps that was in the
back of our minds, if we thought of it at all."

"Is the window insured?" queried Mr. Talley.

"Yes, it is," answered the storekeeper.

"Well, then, that lets you out," remarked Mr. Talley, with a note of
relief in his voice. "That puts the matter up to the insurance company.
If they want to take any legal steps they can; and of course they ought
to be compensated by the parents of the boy who may be found guilty of
having thrown the ball with a stone in it. For my part, I doubt very
much that it can ever be proved, unless the boy himself owns up to it."

"Think of Buck Looker ever owning up to anything!" muttered Jimmy.

"As for these boys," continued Mr. Talley, "I am perfectly sure in my
own mind that they are telling the truth. You'll have to look for the
culprit in the other crowd, and I've already told you who they are, or
who one of them is, at least."

"Well," said the storekeeper, who by this time had cooled down
considerably, "that, I suppose, will be something for the insurance
company to settle. But by the terms of my contract with them I'll have
to help them all I can to find out the responsible party, and I'll have
to give them the names of all the boys concerned in the fight."

"That's all right," responded Bob. "You know our folks and you know that
they're good for any judgment that may be found against them. But I'm
sure it will be somebody else that will have to pay the bill."

There was nothing more to be done for the present, and the boys filed
out of the store, after having expressed their thanks to Mr. Talley for
the way he had championed their cause.

"Gee!" murmured Joe, as they went up the street toward their homes, "I
know how a fellow feels now after he's been put through the third
degree."

"It was rather a hot session," agreed Bob. "But I'm glad we had it out
with him instead of running away. It's always best to take the bull by
the horns. And you can't blame Mr. Larsen for feeling sore about it. Any
one of us would probably have felt the same way."

"Sure thing," admitted Herb. "But think of that dirty trick of Buck
Looker in putting stones in snowballs! It wasn't only that one that went
through the window. Every time I got hit it made me jump."

"Same here," said Jimmy. "I was thinking all the time that they were the
hardest snowballs I ever felt, but it never came into my mind that there
were stones in them."

"Trust Buck to be up to every mean trick that any one ever thought of,"
returned Bob. "He hasn't got over the way we showed him up at Mountain
Pass. He thought he had us dead to rights in the matter of that burned
cottage, and it made him wild to see the way we came out on top. He and
his gang would do anything to get even."

"It will be interesting to see what he'll say when this matter of the
window is put up to him and his pals," remarked Herb.

"Not a doubt in the world what he'll say," replied Joe. "He'll swear
till he's blue in the face that he never dreamed of using a stone in the
snowballs. Do you remember how he told us that he'd lie in court to keep
us from putting anything over on him? Any one that expects to get the
truth out of Buck is barking up the wrong tree. I guess the insurance
company would better kiss their money good-by."

"I'm afraid so," returned Bob. "It was dark and there probably weren't
any witnesses who saw them put the stones in, and it is likely that the
company will have to let the matter drop."

The lads had reached Bob's gate by this time, and they separated with a
promise to come over and listen in on the radio later on.

Bob told the whole story to his parents at the supper table that night,
and his father and mother listened with great interest and some concern.

"I'm sorry you were mixed up in the thing at all, Bob," his father
remarked thoughtfully. "Being in it, however, you acted just as you
should have done. Just how far you and your friends may be held
responsible, in case they can't find the one who actually threw the ball
that broke the window, I'm not lawyer enough to say. It's barely
possible that there may be some ground for action on the score of
culpable carelessness in taking part in a snowball fight in front of
store windows, and of course you were wrong in doing that. But the total
amount involved is not very great after all, and it would be divided up
among the parents of the four of you, so there's nothing much to worry
about. It would gall me though to have to pay for damages that were
really caused by that cub of Looker's."

"I'm sorry, Dad," said Bob. "I'm hoping yet that something may develop
that will put the thing up to Buck, or whoever it was of his gang that
actually threw the ball."

"Let's hope so," returned Mr. Layton, though without much conviction in
his voice, and dismissed the subject.

A little while afterward the other three boys came over to Bob's house
to listen in on the radio concert. So much time, however, had been taken
up in discussing the afternoon's adventure that they missed Larry's
offering, which was among the first on the program. This was a keen
disappointment, which was tempered, however, by the probability that
they could hear him some evening later in the week.

"Sorry," remarked Joe. "But it only means that we still have a treat in
store when the old boy begins to roar and growl and hiss so as to make
us think that a whole menagerie has broken loose and is chasing us. In
the meantime we can fix up that aerial so as to get a little better
results."

"Funny thing I noticed the other day," remarked Bob, as they embarked
upon some experiments.

"All sorts of funny things in the radio game," observed Joe. "Something
new turns up every day. Things in your set that you think you can't do
without you find you can do without and get results just about as
usual."

"Just what I was going to tell you," returned Bob. "You must be
something of a prophet."

"Oh, I wouldn't go quite so far as to say that," replied Joe, with mock
modesty.

"Isn't he the shrinking violet?" chaffed Jimmy.

"Stop your kidding, you boobs, and let a regular fellow talk," chided
Bob. "What I was going to say was that while I was tinkering with the
set I disconnected the ground wire. Of course I thought that would put
the receiver out of business for the time, and I was almost knocked
silly when I found that I could hear the concert that was going on just
about as well as though the wire had been connected. How do you account
for that?"

"Don't account for it at all," replied Herb. "Probably just a freak, and
might not happen again in a thousand times. Likely it was one of the
unexplainable things that happen once in a while. Maybe there was a
ground connection of some kind, if not by the wire. I wouldn't bank on
it."

"It's queer, too, how many kinds of things can be used as aerials," put
in Joe. "I heard the other day of a man in an apartment house where the
owner objected to aerials, who used the clothesline for that purpose.
The wire ran through the rope, which covered it so that it couldn't be
seen. It didn't prevent its use as a clothesline either, for he could
hear perfectly when the wash was hanging on it."

"Oh, almost anything will do as an aerial," chimed in Jimmy. "The rib of
an umbrella, the rainspout at the side of the house, the springs of a
bed give good results. And that's one of the mighty good things about
radio. People that have to count the pennies don't have to buy a lot of
expensive materials. They can put a set together with almost any old
thing that happens to be knocking around the house."

Bob had been working steadily, and, as the room was warm, his hands were
moist with perspiration. He had unhooked an insulated copper wire that
led to his outside aerial. His head phones were on, as he had been
listening to the radio concert while he worked.

"I'll have to miss the rest of that selection, I guess," he remarked
regretfully, as he unhooked the wire. "It's a pity, too, for that's one
of the finest violin solos I ever heard. Great Scott! What does that
mean?"

The ejaculation was wrenched from him by the fact that although he had
disconnected the wire he still heard the music--a little fainter than
before but still with every note distinct.

He could scarcely believe his ears and looked at his friends in great
bewilderment.

"What's the matter?" asked Joe, jumping to his feet. "Get a shock?"

"Not in the sense you mean, but in another way, yes," replied Bob, still
holding the exposed end of the copper wire in his fingers. "What do you
think of that, fellows? I'm an aerial!"

"Come out of your trance," adjured Herb unbelievingly. "They talk that
way in the insane asylums."

"Clap on your headphones," cried Bob, too intent on his discovery to pay
any attention to the gibe.

They did so, and were amazed at hearing the selection as plainly as did
Bob himself.

The latter had been holding the disconnected wire so that his fingers
just touched the uncovered copper portion at the end. Now he hastily
scraped off several inches of the insulation and grasped the copper wire
with his hand. Instantly the volume of sound grew perceptibly greater.

Hardly knowing what to make of it, he scraped off still more of the
insulation.

"Here, you fellows," he shouted. "Each of you take hold of this."

Joe was the first to respond, and the sound became louder. Then Herb and
Jimmy followed suit, and it was evident that they served as amplifiers,
for with each additional hand the music swelled to greater volume.

The boys looked at each other as if asking whether this was all real or
if they had suddenly been transferred to some realm of fancy. They would
not have been greatly surprised to wake up suddenly and find that they
had been dreaming.

But there was no delusion about it and they listened without saying
another word until, in a glorious strain of melody, the selection came
to an end. Nor did they break the silence until a band orchestra was
announced and crashed into a brilliant overture.

While it was still in full swing, Bob had an inspiration. He took off
his headphones and clamped them on to the phonograph that stood on a
table near by. Instantly the music became intensified and filled the
room. When all their hands were on the wire, it became so loud that they
had to close the doors of the phonograph.

"Well," gasped Bob, when the last strain had died away and the
demonstration was complete, "that's something new on me."

"Never dreamed of anything like it," said Joe, sinking back in his
chair. "Of course we know that the human body has electrical capacity
and that operators sometimes have to use metal shields to protect the
tube from the influence of the hand. And in our loop aerial at Ocean
Point you noticed that the receptivity of the tube was modified when we
touched it with our fingers."

"Of course, in theory," observed Bob thoughtfully, "the human body
possesses inductance as well as capacity, and so might serve as an
antenna. But I never thought of demonstrating it in practice."

"So Bob is an aerial," grinned Herb. "I always knew he was a 'live
wire,' but I never figured him out as an antenna."

"And don't forget that if Bob is an aerial we're amplifiers," put in
Jimmy.

"There's glory enough for all," laughed Joe. "We'll have to tell Doctor
Dale and Frank Brandon about this. We've got so many tips from them that
it's about time we made it the other way around."

They were so excited about this new development which they had stumbled
upon purely through accident that they sat talking about it for a long
time until Bob chanced to look at his watch.

"Just have time for the last selection," he remarked, as he reconnected
the aerial. "We'll wind up in the regular way this time. It's an aria
from Lucia and I don't want to miss it."

He had some difficulty in making his adjustment, as there was a lot of
interference at the moment.

"Raft of amateurs horning in," he muttered. "All of them seem to have
chosen just this time to do it. I wonder----"

He stopped as though he had been shot, and listened intently. Then he
beckoned to the others to adjust their headphones.

Into the receiver was coming a succession of stuttering sounds that
eventually succeeded in framing intelligible words. Ordinarily this
might have provoked laughter, but not now. They had heard that voice
before.

It was the voice of Dan Cassey!




CHAPTER IV

A PUZZLING MYSTERY


For the second time that evening the radio boys thought they must be
dreaming.

Cassey! Cassey the swindler, whom they had compelled to make restitution
to the victim he had wronged. Cassey the thug, whom they had captured in
that wild chase after he had looted the safe and nearly killed the
operator in the sending station. Cassey the convict, who, to their
certain knowledge, had been sentenced to a long term in prison.

What was Cassey doing over the radio? That it was that scoundrel they
had no doubt. The stuttering, the tones of the voice, the occasional
whistle which he indulged in in order to go on--all these things they
recognized perfectly. It was the wildest kind of improbability that he
had a double anywhere who could reproduce him so perfectly.

Gone now was any thought of the aria from Lucia. Bob motioned
frantically to Jimmy to hand him a pencil and a sheet of paper. Then he
jotted down the words, as after great efforts they fell one by one from
the stutterer's lips. As Bob did this he bent over the paper in frowning
perplexity. The words themselves were intelligible, but they did not
seem to make sense, nor was there anywhere a connected sentence.

Finally the stammering voice ceased, and after they had waited several
minutes longer to make sure that it would not resume, the boys took off
their headphones and gazed at each other in utter bewilderment.

"Well, I'll be blessed!" exclaimed Joe. "That villain Cassey, of all men
on the face of the earth! What do you make of it, Bob?"

"I don't know what to make of it," confessed Bob. "It has simply knocked
me endways. I never thought to hear of that rascal again for the rest of
my life. Yet here he is, less than a year after he's been sentenced,
talking over the radio."

"Perhaps he's received a pardon," hazarded Jimmy.

"Not at all likely," answered Bob. "It isn't as though he were a first
offender. He's old in crime. You remember the raking over the judge gave
him when he sentenced him. Told him if he had it in his power he'd give
him more than he actually did. No, I think we can dismiss that idea."

"Isn't it possible," suggested Herb, "that he's employed as radio
operator in the prison? He understands sending and receiving all right."

"That doesn't strike me hard either," Bob objected. "Likely enough the
prison is equipped with a wireless set, but it isn't probable that
they'd let a prisoner operate it. It would give him too good a chance to
get in touch with confederates outside the jail. Then, too, his
stuttering would make him a laughing stock.

"The only explanation that I can see," he went on, "is that he's
escaped, and he's sending this message on his own hook. Though what the
message is about is beyond me."

"Just what did you get down?" asked Jimmy curiously. "I caught a few
words, but I don't remember them all."

"It's a regular hodgepodge," replied Bob, spreading out the sheet of
paper, while they all crowded around to read.

"Corn--hay--six--paint--water--slow--sick--jelly," read Joe aloud.
"Sounds to me like the ravings of a delirium patient."

"And yet I'm sure that I got all the words down right," said Bob
perplexedly. "It must be a code of some kind. We can't understand it,
and Cassey didn't mean that any one should except some one person whose
ear was glued to a radiophone. But you can bet that that person
understood it all right."

"I wonder if we couldn't make it out," suggested Herb.

"No harm in trying," said Joe, "though compared to this a Chinese puzzle
is as simple as A B C. Let's take a hack at it, anyhow. We'll each take
a separate sheet of paper and try to get something out of it that makes
sense."

For nearly an hour the boys did their best. They put the words in
different orders, read them forward and backward. But the ideas conveyed
by the separate words were so utterly dissimilar that they could frame
nothing that had the slightest glimmering of sense and they were finally
compelled to give it up.

"If time were money, we'd spend enough on this stuff to make us
bankrupt," Joe remarked, in vast disgust, as he rose to get his cap.
"Dan Cassey was foxy when he made this up. We'll have to give the rascal
credit for that."

"Yes," admitted Herb, "it's the best kind of a code. Any one of those
words might mean any one of a hundred thousand things. A man might spend
a lifetime on it and be no nearer success at the end than he was when he
started. The only way it can be unraveled is by finding the key that
tells what the words stand for. And even that may not exist in written
form. The fellows may simply have committed them to memory.

"I'll tell you what I'll do!" Bob exclaimed. "I'll get the prison
to-morrow on the long distance 'phone and ask them about Cassey. I'll
tell them all about this radio message, and it may be a valuable tip to
them. They may be able to locate the station from which the messages
come, if there are any more of them. You remember how Mr. Brandon
located Cassey's sending station the first time."

Bob was as good as his word, and got in communication with the prison
just before school time. The warden was gruff and inclined to be
uncommunicative at first, but his manner changed remarkably after he
heard of the radio message and he inquired eagerly for the slightest
details.

"Yes, Cassey has escaped," he told Bob. "He got away about two months
ago. He had behaved himself well for the first six months of his
imprisonment, and we made him a trusty. In that capacity he had access
to various parts of the prison and occasionally to my own quarters,
which are in a wing connected with the prison. In some way that hasn't
yet been discovered he got possession of clothes to cover his prison
uniform and got away one day from the yard in which he was working.
Probably with his help, two others got away at the same time. Their
names are Jake Raff and Toppy Gillen, both of them desperate criminals
and in for long terms. Likely enough the three of them are operating
together somewhere. We made a careful search for them and have sent out
descriptions of them to the police of all the important cities in the
United States. But this clue of yours is the only one we have, and it
may prove a most important one. I'll see that the Federal radio
authorities are notified at once. Keep in touch with me and let me know
if you come across anything else that seems to point to Cassey. His
escape is a sore point with me, and I'd be glad to have him once more
behind the bars. You can be sure he'll never get away again until he's
served out the last day of his sentence."

With a warm expression of thanks the warden hung up his telephone
receiver, and Bob hurried off to school to tell his comrades of what he
had learned.

There was no chance for this, however, before recess, as he had been
kept so long at the telephone that he was barely able to reach the
school before the bell rang.

When at last he told them of his talk with the warden, they listened
with spellbound interest.

"So the villain managed to escape, did he?" ruminated Joe. "That's a
black mark against the warden, and it's no wonder he's anxious to get
him back. I'd hate to be in Cassey's shoes if the prison gates ever
close on him again."

"You'd think it would be a comparatively easy matter to capture him,"
suggested Herb. "The fact that he stutters so badly makes him a marked
man."

"You can bet that he doesn't do any more talking than he can help,"
replied Joe. "And, for that matter, I suppose there are a good many
thousand stutterers in the United States. Almost every town has one or
more. Of course it's against him, but it doesn't by any means make it a
sure thing that he'll be nabbed."

Buck Looker and his cronies happened to pass them in the yard just at
that moment and caught the last word. Buck whispered something to Carl
Lutz, and the latter broke out into uproarious laughter.

It was so obviously directed against Joe that his impulsive temper took
fire at once. He stepped up to the trio, despite Bob's outstretched hand
that tried to restrain him.

"Were you fellows laughing at me?" he asked of the three, though his
eyes were fastened directly on Buck's.

"Not especially at you," returned Buck insolently. "But at something you
said."

"And what was that?" asked Joe, coming a step nearer, at which Buck
stepped back a trifle.

"About getting nabbed," he said. "It made me think of some fellows I
know that were nabbed last night for breaking windows."

"Oh, that was it!" remarked Joe, with dangerous calmness while his fist
clenched. "Now let me tell you what it reminds me of. It makes me think
of three cowards who smashed a window last night with a stone packed in
a snowball and then ran away as fast as their legs could carry them.
Perhaps you'd like me to tell you their names?"

"I don't know what you're talking about," retorted Buck, changing color.

"Oh, yes, you do," replied Joe. "And while I'm about it, I'll add that
the fellows who smashed the window were not only cowards, but worse. And
their names are Buck Looker, Carl Lutz and Terry Mooney."

"What's that?" cried Buck, bristling up, while an angry growl arose from
his cronies.

"You heard me the first time," replied Joe; "but to get it into your
thick heads I'll say it again. The cowards, and worse, I referred to are
named Buck Looker, Carl Lutz and Terry Mooney."




CHAPTER V

MARVELS OF WIRELESS


"That's fighting talk," blustered Buck, as he made a pretense of getting
ready to throw off his coat.

"That's precisely what I want it to be," declared Joe, as he tore off
his coat and threw it to the ground.

By this time most of the boys in the school yard had sensed the
tenseness of the situation and had gathered around Joe and Buck, forming
a ring many lines deep.

"A fight!" was the cry.

"Go in, Joe!"

"Soak him, Buck!"

Before Joe's determined attitude and flashing eyes, Buck wavered. He
fingered his coat uncertainly and glanced toward the school windows.

"There's one of the teachers looking out," he declared. "And it's
against the rules to fight on the school grounds. If it wasn't for that
I'd beat you up."

There was a general snicker from the boys at Buck Looker's sudden regard
for the rules of the school.

"Any other place you can think of where you'd like to beat me up?" said
Joe sarcastically. "How about this afternoon after school down by the
river?"

"I----I've got to go out of town this afternoon," Buck stammered. "But
don't you worry. I'll give you all the fight you're looking for the
first chance I get."

Murmurs of derision arose from the crowd, and the flush on the bully's
sour face grew much deeper.

"You're just a yellow dog, Buck!" exclaimed Joe, in disgust. "Have I got
to pull your nose to make you stand up to me?"

He advanced toward him, and Buck retreated. What would have happened
next will never be known, for just at that moment one of the teachers
emerged from the school and came toward the ring. Hostilities at the
moment were out of the question, and the boys began to scatter. Buck
heaved a sigh of evident relief, and now that he felt himself safe, all
his old bluster came back to him.

"It's mighty lucky for you that Bixby came out just then," he declared.
"I was just getting ready to thrash you within an inch of your life."

Joe laughed sarcastically.

"The trouble with you, Buck, is that you spend so much time getting
ready that you never have any time for real fighting," he remarked. "It
took you an awfully long time to get your coat unbuttoned."

"They laugh best who laugh last," growled Buck. "And don't forget that
you fellows have got to pay for that glass you broke."

"You've got another guess coming," replied Joe. "You or one of your gang
broke that glass and we can prove it."

"I wasn't downtown that night at all," said Buck glibly.

"Don't add any more lies to your score," said Joe scornfully. "We've got
you! You and your gang are the only fellows in town who would put stones
in snowballs, anyway."

"If that's all the evidence you've got, it wouldn't go far in a court of
law," sneered Buck. "Any judge would see that you were trying to back
out of it by putting it up to somebody else."

"Perhaps you don't know that Mr. Talley bumped into you while you were
running away," remarked Joe.

This shot told, for Buck had banked on the darkness and had forgotten
all about his encounter with Mr. Talley. He had been nursing the
comfortable assurance that all he had to do was to deny. Now his house
of cards had come tumbling about his ears. Mr. Talley was a respected
citizen, and his word would be accepted by everybody.

Joe saw the effect of his remark and smiled drily.

"Want to revise that statement of yours that you weren't downtown at all
last night?" he asked, with affected politeness.

"He--he was mistaken," stammered Buck weakly, as he walked away,
followed by his discomfited cronies.

"I guess that will hold him for a while," chuckled Jimmy, as the radio
boys watched his retreating figure.

Two or three days passed without special developments. The broken pane
of glass had been restored and the parents of the boys had been formally
notified by the insurance company that they would be held responsible
jointly for the damages. A similar notice had been sent to the fathers
of Buck and his mates.

Mr. Looker replied, denying that his son was at all implicated in the
matter and refusing to pay. Mr. Layton admitted that his son had been
throwing snowballs in front of the store on the night in question, but
he stated that he had not thrown the ball with a stone in it that broke
the window. He added that any further communication regarding the matter
could be sent to his lawyer.

Of the others involved, some had taken similar positions and others had
ignored the matter altogether, leaving it to the insurance company to
make the next move. And there for the time the matter rested.

The radio boys had missed Larry's performance on the night that he had
opened with his new repertoire, but they were bound not to be cheated of
the second, which took place only a few nights later.

They crowded eagerly about the radio set when their friend's turn was
announced, and listened with a breathless interest, that was intensified
by their warm personal regard for the performer, to the rendition of the
cries of various animals with which Larry regaled them.

The imitations were so lifelike that the boys might well have imagined
they were in a zoölogical garden. Lions, tigers, bears, elephants,
snakes, moose, and other specimens of the animal and the reptile tribes
were imitated with a fidelity that was amazing. In addition, the
renditions were interspersed with droll and lively comments by Larry
that added immensely to the humor of the performance. When at last it
was over, the boys broke out into enthusiastic hand-clapping that would
have warmed Larry's heart, had he been able to hear it.

"The old boy is all there!" chortled Bob enthusiastically.

"He's a wonder!" ejaculated Joe. "No question there of a square peg in a
round hole. He's found exactly the work in life he's specially fitted
for."

"And think of the audience he has," put in Jimmy. "At this very minute
there are probably hundreds of thousands of people who have been tickled
to death at his performance. Just suppose those people all clapped their
hands at once just as we have done and we could hear it. Why, it would
be like a young earthquake."

At this moment the doorbell rang, and Dr. Dale was announced. He spent a
few minutes with Mr. and Mrs. Layton, and then came up to have a little
chat with the boys. This was one thing he never overlooked. His interest
in and sympathy with the young were unbounded, and accounted largely for
the influence that he exerted in the community.

The radio boys greeted the minister warmly and gladly made room for him
around the table. His coming was never felt by them to be an
interruption. They regarded him almost as one of themselves. Apart, too,
from the thorough liking they had for him as a man, they were
exceedingly grateful to him for the help he had been to them in radio
matters. He was their mentor, guide and friend.

"I knew I'd find you busy with the radio," he said, with a genial smile.

"We can't be torn away from it," replied Bob. "We think it's just the
greatest thing that ever happened. Just now we've been listening to
Larry Bartlett give his imitations of animals. You remember Larry?"

"I certainly do," replied Dr. Dale. "And I remember how you boys helped
him get his present position. It was one of the best things you ever
did. He's certainly a finished artist. I heard him on his opening night,
and I've laughed thinking of it many times since. He's a most amusing
entertainer."

It was the first opportunity the boys had had to tell the doctor of the
night when Bob found that he was a human aerial, and he listened to the
many details of the experiment with absorbed interest.

"It's something new to me," he said. "You boys have reason to be
gratified at having had a novel experience. That's the beauty of radio.
Something new is always cropping up. Many of the other sciences have
been more or less fully explored, and while none of them will ever be
exhausted, their limits have been to some extent indicated. But in radio
we're standing just on the threshold of a science whose infinite
possibilities have not even been guessed. One discovery crowds so
closely on the heels of another that we have all we can do to keep track
of them.

"I've just got back from a little trip up in New York State," he went
on, as he settled himself more comfortably in his chair, "and I stopped
off at Schenectady to look over the big radio station there. By great
good luck, Marconi happened to be there on the same day----"

"Marconi!" breathed Bob. "The father of wireless!"

"Yes," smiled Dr. Dale. "Or if you want to put it in another way, the
Christopher Columbus who discovered the New World of radio. I counted it
a special privilege to get a glimpse of him. But what attracted my
special attention in the little while I could spend there was a small
tube about eighteen inches long and two inches in diameter which many
radio experts think will completely revolutionize long distance radio
communication."

"You mean the Langmuir tube," said Joe. "I was reading of it the other
day, and it seems to be a dandy."

"It's a wonderful thing," replied the doctor. "Likely enough it will
take the place of the great transatlantic plants which require so much
room and such enormous machinery. It's practically noiseless. Direct
current is sent into the wire through a complicated wire system and
generates a high frequency current of tremendous power. I saw it working
when it was connected with an apparatus carrying about fifteen thousand
volts of electricity in a direct current. A small blue flame shot
through the tube with scarcely a particle of noise. The broken impulse
from the electrical generators behind the tube was sent through the tube
to be flung off from the antenna into space in the dots and dashes of
the international code. That little tube was not much bigger than a
stick of dynamite, but was infinitely more powerful. I was so fascinated
by it and all that it meant that it was hard work to tear myself away
from it. It marks a great step forward in the field of radio."

"It must have been wonderfully interesting," remarked Bob. "And yet I
suppose that in a year or two something new will be invented that will
put even that out of date."

"It's practically certain that there will be," assented the doctor. "The
miracles of to-day become the commonplaces of to-morrow. That
fifty-kilowatt tube that develops twelve horsepower within its narrow
walls of glass, wonderful as it is, is bound to be superseded by
something better, and the inventor himself would be the first one to
admit it. Some of the finest scientific brains in the country are
working on the problem, and he would be a bold prophet and probably a
false prophet that would set any bounds to its possibilities.

"Radio is yet in its infancy," the doctor concluded, as he rose to go.
"But one thing is certain. In the lifetime of those who witnessed its
birth it will become a giant--but a benevolent giant who, instead of
destroying will re-create our civilization."




CHAPTER VI

THE FOREST RANGER


Some days later Bob and Herb and Joe were on their way to Bob's house to
do a little experimenting on the latter's set, when they were surprised
at the alacrity with which Jimmy turned a corner and came puffing up to
them.

"Say, fellows!" he yelled, as he came within earshot, "I've got some
mighty interesting news for you."

"Let's have it," said Bob.

"It's about the snowball Buck fired through the window," panted Jimmy,
falling into step beside them. "I met a man who's staying up at the
Sterling House. He says Buck's the boy who did it, all right."

"How does he know?" all of the others asked with interest.

"Saw Buck pick up a stone and pack the snow hard around it," said Jimmy
importantly. "He saw it himself, so we've got one witness for our side,
all right."

"That's good," said Bob, adding, with a glint in his eye: "Say, wouldn't
I like to get my hands on Buck, just for about five minutes!"

"Well, you won't have a chance," said Jimmy, enjoying being the bearer
of so much news. "Buck's gone with his father to a lumber camp up in
Braxton woods."

"How do you know all this?" inquired Herb curiously. "You seem to be
chock full of information to-day."

"Oh, a little bird told me," said Jimmy, looking mysterious. However, as
Herb made a threatening motion toward him, he hurried to explain. "I met
Terry Mooney," he said. "I told him I knew all about who put the stone
in the snowball and I told him that our crowd was going to make his look
like two cents. He laughed and said swell chance we'd have. Said Buck
had gone to the lumber camp with his father and that he and Carl Lutz
were going to join him in a day or two. Just like Buck to run away when
he knows there's a good licking coming to him!" added Jimmy, with a
sneer.

"Oh, well, what do we care?" said Joe. "At least we sha'n't have those
fellows around spoiling all the fun."

"I'm glad you found out about the snowball just the same," said Bob
thoughtfully. "Every little bit helps when we have to fight against that
crooked gang of Buck's."

"Here's hoping," said Herb fervently, "that they stay away all the rest
of the spring."

By this time the lads had reached Bob's house. It was Saturday
afternoon, and as the boys crowded noisily into the hall Bob noticed
that his father was in the library and that he seemed to have company.

He was starting upstairs with the other lads when his father came out of
the library and called to him.

"Come on in for a few minutes, boys," he said. "I have a friend here who
is a man after your own hearts," and his eyes twinkled. "He's interested
in radio."

The boys needed no second invitation, for they never missed an
opportunity of meeting any one who could tell them something about the
wonders of radio.

Mr. Layton's guest was lounging in one of the great chairs in the
library, and from the moment the boys laid eyes on him they knew they
were going to hear something of more than usual interest.

The stranger was big, over six feet, and his face and hands were like a
Cuban's, they were so dark. Even his fair hair seemed to have been burnt
a darker hue by the sun. There was a tang of the great out-of-doors
about him, a hint of open spaces and adventure that fascinated the radio
boys.

"This is my son, Mr. Bentley," said Mr. Layton to the lounging stranger,
still with a twinkle in his eye. "And the other boys are his inseparable
companions. Also I think they are almost as crazy about radio as you
are."

The stranger laughed and turned to Bob.

"I've been upstairs to see your set," he said, adding heartily: "It's
fine. I've seldom seen better amateur equipment."

If Bob had liked this stranger before, it was nothing to what he felt
for him now. To the radio boys, if any one praised their radio sets,
this person, no matter who it was, promptly became their friend for
life.

"I'm glad you think it's pretty good," Bob said modestly. "We fellows
have surely worked hard enough over it."

"This gentleman here," said Mr. Layton to the boys, "ought to know quite
a bit about radio. He operates an airplane in the service of our
Government Forestry."

"In the United States Forest Service?" cried Bob, breathlessly, eyeing
the stranger with increasing interest. "And is your airplane equipped
with radio?"

"Very much so," replied Mr. Bentley. "It seems almost a fairy tale--what
radio has done for the Forest Service."

"I've read a lot about the fighting of forest fires," broke in Joe
eagerly. "But I didn't know radio had anything to do with it."

"It hadn't until the last few years," the visitor answered, adding, with
a laugh: "But now it's pretty near the whole service!"

"Won't you tell us something about what you do?" asked Bob.

Mr. Bentley waved a deprecating hand while Mr. Layton leaned back in his
chair with the air of one who is enjoying himself.

"It isn't so much what I do," protested this interesting newcomer, while
the boys hung upon his every word. "It is what radio has done in the
fighting of forest fires that is the marvelous, the almost unbelievable,
thing. The man who first conceived the idea of bringing radio into the
wilderness had to meet and overcome the same discouragements that fall
to the lot of every pioneer.

"The government declared that the cost of carrying and setting up the
radio apparatus would be greater than the loss occasioned every season
by the terribly destructive forest fires. But there was a fellow named
Adams who thought he knew better."

"Adams!" repeated Bob breathlessly. "Wasn't he the fellow who had charge
of the Mud Creek ranger station at Montana?"

The visitor nodded and gazed at Bob with interest. "How did you know?"
he asked.

"Oh, I read something about him a while ago," answered Bob vaguely. He
was chiefly interested in having Mr. Bentley go on.

"I should think," said Herb, "that it would be pretty hard work carrying
delicate radio apparatus into the lumber country."

"You bet your life it is," replied Mr. Bentley. "The only way the
apparatus can be carried is by means of pack horses, and as each horse
can't carry more than a hundred and fifty pounds you see it takes quite
a few of the animals to lug even an ordinary amount of apparatus.

"The hardest part of the whole thing," he went on, warming to his
recital as the boys were so evidently interested, "was packing the
cumbersome storage batteries. These batteries were often lost in
transit, too. If a pack horse happened to slip from the trail, its pack
became loosened and went tumbling down the mountain side----"

"That's the life!" interrupted Jimmy gleefully, and the visitor smiled
at him.

"You might not think so if you happened to be the one detailed to travel
back over the almost impassable trails for the missing apparatus,"
observed Mr. Bentley ruefully. "It wasn't all fun, that pioneer
installation of radio. Not by any means."

"But radio turned the trick just the same," said Bob slangily. "I've
read that a message that used to take two days to pass between ranger
stations can be sent now in a few seconds."

"Right!" exclaimed Mr. Bentley, his eyes glinting. "In a little while
the saving in the cost of forest fires will more than pay for the
installation of radio. We nose out a fire and send word by wireless to
the nearest station, before the fire fairly knows it's started."

"But just what is it that you do?" asked Joe, with flattering eagerness.

"I do scout work," was the reply. "I help patrol the fire line in cases
of bad fires. The men fighting the fire generally carry a portable
receiving apparatus along with them, and by that means, I, in my
airplane, can report the progress of a fire and direct the distribution
of the men."

"It must be exciting work," said Herb enviously. "That's just the kind
of life I'd like--plenty of adventure, something doing every minute."

"There's usually plenty doing," agreed Mr. Bentley, with a likable grin.
"We can't complain that our life is slow."

"I should think," said Bob slowly, "that it might be dangerous,
installing sets right there in the heavy timber."

"That's what lots of radio engineers thought also," agreed Mr. Bentley.
"But no such trouble has developed so far, and I guess it isn't likely
to now."

"Didn't they have some trouble in getting power enough for their sets?"
asked Joe, with interest.

"Yes, that was a serious drawback in the beginning," came the answer.
"They had to design a special equipment--a sort of gasoline charging
plant. In this way they were able to secure enough power for the
charging of the storage batteries."

Bob drew a long breath.

"Wouldn't I have liked to be the one to fit up that first wireless
station!" he cried enthusiastically. "Just think how that Mr. Adams must
have felt when he received his first message through the air."

"It wasn't all fun," the interesting visitor reminded the boys. "The
station was of the crudest sort, you know. The first operator had a box
to sit on and another box served as the support for his apparatus."

"So much the better," retorted Bob stoutly. "A radio fan doesn't know or
care, half the time, what he's sitting on."

"Which proves," said Mr. Bentley, laughing, "that you are a real one!"
And at this all the lads grinned.

"But say," interrupted Joe, going back to the problem of power, "weren't
the engineers able to think up something to take the place of the
gasoline charging stations?"

"Oh, yes. But not without a good deal of experimenting. Now they are
using two hundred and seventy number two Burgess dry batteries. These,
connecting in series, secure the required three hundred and fifty-volt
plate current."




CHAPTER VII

RADIO AND THE FIRE FIEND


"Well, I hope that the boys know what you're talking about," interrupted
Mr. Layton at this point, his eyes twinkling, "for I'm sure I don't."

"They know what I'm talking about all right," returned his guest,
admiration in his laughing eyes as he looked at the boys. "Unless I miss
my guess, these fellows are the stuff of which radio experts are made. I
bet they'll do great things yet."

"Won't you tell us more about your experiences?" begged Herb, while the
other boys tried not to look too pleased at the praise. "It isn't often
we have a chance to hear of adventures like yours first hand."

"Well," said Mr. Bentley, modestly, "I don't know that there's much to
tell. All we scouts do is to patrol the country and watch for fires. Of
course, in case of a big fire, our duties are more exciting. I remember
one fire," he leaned back in his chair reminiscently and the boys
listened eagerly, hanging on every word. "It was a beauty of its kind,
covering pretty nearly fourteen miles. Thousands of dollars' worth of
valuable timber was menaced. It looked for a time as if it would get the
better of us, at that.

"Men were scarce and there was a high wind to urge the fire on. A
receiving set was rushed to the fire line, some of the apparatus in a
truck and some carried by truck horses. My plane was detailed to patrol
the fire line and give directions to the men who were fighting the
fire."

He paused, and the boys waited impatiently for him to go on.

"The good old plane was equipped for both sending and receiving, and I
tell you we patrolled that fourteen miles of flaming forest, sometimes
coming so close to the tree tops that we almost seemed to brush them.

"My duty, of course, was to report the progress of the fire. Controlled
at one point, it broke out at another, and it was through the messages
from my 'plane to the ground set stationed just behind the fire line
that the men were moved from one danger point to the next.

"Finally, the fire seeming nearly out along one side of the ridge, I
sent the men to fighting it on the other side, where it had been left to
rage uncontrolled. No sooner had the men scattered for the danger point
than the brooding fire broke out again and it was necessary to recall
half the men.

"It was a long fight and a hard one, but with the aid of the blessed old
wireless, we finally won out. As a matter of fact, the wireless-equipped
airplane has become as necessary to the Forest Service as ships are to
the navy.

"In the old days," he went on, seeing that the boys were still deeply
interested, "when they depended upon the ordinary telephone to convey
warnings of fires they were surely leaning upon a broken reed.

"Often, just when they needed the means of communication most, the fire
would sweep through the woods, destroying trees to which the telephone
wires were fastened, and melting the wires themselves. So the eyes of
the Forest Service were put out and they were forced to work in the
dark."

"But I should think," protested Bob, "that there would be times when
even wireless would be put out of the job. Suppose the fire were to
reach one of the stations equipped with wireless. What then?"

Mr. Bentley laughed as though amused at something.

"I can tell you an interesting incident connected with that," he said.
"And one that shows the pluck and common sense of radio operators in
general--don't think that I'm throwing bouquets at myself, now, for
first and last, I am a pilot, even if sometimes I find it necessary to
employ radio.

"Well, anyway, this operator that I am speaking of, found himself in a
perilous position. A fire had been raging for days, and now it was so
close to his station that the station itself was threatened.

"One morning when he got up the smoke from the burning forest was
swirling about the open space in front of the station and he knew that
before long he would be seeing flame instead of smoke. The fire fighters
had been working ceaselessly, fighting gallantly, but the elements were
against them. The air was almost as dry and brittle as the wood which
the flames lapped up and there was a steady wind that drove the fire on
and on.

"If only there might come a fog or the wind change its direction! But
the radio man had no intention of waiting on the elements. I don't
believe he gave more than a passing thought to his own safety--his chief
interest was for the safety of his beloved apparatus.

"He decided to dismantle the set, build a raft and set himself and the
apparatus adrift upon the water in the attempt to save it.

"And so he worked feverishly, while the fire came closer and he could
hear the men who were fighting the fire shouting to each other. Finally
he succeeded in dismantling the set and got it down to the water's edge.

"Here he built a rough raft, piled the apparatus upon it, jumped after
it, and drifted out into the middle of the lake."

"Did the station burn down?" asked Jimmy excitedly.

"No, fortunately. The wind died down in the nick of time, giving the men
a chance to control the blaze. When it was evident the danger was past,
the operator set up his apparatus again and prepared to continue his
duties, as though nothing had happened.

"There you have the tremendous advantage of radio. There were no wires
to be destroyed. Only a radio set which could be dismantled and taken to
safety while the fire raged."

"That operator sure had his nerve with him, all right," said Bob
admiringly.

"More nerve than common sense perhaps," chuckled Mr. Bentley. "But you
certainly can't help admiring him. He was right there when it came to
grit."

After a while they began to discuss technicalities, and the boys learned
a great many things they had never known before. The pilot happening to
mention that there were sometimes a number of airplanes equipped with
radio operating within a restricted district, Joe wanted to know if they
did not have a good deal of trouble with interference.

"No. There was at first some interference by amateurs, but these soon
learned to refrain from using their instruments during patrol periods.

"You see," he explained, "we use a special type of transmitting outfit
aboard our fire-detection craft. It's called the SCR-Seventy-three. The
equipment obtains its power from a self-excited inductor type
alternator. This is propelled by a fixed wooden-blade air fan. In the
steam-line casing of the alternator the rotary spark gap, alternator,
potential transformer, condenser and oscillation transformer are
self-contained. Usually the alternator is mounted on the underside of
the fuselage where the propeller spends its force in the form of an air
stream. The telegraph sending keys, field and battery switch, dry
battery, variometer and antenna reel are the only units included inside
the fuselage.

"The type of transmitter is a simple rotary gap, indirectly excited
spark and provided with nine taps on the inductance coil of the closed
oscillating circuit. Five varying toothed discs for the rotary spark gap
yield five different signal tones and nine different wave lengths are
possible.

"So," he finished, looking around at their absorbed faces, "you see it
is quite possible to press into service a number of airplanes without
being bothered by interference."

"It sounds complete," said Bob. "I'd like a chance to see one of those
sets at close range sometime."

The time passed so quickly that finally the visitor rose with an apology
for staying so late. The radio boys were sorry to see him go. They could
have sat for hours more, listening to him.

"That fellow sure has had some experiences!" said Joe, as, a little
later, the boys mounted the stairs to Bob's room. "It was mighty lucky
we happened along while he was here."

"You bet your life," said Herb. "I wouldn't have missed meeting him for
a lot."

"Say, fellows," Jimmy announced from the head of the stairs, "I know now
what I'm going to do when I'm through school. It's me for the tall
timber. I'm going to pilot an airplane in the service of my country."

"Ain't he noble?" demanded Herb, grinning, as the boys crowded into
Bob's room.




CHAPTER VIII

NEAR DISASTER


Several days later while the radio boys were experimenting with their
big set and talking over their interesting meeting with the Forest
Service ranger, Herb displayed an immense horseshoe magnet.

"Look what he's got for luck," chortled Jimmy. "The superstitious nut!"

"Superstitious nothing!" snorted Herb. "If I'd wanted it for luck I
wouldn't have got a magnet, would I? Any old common horseshoe would have
done for luck."

"Well, what's the big idea?" asked Bob, looking up from the audion tube
he was experimenting with. "Or is there any?" he added, with a grin.

"You bet your life there is!" returned Herb. "It's got to do with that
very audion tube you're fussing with."

"Ah, go on," jeered Joe, good-naturedly. "What's a magnet got to do with
an audion tube, I'd like to know!"

"Poor old Herb," added Jimmy, with a commiserating shake of the head.

"Say, look here, all you fellows! Don't you go wasting any pity on me,"
cried Herb hotly. "If you don't look out, I won't show you my experiment
at all."

"Go on, Herb," said Bob consolingly. "I'm listening."

"Well, I'm glad there's one sensible member of this bunch!" cried Herb,
and from then on addressed himself solely to Bob. "Look here," he said.
"You can make the audion tube ever so much more sensitive to vibration
if you put this magnet near it."

"Who says so?" asked Bob, with interest.

"I do. Here, put on the headphones and listen. I'll prove it to you."

Bob obeyed and tuned in to the nearest broadcasting station where a
concert was scheduled. As soon as he signified by a nod of his head that
the connection was satisfactory Herb placed the big horseshoe magnet in
such a position that the poles of the magnet were on each side of the
tube.

Sure enough, Bob was amazed at the almost magical improvement in the
sound. It was clearer, more distinct, altogether more satisfactory. He
listened in for another moment then wonderingly took off the headphones
while Herb grinned at him in triumph.

"Well, what do you think?" asked the latter while Joe and Jimmy looked
at them curiously.

"Think?" repeated Bob, still wonderingly. "Why, there's only one thing
to think, of course. That fool horseshoe of yours, Herb, is one
wonderful improvement. I don't know how it works, but it surely is a
marvel."

Herb glanced at Jimmy and Joe in triumph.

"What did I tell you?" he said. "Perhaps now you'll believe that my idea
wasn't such a fool one after all."

"But what did it do, Bob?" asked Joe, mystified.

"It increased the sensitivity of that old audion tube, that's what it
did," replied Bob, absently, his mind already busy with inventive
thoughts. "I can't see yet just how it accomplished it, but the
connection with the station was certainly clearer and more distinct than
usual."

"But how can a magnet increase the sensitivity of a vacuum tube?" asked
Jimmy, not yet wholly convinced. "It doesn't make sense."

"Well, I don't see why not," contradicted Joe slowly. "I suppose the
improvement is due to the magnetic effect of the magnet upon the
electrons flowing from the filament to the plate. I don't exactly see
why it should be an improvement, but if it is, then there must be some
reason for it."

"I wish we could find the reason!" cried Bob excitedly. "If we could
make some improvement upon the vacuum tube----"

"Don't wake him up, he is dreaming!" cried Herb. "If you don't look out,
old boy, you'll have us all millionaires."

"Well, there are worse things," retorted Bob, taking the magnet from
Herb's hand and placing it near the tube. "This has given us something
to think about, anyway."

For a while they puzzled over the mystery, trying to find some way in
which the discovery might be made to serve a practical purpose--all
except Herb, who retired to one corner of the "lab" to fuss with some
chemicals which he fondly hoped might be used in the construction of a
battery.

So engrossed were the boys in the problem of the magnet and vacuum tube
that they forgot all about Herb and his experiments. So what happened
took them completely off their guard.

There was a sudden cry from Herb, followed closely by an explosion that
knocked them off their feet. For a moment they lay there, a bit dazed by
the shock. Then they scrambled to their feet and looked about them.
Herb, being the nearest to the explosion, had got the worst of it. His
face and hands were black and he was shaking a little from the shock. He
gazed at the boys sheepishly.

"Wh-what happened?" asked Jimmy dazedly.

"An earthquake, I guess," replied Bob, as he looked about him to see
what damage had been done.

Some doughnuts, which their namesake had recently fetched from the
store, lay scattered upon the floor, together with some rather
dilapidated-looking pieces of candy, but aside from this, nothing seemed
to have been damaged seriously.

Jimmy's followed Bob's gaze, and, finding his precious sweets upon the
floor, began gathering them up hastily, stuffing a doughnut in his mouth
to help him hurry. What mattered it to Jimmy that the floor was none too
clean?

"Say, what's the big idea, anyway," Joe demanded of the blackened Herb.
"Trying to start a Fourth of July celebration, or something?"

"I was just mixing some chemicals, and the result was a flare-up,"
explained Herb sulkily. "Now, stop rubbing it into a fellow, will you?
You might know I didn't do it on purpose."

Bob began to laugh.

"Better get in connection with some soap and water, Herb," he said.
"Just now you look like the lead for a minstrel show."

"Never mind, Herb," Joe flung after the disconsolate scientist as he
made for the door. "As long as you don't hurt anything but Jimmy's
doughnuts, we don't care. You can have as many explosions as you like."

"Humph, that's all right for you," retorted Jimmy. "But I'll have you
know I spent my last nickel for those doughnuts."

"Just the same," said Bob soberly, as they returned to the problem of
the vacuum tube, "we're mighty lucky to have come off with so little
damage. Mixing chemicals is a pretty dangerous business unless you know
just what you're doing."

"And even then it is," added Joe.




CHAPTER IX

A HAPPY INSPIRATION


The days passed by, the boys becoming more and more engrossed in the
fascination of radio all the time. They continued to work on their sets,
sometimes with the most gratifying results, at others seeming to make
little headway.

But in spite of occasional discouragements they worked on, cheered by
the knowledge that they were making steady, if sometimes slow, progress.

There were so many really worth-while improvements being perfected each
day that they really found it difficult to keep up with them all.

"Wish we could hear Cassey's voice again," said Herb, one day when they
had tuned in on several more or less interesting personal messages.

"I don't know what good it would do us," grumbled Joe. "If he speaks
always in code he could keep us guessing till doomsday."

"He's up to some sort of mischief, anyway," said Bob; "and I, for one,
would enjoy catching him at it again."

"We would be more comfortable to have Dan Cassey in jail, where he
belongs," observed Jimmy.

But just at present the trailing of that stuttering voice seemed an
impossible feat even for the radio boys. If they could only get some
tangible clue to work on!

They saw nothing of Buck Looker or his cronies about town, and concluded
that they were still at the lumber camp.

"Can't stay away too long to suit me," Bob said cheerfully.

It was about that time that Bob found out about Adam McNulty. Adam
McNulty was the blind father of the washerwoman who served the four
families of the boys.

Bob went to the McNulty cabin, buried in the most squalid district of
the town, bearing a message from his mother. When he got there he found
that Mr. McNulty was the only one at home.

The old fellow, smoking a black pipe in the bare kitchen of the house,
seemed so pathetically glad to see some one--or, rather, to hear some
one--that Bob yielded to his invitation to sit down and talk to him.

And, someway, even after Bob reached home, he could not shake off the
memory of the lonesome old blind man with nothing to do all day long but
sit in a chair smoking his pipe, waiting for some chance word from a
passer-by.

It did not seem fair that he, Bob, should have all the good things of
life while that old man should have nothing--nothing, at all.

He spoke to his chums about it, but, though they were sympathetic, they
did not see anything they could do.

"We can't give him back his eyesight, you know," said Joe absently,
already deep in a new scheme of improvement for the set.

"No," said Bob. "But we might give him something that would do nearly as
well."

"What do you mean?" they asked, puzzled.

"Radio," said Bob, and laid his hand lovingly on the apparatus. "If it
means a lot to us, just think how much more it would mean to some one
who hasn't a thing to do all day but sit and think. Why, I don't suppose
any of us who can see can begin to realize what it would mean not to be
able even to read the daily newspaper."

The others stared at Bob, and slowly his meaning sank home.

"I get you," said Joe slowly. "And say, let me tell you, it's a great
idea, Bob. It wouldn't be so bad to be blind if you could have the daily
news read to you every day----"

"And listen to the latest on crops," added Jimmy.

"To say nothing of the latest jazz," finished Herb, with a grin.

"Well, why doesn't this blind man get himself a set?" asked Jimmy
practically. "I should think every blind person in the country would
want to own one."

"I suppose every one of them does," said Bob. "And Doctor Dale said the
other day that he thought the time would come when charities for the
blind would install radio as a matter of humanity, and that prices of
individual sets would be so low that all the blind could afford them.
The blind are many of them old, you know, and pretty poor."

"You mean," said Herb slowly, "that most of the blind folks who really
need radio more than anybody else can't afford it? Say, that doesn't
seem fair, does it?"

"It isn't fair!" cried Bob, adding, eagerly: "I tell you what I thought
we could do. There's that old set of mine! It doesn't seem much to us
now, beside our big one, but I bet that McNulty would think it was a
gold mine."

"Hooray for Bob!" cried Herb irrepressibly. "Once in a while he really
does get a good idea in his head. When do we start installing this set
in the McNulty mansion, boys?"

"As soon as you like," answered Bob. "Tomorrow's Saturday, so we could
start early in the morning. It will probably take us some time to rig up
the antenna."

The boys were enthusiastic about the idea, and they wasted no time
putting it into execution. That very night they looked up the old set,
examining it to make sure it was in working order.

When they told their families what they proposed to do, their parents
were greatly pleased.

"It does my heart good," said Mr. Layton to his wife, after Bob had gone
up to bed, "to see that those boys are interested in making some one
besides themselves happy."

"They're going to make fine men, some day," answered Mrs. Layton softly.

The boys arrived at the McNulty cottage so early the next morning that
they met Maggie McNulty on her way to collect the day's wash.

When they told her what they were going to do she was at first too
astonished to speak and then threatened to fall upon their necks in her
gratitude.

"Shure, if ye can bring some sunshine into my poor old father's dark
life," she told them in her rich brogue, tears in her eyes, "then ye'll
shure win the undyin' gratitude uv Maggie McNulty."

It was a whole day's job, and the boys worked steadily, only stopping
long enough to rush home for a bit of lunch.

They had tried to explain what they were doing to Adam McNulty, but the
old man seemed almost childishly mystified. It was with a feeling of
dismay that the boys realized that, in all probability, this was the
first time the blind man had ever heard the word radio. It seemed
incredible to them that there could be anybody in the world who did not
know about radio.

However, if Adam McNulty was mystified, he was also delightedly,
pitifully excited. He followed the boys out to the cluttered back yard
where they were rigging up the aerial, listening eagerly to their
chatter and putting in a funny word now and then that made them roar
with laughter.

Bob brought him an empty soap box for a seat and there the old man sat
hour after hour, despite the fact that there was a chill in the air,
blissfully happy in their companionship. He had been made to understand
that something pleasant was being done for him, but it is doubtful if he
could have asked for any greater happiness than just to sit there with
somebody to talk to and crack his jokes with.

They were good jokes too, full of real Irish wit, and long before the
set was ready for action the boys had become fond of the old fellow.

"He's a dead game sport," Joe said to Bob, in that brief interval when
they had raced home for lunch. "I bet I'd be a regular old crab, blind
like that."

Mrs. Layton put up an appetizing lunch for the blind man, topping it off
with a delicious homemade lemon pie and a thermos bottle full of
steaming coffee.

The way the old man ate that food was amazing even to Jimmy. Maggie was
too busy earning enough to keep them alive to bother much with dainties.
At any rate, Adam ate the entire lemon pie, not leaving so much as a
crumb.

"I thought I was pretty good on feeding," whispered Joe, in a delighted
aside, "but I never could go that old bird. He's got me beat a mile."

"Well," said Jimmy complacently, "I bet I'd tie with him."

If the boys had wanted any reward for that day of strenuous work, they
would have had it when, placing the earphones upon his white head, they
watched the expression of McNulty's face change from mystification to
wonder, then to beatific enjoyment.

He listened motionless while the exquisite music flooded his starved old
soul. Toward the end he closed his eyes and tears trickled from beneath
the lids down his wrinkled face. He brushed them off impatiently and the
boys noticed that his hand was trembling.

It was a long, long time before he seemed to be aware that there was any
one in the room with him. He seemed to have completely forgotten the
boys who had bestowed this rare gift upon him.

After a while, coming out of his dream, the old man began fumbling with
the headphones as if he wanted to take them off, and Bob helped him. The
man tried to speak, but made hard work of it. Emotion choked him.

"Shure, an' I don't know what to make of it at all, at all," he said at
last, in a quivering voice. "Shure an' I thought the age of miracles was
passed. I'm only an ignorant old man, with no eyes at all; but you lads
have given me something that's near as good. Shure an' it's an old
sinner I am, for shure. Many's the day I've sat here, prayin' the Lord
would give me wan more minute o' sight before I died, an' it was
unanswered my prayers wuz, I thought. It's grateful I am to yez, lads.
It's old Adam McNulty's blessin' ye'll always have. An' now will yez put
them things in my ears? It's heaven's own angels I'd like to be hearin'
agin. That's the lad--ah!"

And while the beatific expression stole once more over his blind old
face the boys stole silently out.




CHAPTER X

THE ESCAPED CONVICT


The boys saw a good deal of Adam McNulty in the days that followed, and
the change in the old man was nothing short of miraculous.

He no longer sat in the bare kitchen rocking and smoking his pipe,
dependent upon some passer-by for his sole amusement. He had radio now,
and under the instruction of the boys he had become quite expert in
managing the apparatus. Although he had no eyes, his fingers were
extraordinarily sensitive and they soon learned to handle the set
intelligently.

His daughter Maggie, whose gratitude to the boys knew no bounds, looked
up the radio program in the paper each day and carefully instructed her
father as to just when the news reports were given out, the story
reading, concerts, and so forth.

And so the old blind man lived in a new world--or rather, the old world
which he had ceased to live in when he became blind--and he seemed
actually to grow younger day by day. For radio had become his eyes.

Doctor Dale heard of this act of kindness on the part of the boys and he
was warm in his praise.

"Radio," he told the boys one day when he met them on the street, "is a
wonderful thing for those of us that can see, but for the blind it is a
miracle. You boys have done an admirable thing in your kindness to Adam
McNulty, and I hope that, not only individuals, but the government
itself will see the possibilities of so great a charity and follow your
example."

The boys glowed with pride at the doctor's praise, and then and there
made the resolve that whenever they came across a blind person that
person should immediately possess a radio set if it lay within their
power to give it to him.

On this particular day when so many things happened the boys were
walking down Main Street, talking as usual of their sets and the
marvelous progress of radio.

Although it was still early spring, the air was as warm almost as it
would be two months later. There was a smell of damp earth and pushing
grass in the air, and the boys, sniffing hungrily, longed suddenly for
the freedom of the open country.

"Buck and his bunch have it all their own way," said Herb discontentedly.
"I wouldn't mind being up in a lumber camp myself just now."

"Too early for the country yet," said Jimmy philosophically. "Probably
be below zero to-morrow."

"What you thinking about, Bob?" asked Joe, noticing that his chum had
been quiet for some time.

"I was thinking," said Bob, coming out of his reverie, "of the
difference there has been in generators since the early days of
Marconi's spark coil. First we had the spark transmitters and then we
graduated to transformers----"

"And they still gave us the spark," added Joe, taking up the theme.
"Then came the rotary spark gap and later the Goldsmith generator----"

"And then," Jimmy continued cheerfully, "the Goldsmith generator was
knocked into a cocked hat by the Alexanderson generator."

"They'll have an improvement on that before long, too," prophesied Herb.

"They have already," Bob took him up quickly. "Don't you remember what
Doctor Dale told us of the new power vacuum tube where one tube can take
care of fifty K. W.?"

"Gee," breathed Herb admiringly, "I'll say that's some energy."

"Those same vacuum tubes are being built right now," went on Bob
enthusiastically. "They are made of quartz and are much cheaper than the
alternators we're using now."

"They are small too, compared to our present-day generators," added Joe.

"You bet!" agreed Bob, adding, as his eyes narrowed dreamily: "All the
apparatus seems to be growing smaller these days, anyway. I bet before
we fellows are twenty years older, engineers will have done away
altogether with large power plants and cumbersome machinery."

"I read the other day," said Joe, "that before long all the apparatus
needed, even for transatlantic stations, can be contained in a small
room about twenty-five feet by twenty-five."

"But what shall we do for power?" protested Herb. "We'll always have to
have generators."

"There isn't any such word as 'always' in radio," returned Bob. "I
shouldn't wonder if in the next twenty or thirty years we shall be able,
by means of appliances like this new power vacuum tube, to get our power
from the ordinary lighting circuit."

"And that would do away entirely with generators," added Joe
triumphantly.

"Well, I wouldn't say anything was impossible," said Herb doubtfully.
"But that seems to me like a pretty large order."

"It is a large order," agreed Bob, adding with conviction: "But it isn't
too large for radio to fill."

"Speaking of lodging all apparatus in one fair-sized room," Joe went on.
"I don't see why that can't really be done in a few years. Why, they say
that this new power vacuum tube which handles fifty K. W. is not any
larger than a desk drawer."

"I see the day of the vest-pocket radio set coming nearer and nearer,
according to you fellows," announced Herb. "Pretty soon we'll be getting
our apparatus so small we'll need a microscope to see it."

"Laugh if you want to," said Bob. "But I bet in the next few years we're
going to see greater things done in radio than have been accomplished
yet."

"And that's saying something!" exclaimed Joe, with a laugh.

"I guess," said Jimmy thoughtfully, "that there have been more changes
in a short time in radio than in any other science."

"I should say so!" Herb took him up. "Look at telephone and telegraph
and electric lighting systems. There have been changes in them, of
course, but beside the rapid-fire changes of radio, they seem to have
been standing still."

"There haven't been any changes to speak of in the electric lighting
systems for the last fifteen years or more," said Bob. "And the
telephone has stayed just about the same, too."

"There's no doubt about it," said Joe. "Radio has got 'em all beat as
far as a field for experiment is concerned. Say," he added fervently,
"aren't you glad you weren't born a hundred years ago?"

The boys stopped in at Adam McNulty's cabin to see how the old fellow
was getting along. They found him in the best of spirits and, after
"listening in" with him for a while and laughing at some of his Irish
jokes, they started toward home.

"I wish," said Bob, "that we could have gotten a line on Dan Cassey. It
seems strange that we haven't been able to pick up some real clue in all
this time."

For, although the boys had caught several other mysterious messages
uttered in the stuttering voice of Dan Cassey, they had not been able to
make head nor tail of them. The lads liked mysteries, but they liked
them chiefly for the fun of solving them. And they seemed no nearer to
solving this one than they had been in the beginning.

"I know it's a fool idea," said Herb sheepishly. "But since we were the
ones that got Cassey his jail sentence before, I kind of feel as if we
were responsible for him."

"It's pretty lucky for us we're not," remarked Joe. "We certainly would
be up against it."

On and on the boys went. Presently Joe began to whistle and all joined
in until suddenly Jimmy uttered a cry and went down on his face.

"Hello, what's wrong?" questioned Bob, leaping to his chum's side.

"Tripped on a tree root," growled Doughnuts, rising slowly. "Gosh! what
a spill I had."

"Better look where you are going," suggested Herb.

"I don't see why they can't chop off some of these roots, so it's better
walking."

"All right--you come down and do the chopping," returned Joe, lightly.

"Not much! The folks that own the woods can do that."

"Don't find fault, Jimmy. Remember, some of these very roots have
furnished us with shinny sticks."

"Well, not the one I tripped over."

It was some time later that the boys noticed that they had tramped
further than they had intended. They were on the very outskirts of the
town, and before them the heavily-wooded region stretched invitingly.

Jimmy, who, on account of his plumpness, was not as good a hiker as the
other boys, was for turning back, but the other three wanted to go on.
And, being three against one, Jimmy had not the shadow of a chance of
getting his own way.

It was cool in the shadows of the woods, and the boys were reminded that
it was still early in the season. It was good to be in the woods, just
the same, and they tramped on for a long way before they finally decided
it was time to turn back.

They were just about to turn around when voices on the path ahead of
them made them hesitate. As they paused three men came into full view,
and the boys stood, staring.

Two of the men they had never seen before, but the other they knew well.
It was the man whose voice they had been trailing all these weeks--Dan
Cassey, the stutterer!




CHAPTER XI

DOWN THE TRAP DOOR


It seemed that in the semi-darkness of the woods Cassey did not at once
recognize the radio boys. He was talking excitedly to his companions in
his stuttering tongue and he was almost upon the boys before he realized
who they were.

He stopped still, eyes and mouth wide open. Then, with a stuttered
imprecation, he turned and fled. The men with him stayed not to
question, but darted furtively into the woods.

"Come on, fellows!" cried Bob, with a whoop of delight. "Here's where we
nail Dan Cassey, sure."

The boys, except poor Jimmy, were unusually fleet, and they soon
overtook Cassey. Bob's hand was almost upon him when the man doubled
suddenly in his tracks and darted off into the thick underbrush.

Bob, with Herb and Joe close at his heels, was after him in a minute. He
reached a clearing just in time to see Cassey dash into an old barn
which had been hidden by the trees.

The boys plunged into the barn with Jimmy pantingly bringing up the
rear. In Bob's heart was a wild exultation. They had Cassey cornered.
Once more they would bring this criminal to justice.

"You guard the door," he called in a low tone to Joe. "See that Cassey
doesn't get out that way, and Herb and I will get after him in here."

The barn was so dark that they could hardly see to move around. There
was a window high up in the side wall, but this was so covered with dirt
and cobwebs that it was almost as though there was none.

However, Cassey must be lurking in one of those dark corners, and if
they moved carefully they were sure to capture him!

There was a loft to the barn, but if there had been a ladder leading up
to it it had long since rotted and dropped away, so that Bob was
reasonably sure the man could not be up there.

It was eery business, groping about in the musty darkness of the old
barn for a man who would go to almost any lengths of villainy to keep
from being caught.

Suddenly Bob saw something move, and, with an exultant yell, jumped
toward it. Once more he almost had his hand upon Cassey when--something
happened.

The floor of the barn seemed to open and let him through, and his chums
with him. As he fell through the hole into blackness he had confused
thoughts of an earthquake. Then he struck bottom with a solid thump that
almost made him see stars.

He heard similar thumps about him and realized that Herb and Jimmy had
followed him. Whatever it was they had shot through had evidently
magically closed up again, for they were in absolute darkness.

"Well," came in a voice which Bob recognized as Jimmy's, "I must say,
this is a nice note!"

"We've been pushed off the end of the world, I guess," said Herb, with a
sorry attempt at humor. "Who all's in this party anyway? Are we all
here?"

"I guess so," said Joe, and at the sound of his voice Bob jumped.

"What are you doing here?" he asked. "I thought you were going to guard
the door."

"That's what I should have done, but I played the big idiot," retorted
Joe bitterly. "I couldn't resist coming after you fellows to be in on
the big fight. I suppose while I was trailing you boys somebody sneaked
in the door and signed our finish."

"Looks like it," said Bob, feeling himself to make sure there were no
bones broken. "And now, instead of delivering Cassey to justice we're
prisoners ourselves. Say, I bet the old boy isn't laughing at us or
anything just now."

"I'm awful sorry, Bob," said Joe penitently. "I thought if I kept my eye
on the door----"

"Oh, it's all right," said Bob generously. "Accidents will happen and
there's no use crying over spilled milk. I suppose the most sensible
thing for us to do right now is to hustle around and find a way out of
this place."

"Maybe there isn't any," said Jimmy dolefully. "Then what'll we do?"

"Stay here and let the rats eat us, I guess," said Herb cheerfully, and
Jimmy groaned.

"Gosh, don't talk about eating, old boy," he pleaded. "I'm just about
starved this minute."

"You'll probably stay starved for some little time longer," said Bob
unfeelingly. He had risen cautiously to his feet, and finding that their
prison was at least high enough for them to stand up in, reached his
hands tentatively above his head.

As, even by standing on tiptoe, his fingers encountered nothing but air,
he decided that they must have dropped further than he had thought at
the time.

A hand reached out and took hold of him and he realized that Joe was
standing beside him.

"Must have been some sort of trap door opening inward, I guess," said
the latter. "You didn't see anything, did you, Bob?"

"No. It happened too suddenly. One minute I was reaching forward to grab
hold of Cassey and the next moment I found myself flying through space."

"Humph," grunted Joe. "It was lucky for Cassey that we all happened to
be in a bunch," he said. "He couldn't have gotten rid of us so quickly
if we'd been scattered about----"

"As we should have been," added Bob. "Just the same," he added, after a
minute, "I don't suppose it would have done any good if one of us had
been left up there. It must have been the men who were with Cassey who
sprang the trap on us; and if that's so, the fight would have been three
to one."

"I'd like to have tried it just the same," said Joe belligerently. "I
bet Cassey would have got a black eye out of it, anyway."

For some time they groped around the black hole of their prison, hoping
to find some way of escape, but without success. They were beginning to
get tired and discouraged, and they sat down on the floor to talk the
situation over.

The queer thing about this hole in the ground was that it possessed a
flooring where one would have expected to find merely packed-down dirt.
The flooring consisted of rough boards laid side by side, and when the
boys moved upon it it sounded like the rattling of some rickety old
bridge.

"There's some mystery about this place," said Bob. "I bet this is a
regular meeting place for Cassey and whoever his confederates may be. In
case of pursuit all they would have to do would be to hide in this hole
and they'd be practically safe from discovery."

"I wonder," said Herb, "why Cassey didn't do that now."

"Probably didn't have time," said Bob. "I was right on his heels, you
know, and probably he didn't dare stop for anything."

"And so they turned the trick on us," said Joe. "And it sure was a neat
job."

"Too neat, if we don't get out of here soon," groaned Jimmy. "I bet
they've just left us here to starve!"

"I wouldn't put it beyond Cassey," said Herb gloomily. "It would be just
the kind of thing he'd love to do. He's got a grudge against us, anyway,
for doing him out of Miss Berwick's money and landing him in jail, and
this would be a fine way to get even."

"Well, if that's his game, he's got another guess coming," said Bob,
adding excitedly: "Say, fellows, if that was a trap door that let us
down into this hole, and it must have been something of that sort, we'll
probably be able to get out the same way."

"But it's above our heads," protested Herb.

"What difference does that make?" returned Bob impatiently. "One of us
can stand on the other's back, and we can haul the last fellow out by
his hands."

"Simple when you say it quick," said Joe gloomily. "But I bet that trap
door is bolted on the outside. You don't think Cassey's going to let us
off that easy, do you?"

"Well, we could see anyway," returned Bob. "Anything's better than just
sitting here. Come on, let's find that trap door."

This feat, in itself, was no easy one. They had wandered about in the
dark so much that they had become completely confused.

Since Herb was the slightest, he was hoisted up on Bob's shoulders and
they began the stumbling tour of their prison. It seemed ages before
Herb's glad cry announced a discovery of some sort.

"I've found a handle," he said. "Steady there, Bob, till I give it a
pull."




CHAPTER XII

GROPING IN DARKNESS


Herb tugged gently and gave another yell of delight when whatever was
attached to the handle yielded grudgingly to the pull.

"It's the trap door, fellows!" he cried. "Move over a bit, Bob, till I
pull the thing down."

Bob, who, about this time, was finding Herb's weight not any too
comfortable, moved over, and, in doing so, stumbled, nearly pitching
himself and Herb to the floor.

As it was, Herb lost his balance and leaped wildly. He landed on his
feet and reached out a hand to find Bob.

"Of all the tough luck," he groaned. "There I had the thing in my hand
and now we've gone and lost it again."

"Sorry. But stop your groaning and get busy," Bob commanded him. "I
haven't moved from this spot, so if you get up on my shoulders again you
ought to be able to get hold of the handle easily enough."

So, hoisted and pushed by Joe and Jimmy, Herb finally regained his perch
and felt for the handle. He found it, and this time pulled the door so
far open that the boys could see through the opening in the barn floor.

"If somebody can hold that door," panted Herb, "I think I can get
through this hole. Grab hold, boy. It sure is heavy."

So Joe caught the door as it swung downward and Herb scrambled through
the aperture. Bob gave a grunt of relief as the weight was taken from
his shoulders.

"You're next, Joe," Bob was saying when Jimmy came stumbling up,
carrying something that banged against Bob's legs.

"I've got it," he panted. "Had an idea I might find something like it.
Trust your Uncle Jimmy----"

"For the love of butter, what are you raving about?" interrupted Joe,
and Jimmy proudly exhibited his prize.

"A soap box," he said. "And a good big one, too. If we stand on that we
can reach the opening easily."

"Good for you, Doughnuts," cried Bob, joyfully seizing upon the soap
box. "This beats playing the human footstool all hollow. Jump up on it,
Jimmy, and see how quick you can get out of here."

Jimmy needed no second invitation. He scrambled up on the tall box, and
by stretching up on tip toe could just manage to get his fingers over
the edge of the flooring above.

"Give me a boost, some one," he commanded, and Bob obligingly
administered the boost.

Joe was next. Bob went last, holding the trap door with his foot to keep
it from closing too quickly. Once upon the floor of the barn he took his
foot away and the door banged to with a snap, being balanced by a rope
and weight above.

"Well, there's that!" exclaimed Bob, eyeing the closed door with
satisfaction. "If Cassey thought he was going to fool us long, he sure
was mistaken."

"Maybe he's hiding around here somewhere," suggested Herb, lowering his
voice to a whisper.

"No such luck," replied Bob. "I'd be willing to wager that the moment we
struck bottom there, Cassey and his friends beat it away from here as
fast as their legs could take them."

"Don't you think we'd better look around a little bit, anyway?"
suggested Joe.

"It wouldn't do any harm," agreed Bob. "But first let's have a look
outside. We don't want to overlook any clues."

The boys thrashed around the bushes about the barn until they were
satisfied no one was hiding there and then returned to the barn. They
were curious to find out just how they had been shot through that trap
door.

They thought at first that it was perhaps worked by some sort of
apparatus, but they found that this was not the case. They found by
experimenting that the trap door yielded easily to their weight, and
decided that it had been their combined rush upon Cassey that had done
the trick. The weight of the four of them upon it had shot the door down
so rapidly that they had not had time even to know what was happening to
them, much less scramble to safety. Then it had shut on them.

"It couldn't have worked better for them," said Herb, as they turned
toward the door of the barn. "I bet they're laughing yet at the way they
put things over."

"Let 'em laugh," said Bob, adding fiercely: "But I bet you anything that
the last laugh will be ours!"

"I wonder what Cassey was doing here, anyway," said Jimmy, as they
walked slowly homeward. "It was lucky, wasn't it, that we happened along
when we did?"

"I don't see where it's so lucky," grumbled Joe. "We're no nearer
catching him now than we ever were."

"Except that we know he's around this locality," put in Bob. "I guess
the police will be glad to know that."

"Oh! are you going to tell the police?" asked Jimmy, whose thoughts had
been upon what he was going to get for dinner.

"Of course," said Bob. "He's an escaped criminal, and it's up to us to
tell the police all we know about him."

"I only wish we knew more to tell," said Joe disconsolately.

Since they had been flung through the trap door, Joe had called himself
every unpleasant name he could think of for his carelessness. If he had
stayed at the door where he belonged, there would have been one of them
left to grapple with Dan Cassey. Probably the two men who had been with
Cassey when they had surprised him had not been anywhere around. They
belonged to the type of criminal that always thinks of its own safety
first. Probably they had not been anywhere near the barn. And if it had
been only Dan Cassey and himself, well, he, Joe, could at least have
given the scoundrel a black eye--maybe captured him.

He said something of this to his chums, but they laughed at him.

"Stop your grouching," said Bob. "Haven't we already agreed that there's
no use crying over spilled milk? And, anyway, you just watch out. We'll
get Cassey yet."

As soon as the boys reached town they went straight to the police
station and told the story of their encounter with Cassey to the
grizzled old chief, who nodded his head grimly and thanked them for the
information.

"I'll send some men out right away," he told them. "If there's a
criminal in those woods, they're sure to get him before dark. It's too
bad you lads couldn't have got him yourselves. It would sure have been a
feather in your caps!"

"Why doesn't he rub it in?" grumbled Joe, as they turned at last toward
home and dinner. "He ought to know we feel mad enough about it."

"Well," said Bob, "if the police round him up, because of our
information, it will be almost as good as though we'd caught him
ourselves. I wouldn't," he added, with a glint in his eye, "exactly like
to be in Cassey's shoes, now."




CHAPTER XIII

CUNNING SCOUNDRELS


But, contrary to the expectations of the radio boys, the police were not
able to locate Cassey nor any of the rest of the gang. They searched the
woods for miles around the old barn about which the boys had told them,
even carrying their search into the neighboring townships, but without
any result. It seemed as though the earth had opened and swallowed up
Cassey together with his rascally companions. If such a thing had
actually happened, their disappearance could not have been more
complete.

"They must be experts in the art of hiding," grumbled Bob, upon
returning from a visit to the chief of police. "I was certain they would
be rounded up before this."

"Guess they must have made a break for the tall timber," said Joe.

"Decided, maybe, it isn't just healthy around here," added Herb, with a
grin.

And then, just when they had decided that Cassey and his gang had made a
masterly getaway, the radio boys got on their trail once again.

That very evening, when tuning in for the concert, they caught another
of those mysterious, stuttering messages in the unmistakable voice of
Dan Cassey!

"Rice, rats, make hay," was the substance of this message, and the boys
would have laughed if they had not been so dumbfounded.

"What do you know about that?" gasped Jimmy. "That old boy sure has his
nerve with him."

"They're still hanging around here somewhere!" cried Bob excitedly.
"They've probably got a hiding place that even the police can't find."

"Oh, if we could only make sense of this!" exclaimed Herb, staring at
the apparently senseless message which he had written down. "If we only
had their code the whole thing would be simple."

"Oh, yes, if we only had a million dollars, we'd be millionaires!"
retorted Jimmy scornfully. "Where do you get that stuff, anyway?"

"Well," said Bob, temporarily giving up the problem, "as far as I can
see, all there is for us to do is to keep our eyes and ears open and
trust to luck. Now what do you say we listen in on the concert for a
little while?"

In the days that followed Cassey's voice came to them several times out
of the ether, and always in that same cryptic form that, try as they
would, they could not make out.

It was exasperating, that familiar voice coming to them out of the air
day after day without giving them the slightest clue to the whereabouts
of the speaker.

And then, while they were in town one day, they quite unexpectedly ran
into their old friend, Frank Brandon, the wireless inspector, whose work
for some time had taken him into another district.

However, he was to stay in Clintonia for a few days on business now, and
since he had nothing particular to do that day, Bob enthusiastically
invited him up to his home for a visit.

"Maybe you can give us some tips on our set," Bob added, as Mr. Brandon
readily accepted the invitation. "We're not altogether satisfied with
our batteries. For some reason or other they burn out too quickly."

"Yes, I'll take a look at it," agreed Mr. Brandon good-naturedly.
"Although I imagine you boys are such experts by this time I can't tell
you very much. What have you been doing with yourselves since we last
met?"

The boys told him something of their experiences, in which he showed
intense interest, and in return he told them some interesting things
that had happened to him.

And when he spoke of catching mysterious messages in the stuttering
voice of Dan Cassey, Bob broke in upon him eagerly.

"We've caught a good many such messages too," he said. "Have you managed
to make anything of them?"

"Not a thing," said Mr. Brandon, shaking his head. "If it is a criminal
code, and I am about assured that it is, then it is a remarkably clever
one and one that it is almost impossible to decipher without a key. I've
just about given up trying."

Then the boys told of their encounter with Cassey in the woods and their
adventure in the old barn, and Frank Brandon was immensely excited.

"By Jove," he said, "the man is up to his old tricks again! I'd like to
get hold of him before he does any serious harm. That sort of criminal
is a menace to the community.

"The funny part of it," he continued, as they turned the corner into
Bob's block, "is that these messages are not all in Cassey's voice. Have
you noticed that?"

It was the boys' turn to be surprised.

"That's a new one on us," Bob confessed. "The only messages we have
caught so far have been in Cassey's voice."

Frank Brandon slowly shook his head.

"No," he said, "I have caught a couple in a strange voice, a voice I
never heard before."

"The same kind of message?" asked Herb eagerly.

"The same kind of message," Brandon affirmed. "I have taken it for
granted that the owner of the strange voice is a confederate of
Cassey's."

"Maybe one of the fellows who was with him in the woods," said Jimmy,
and Mr. Brandon nodded gravely.

"It's possible," he said. "I don't know, of course, but I imagine that
there are several in Cassey's gang."

By this time they had reached Bob's home, and as it was nearly lunch
time, Mrs. Layton insisted that they all stay to lunch. The boys, not
liking to make her trouble, said they would go home and come back later,
but the lady of the house would have none of it.

"Sit down, all of you," she commanded, in her cheerful, hospitable way.
"I know you're starved--all but Jimmy--" this last with a smile, "and
there's plenty to eat."

Frank Brandon was very entertaining all during the meal and kept them in
gales of laughter. Mrs. Layton found him as amusing as did the boys.

At last the lunch came to an end and Mr. Brandon professed himself ready
to talk shop.

He was enthusiastic over the radio set the boys showed him and declared
that he could see very little improvement to suggest.

"You surely have kept up with the march," he said admiringly. "You have
pretty nearly all the latest appliances, haven't you? Good work, boys.
Keep it up and you'll be experts in earnest."

"If we could only find some way to lengthen the life of our storage
batteries," said Bob, not without a pardonable touch of pride, "we
wouldn't have much to complain about. But that battery does puzzle us."

"Keep your battery filled with water and see if it doesn't last you
about twice as long," suggested the radio expert. "Don't add any acid to
your battery, for it's only the water that evaporates."

"Will that really do the trick?" asked Joe, wondering. "I don't just see
how----"

"It does just the same," Brandon interrupted confidently. "All you have
to do is to try it to find out. Don't use ordinary water though. It
needs to be distilled."

"That's a new one on me, all right," said Bob, adding gratefully: "But
we're obliged for the information. If distilled water will lengthen the
life of our battery, then distilled water it shall have."

"It seems queer," said Mr. Brandon reflectively, "how apparently simple
things will work immense improvement. Marconi, for instance, by merely
shortening his wave length, is discovering wonderful things. We cannot
even begin to calculate what marvelous things are in store for us when
we begin to send out radio waves of a few centimeters, perhaps less. We
have not yet explored the low wave lengths, and when we do I believe we
are in for some great surprises."

"Go on," said Joe, as he paused. "Tell us more about these low wave
lengths."




CHAPTER XIV

A DARING HOLDUP


Frank Brandon shook his head and smiled.

"I'm afraid I don't know much more to tell," he said. "As I have said,
what will happen when we materially decrease the wave length, is still
in the land of conjecture. But I tell you," he added, with sudden
enthusiasm, "I'm mighty glad to be living in this good old age. What we
have already seen accomplished is nothing to what we are going to see.
Why," he added, "some scientists, Steinmetz, for instance, are even
beginning to claim that ether isn't the real medium for the propagation
of radio waves."

"What do you mean by that?" asked Bob, with interest. "Is it some sort
of joke?"

"Joke, nothing!" replied Frank Brandon. "As a matter of fact, I fully
believe that electro-magnetic waves can as easily be hurled through a
void as through ether."

The boys were silent for a moment, thinking this over. It sounded
revolutionary, but they had great respect for Frank Brandon's judgment.

"There's the Rogers underground aerial," Bob suggested tentatively, and
Brandon took him up quickly.

"Exactly!" he said. "That leans in the direction of what I say. Why, I
believe the day is coming--and it isn't so very far in the future,
either--when no aerial will be used.

"Why, I believe," he added, becoming more and more enthusiastic as he
continued, "that ten years from now we shall simply attach our receiving
outfits to the ground and shall be able to receive even more
satisfactorily than we do to-day." He laughed and added lightly:

"But who am I to assume the rôle of prophet? Perhaps, like a good many
prophets, I see too much in the future that never will come true."

"I don't believe it," said Bob. "I shouldn't wonder if all your prophesy
will come true in a few years."

"Well," said Herb, with a grin, "it will be a relief not to get any more
broken shins putting up aerials."

Mr. Brandon laughed.

"I'm with you," he said. "I've been there myself."

"Have you read about that radio-controlled tank?" Joe asked. "The one
that was exhibited in Dayton, I mean?"

"I not only read about it, I saw it," Mr. Brandon answered, and the boys
stared at him in surprise. "I happened to be there on business," he
said; "and you can better believe I was on hand when they rolled that
tank through the traffic."

"What did it look like?" asked Jimmy eagerly.

"The car was about eight feet long and three feet high," responded
Brandon. "It was furnished with a motor and storage batteries, and I
guess its speed was about five or six miles an hour."

"And was it really controlled by radio?" put in Herb, wishing that he
had been on the spot.

"Absolutely," returned Brandon. "An automobile followed along behind it
and controlled it entirely by wireless signals. The apparatus that does
all the work is called the selector, and it's only about the size of a
saucer. It decodes the dots and dashes and obeys the command in an
inconceivably short time--about a quarter of a second."

"It can be controlled by an airplane, too, can't it?" asked Bob, and the
radio inspector nodded.

"In case of war," he said slowly, "I imagine these airplane-controlled
tanks could do considerable damage."

Their guest left soon after that, and, of course, the boys were sorry to
have him go. His last words to them were about Cassey.

"Keep your eyes open for that scoundrel," he said, "and we'll find out
what he's up to yet."

But in the next few days so many alarming things happened that the boys
had little time to think about Dan Cassey. The alarming happenings
consisted of a series of automobile robberies in neighboring towns,
robberies committed so skillfully that no hint nor clue was given of the
identity of the robbers.

And then the robberies came nearer home, even into Clintonia itself. The
president of one of the banks left his machine outside the bank for half
an hour, and when he came out again it was gone. No one could remember
seeing any suspicious characters around.

Then Raymond Johnston, a prominent business man of the town, had his car
taken in the same mysterious manner from in front of his home. As
before, no one could give the slightest clue as to the identity of the
thieves.

The entire community was aroused and the police were active, and yet the
mystery remained as dark as ever.

Then, one day, Herb came dashing over to Bob's home in a state of wild
excitement. Joe and Jimmy were already there, and Herb stopped not even
for a greeting before he sprang his news.

"Say, fellows!" he cried, sprawling in a chair and panting after his
run, "it's time somebody caught those auto thieves. They are getting a
little too personal."

"What's up?" they demanded.

"One of dad's trucks has been held up!" gasped Herb. "In broad daylight,
too!"

"Was anything taken?" asked Joe.

"Anything? Well, I should say! They looted the truck of everything. It's
a wonder they didn't steal the machinery."

"That's a pretty big loss for your dad, isn't it?" said Bob gravely.

"It is!" replied Herb, running his fingers through his hair. "He's all
cut up about it and vows he'll catch the ruffians. Though he'll have to
be a pretty clever man if he does, I'll say."

"They do seem to be pretty slick," agreed Bob.

"I wonder if the same gang is responsible for all the robberies," put in
Joe.

"It looks that way," said Jimmy. "It looks as if there were a crook at
the head of the bunch who has pretty good brains."

"A regular master criminal, Doughnuts?" gibed Herb, then sobered again
as he thought of his father's loss.

"It's bad enough," he said gloomily, "to hear of other people's property
being stolen, but when it comes right down to your own family, it's
getting a little too close for comfort."

"What is your dad going to do about it?" asked Bob.

Herb shrugged his shoulders in a helpless gesture.

"What can he do?" he asked. "Except what everybody else has done--inform
the police and hope the rascals will be caught. And even if they are
caught," he added, still more gloomily, "it won't do dad much good,
except that he'll get revenge. The crooks will probably have disposed of
all their stolen property before they're caught."

"Well, I don't know," said Bob hopefully. "Those fellows are getting a
little bit too daring for their own good. Some day they'll go too far
and get caught."

"I hope so. But crooks like that are pretty foxy," returned Herb,
refusing to be cheered. "They're apt to get away with murder before
they're caught."

The lads were silent for a moment, trying to think things out, and when
Bob spoke he unconsciously put into words something of what his comrades
were thinking.

"It seems as if radio ought to be able to help out in a case like this,"
he said, with a puzzled frown. "But I must say I don't see how it can."

"It can't," returned Herb. "If some one had been lucky enough to get a
glimpse of one of the thieves, then good old radio would have its
chance. We could wireless the description all over the country and
before long somebody would make a capture."

Bob nodded.

"That's where the cunning of these rascals comes in," he said. "Either
nobody sees them at all, or when they do the thieves are so well
disguised by masks that a useful description isn't possible."

"Were the fellows who held up your father's truck masked?" asked Jimmy
with interest.

Herb nodded.

"From all I can hear," he said. "It was a regular highway robbery
affair--masks, guns, and all complete. The driver of the truck said
there were only two of them, but since they had guns and he was unarmed,
there wasn't anything he could do.

"They made him get down off the truck, and then they bound his hands
behind him and hid him behind some bushes that bordered the road. He
would probably be there yet if he hadn't managed to get the gag out of
his mouth and hail some people passing in an automobile. Poor fellow!"
he added. "Any one might have thought he had robbed the truck from the
way he looked. He was afraid to face dad."

"Well, it wasn't his fault," said Joe. "No man without a weapon is a
match for two armed rascals."

"Didn't he say what the robbers looked like?" insisted Jimmy. "He must
have known whether they were short or tall or fat or skinny."

"He said they were about medium height, both of them," returned Herb.
"He said they were both about the same build--rather thin, if anything.
But their faces were so well covered--the upper part by a mask and the
lower by bandana handkerchiefs--that he couldn't give any description of
them at all."

"I bet," Bob spoke up suddenly, "that whoever is at the head of that
rascally gang knows the danger of radio to him and his plans. That's why
his men are so careful to escape recognition."

The boys stared at him for a minute and then suddenly the full force of
what he intimated struck them.

At the same instant the name of the same man came into their minds--the
name of a man who used radio for the exchange of criminal codes, a man
who stuttered painfully.

"Cassey!" they said together, and Herb added, thoughtfully:

"I wonder!"




CHAPTER XV

OFF TO THE WOODS


For days the town hummed with the excitement that followed the daring
robbery of the truck belonging to Mr. Fennington, but as time passed and
there seemed little prospect of bringing the robbers to justice,
interest died down. But the radio boys never abated their resolve to do
all in their power to recover the stolen merchandise, although at that
time they were kept so busy in high school, preparing for a stiff
examination, that they had little time for anything else.

"It's getting so bad lately that I don't even get time to enjoy my
meals," grumbled Jimmy, one sunny spring afternoon. "Swinging an oar a
la Ben Hur would be just a little restful exercise after the way we've
been drilling the last week."

"Get out!" exclaimed Joe. "Why, you wouldn't last two hours in one of
those galleys, Doughnuts. They'd heave you over the side as excess
baggage once they got wise to you."

"After two hours of rowing in one of those old galleys, he'd be glad to
get heaved overboard, I'll bet," put in Herb, grinning. "I think Jimmy
would rather drown any day than work that hard."

"Huh! I don't see where you fellows get off to criticize," retorted the
harassed youth. "I never saw any of you win gold medals for hard and
earnest work."

"Lots of people deserve medals who never get them," Bob pointed out.

"Yes. But, likewise, lots of people don't deserve 'em who don't get
'em," retorted Jimmy, and for once appeared to have won an argument.

"I guess you're right at that," conceded Bob. "But, anyway, I'm going to
pass those examinations no matter how hard I have to work. It will
pretty near break my heart, but it can't be helped."

The others were equally determined, and they dug into the mysteries of
Horace and Euclid to such good effect that they all passed the
examinations with flying colors. After that came a breathing space, and
just at that time a golden opportunity presented itself.

Mr. Fennington, Herbert's father, had become interested, together with
several other business men of Clintonia, in a timber deal comprising
many acres of almost virgin forest in the northern part of the state. He
was going to look over the ground personally, and when Herb learned of
this, he urged his father to take him and the other radio boys along for
a brief outing over the Easter holiday. When his father seemed extremely
dubious over this plan, Herb reminded him that Mr. Layton had taken them
all to Mountain Pass the previous autumn, and that it would be only fair
to reciprocate.

"But the Lookers are up in that part of the country, too," said Mr.
Fennington. "Aren't you fellows scared to go where Buck Looker is?" he
added, with a smile lurking about his mouth.

"Oh, yes, we're terribly afraid of that!" answered Herb sarcastically.
"We'll take our chances, though, if you'll only let us go with you."

"Well, well, I'll see," said his father, and Herb knew that this was
practically equivalent to surrender. Accordingly he hunted up his chums
and broached the project to them.

"Herb, your words are as welcome as the flowers in May," Bob told him,
with a hearty slap on the back. "If this trip actually works out, we'll
forgive you all last winter's jokes, won't we, fellows?"

"It's an awful lot to ask of a fellow, but I suppose we can manage it,"
said Joe, and Jimmy, after pretending to think the matter over very
seriously, finally said the same.

They were all overjoyed at the prospect of such a trip, and had little
difficulty in getting the consent of their parents. Mr. Fennington
eventually consented to take the radio boys with him, and there ensued
several days of bustle and excited packing. At length all was ready, and
they found themselves, one bright spring morning, installed in a big
seven-passenger touring car _en route_ for Braxton Woods, as the strip
of timberland was called.

"This is the life!" chortled Jimmy, as the miles rolled away behind.
"Fresh air, bright sun, the song of birds, and--doughnuts!" and he
produced a bulging paper bag full of his favorite dainty.

"How do you get that way?" asked Joe severely, although he eyed the bag
hungrily. "The 'song of doughnuts!' You're the only Doughnut that I ever
heard of that could sing, and you're no great shakes at it."

"Oh, you know what I meant!" exclaimed Jimmy. "At least, you're thicker
than usual if you don't."

"Do you hear that, Joe?" laughed Bob. "The boy's telling you that you're
thick. Are you going to stand for that?"

"He knows it's true. And, anyway, he doesn't dare talk back for fear I
won't give him one of these delicious little morsels," said Jimmy
placidly. "How about it, Joe?"

"That's taking mean advantage of a poor fellow who's practically dying
of starvation," said Joe. "Give me a doughnut, and I won't talk
back--until after I've eaten it, anyway."

"That's all right then," said his plump friend. "After you've eaten one,
you'll feel so grateful to me that you'll regret all the low-down things
you've ever said about me."

"Oh, you're the finest pal any fellow ever had," declared Joe. "How many
doughnuts have you left, Jimmy?"

"Something tells me that you don't mean all you say," said Jimmy
suspiciously. "Just the same, I'll take a chance and give you another
one. They won't last long at the rate they're going; I can tell that
without half trying."

"Well, a short life but a merry one," said Bob. "Come across with
another, Jimmy, will you?"

"You know I love you too much to refuse you anything, Bob," said Jimmy.
"Just the same, I'm going to hold out another for myself, and then you
big panhandlers can finish them up. I've just had four, but I suppose
those will have to last me for the present."

"Say, that's tough--only four!" exclaimed Herb, in mock sympathy. "What
will you ever do until lunch time, I wonder?"

"I'm wondering the same thing myself; but I'm used to suffering whenever
I'm with you fellows, so I suppose I'll have to grin and bear it
somehow."

"I don't see why you didn't bring some more, while you were about it,"
complained Bob. "You might have known that wouldn't be half enough."

"It will be a long time before I buy any more for you Indians, you can
bet your last dollar on that," said Jimmy, in an aggrieved voice.
"You've been going to school a number of years, now, but you still don't
know what 'gratitude' means."

"The only one that should be grateful is yourself, Doughnuts," Joe
assured him. "You know if you had eaten that whole bag full of doughnuts
that you'd have been heading a funeral to-morrow or next day. It's lucky
you have us around to save you from yourself."

While Jimmy was still framing an indignant reply to this there was a
loud report, and the driver quickly brought the big car to a halt.

"Blowout," he remarked laconically, walking around to view a shoe that
was flat beyond the possibility of doubt. It was not an unmixed evil to
the boys, however, for they welcomed the chance to get out and stretch
their cramped muscles. They helped the driver jack up the wheel and
change shoes, and in a short time they were ready to proceed.

Back they climbed into their places, and with a rasp of changing gears
they were on their way once more.

Braxton Woods lay something over a hundred miles from Clintonia, but the
roads were good most of the way, and they had planned to reach their
destination that evening. When they had covered sixty miles of the
distance, Mr. Fennington consented to stop for the lunch for which the
boys had been clamoring for some time. They took their time over the
meal, building a fire and cooking steak and frying potatoes.

"Gee, this was a feast fit for a king!" exclaimed Jimmy, when it was
over.

The boys lay down on the newly sprouted grass, but had hardly got
settled when the driver, who appeared restless, summoned them to
proceed.

"We've got a long way to go yet," he said, "and the last fifteen miles
are worse than all the rest of the trip put together. The road is mostly
clay and rocks, and at this time of year it's apt to be pretty wet. I
don't want to have to drive it after dark."

Mr. Fennington was also anxious to get on, so their rest was a brief
one, and they were soon on their way again.

The radio boys laughed and sang, cracked jokes, and waved to passing
cars, while the mileage record on the speedometer mounted steadily up.
The sun was still quite a way above the western horizon when they
reached the place where the forest road branched off from the main
highway. The driver tackled this road cautiously, and they soon found
that his description of it had not been overdrawn. It was a narrow
trail, in most places not wide enough for two cars to pass, and they
wondered what would happen should they meet another car going in the
opposite direction. But in the whole fifteen miles they met only one
other motor, and fortunately that was at a wide place in the road.

The scent of spring and growing things was strong in the air, and
compensated somewhat for the atrocious road. The boys were often tossed
high in the air as the car bumped over logs and stones, or came up with
a lurch out of some deep hole. But they hung on to each other, or
whatever else was most convenient, and little minded the rough going.

After one particularly vicious lunge, however, the heavy car came down
with a slam, and there was a sharp noise of snapping steel. With a
muttered exclamation the driver brought his car to a halt and climbed
out.

"Just as I thought!" he exclaimed. "A spring busted, and the nearest
garage twenty miles away. Now we're up against it for fair!"

"Do you mean that we can't go on?" asked Mr. Fennington anxiously. "It
will be dark in another hour."

"I know it will," replied the chauffeur. "But what can we do about it?"

"Can't we make a temporary repair?" suggested Bob. "We can't have much
further to go now."

"Well, I'm open to suggestions, young fellow," growled the driver. "If
you can tell me how to fix this boiler up, go to it. It's more than I
can do."

Bob and the others made a thorough examination of the damage, and they
were not long in concocting a plan. Bob had brought with him a small but
very keen-edged ax, and it was the work of only a few minutes to cut a
stout limb about six inches in diameter from a tree.

With this, and a coil of heavy rope that was carried in the car for
emergencies, they proceeded to make the temporary repair.




CHAPTER XVI

PUT TO THE TEST


First of all the boys trimmed the branch to a length slightly greater
than the distance between axle and axle of the car. Then, near each end,
they cut a notch about two inches deep, one to fit over the front and
one over the rear axle. Next they placed the branch in position, and
with the heavy rope lashed it securely into position. Thus the front and
rear axles were kept at the proper distance from each other, and,
moreover, the side of the car that was over the broken spring could rest
on the stout pole.

The driver, who at first had watched their efforts with a derisive grin,
took their plan more seriously as he realized the scheme, and now he
examined the completed job with an air of surprised respect.

"I've got to admit that that looks as though it might do the trick," he
admitted, at length. "I've seen a lot of roadside repairs in my time,
but blest if that hasn't got 'em all beat. I'll take it at slow speed
the rest of the way, and we'll see if it will stand up long enough to
get us in."

And get them in it did, in spite of much creaking and groaning and
bumping.

The automobile drew up before a long one-story building, constructed
roughly but substantially of unpainted boards. Supper was being served,
and they were just in time to partake of a typical lumber camp meal. The
big table was laden with huge joints of meat, platters of biscuits and
vegetables, while strong, black coffee was served in abundance. After
this plates of doughnuts were passed around, greatly to Jimmy's delight,
and for once he could eat all he wanted with nobody to criticize, for
the lumbermen were no tyros at this sort of thing, and packed away food
in quantities and at a speed that made the boys gape.

"Gee!" exclaimed Bob, after they had emerged into the balmy spring air
outside, "I used to think that Jimmy could eat; but he can't even make
the qualifying heats with this crowd. You're outclassed, Doughnuts,
beyond the chance of argument."

"I don't see but what I'll have to admit it," sighed his rotund friend.
"But I don't care. It seems like Heaven to be in a place where they
serve doughnuts like that. There's none of this 'do-have-a-doughnut'
business. Some big husky passes you a platter with about a hundred on it
and says, 'dig in, young feller.' Those are what I call sweet sounding
words."

"And you dug, all right," remarked Joe, grinning. "I saw you clean one
platter off all by your lonesome--at least, you came pretty near it," he
qualified, with some last lingering regard for the truth.

"I didn't anything of the kind! But I only wish I could," lamented
Jimmy.

"Never mind, Doughnuts, nobody can deny that you did your best," laughed
Herb. "After you've had a little practice with this crowd, I'll back you
against their champion eater any day."

"So would I," said Bob. "We've often talked about entering Jimmy in a
pie-eating contest, but I never before thought we could find anybody who
would even stand a chance with him. Up here, though, there's some
likely-looking material. Judging from some of those huskies we saw
to-night, they might crowd our champion pretty hard."

"You can enter me any time you want to," said Jimmy. "Even if I didn't
win, I'd have a lot of fun trying. I never really got enough pie at one
time yet, and that would be the chance of a lifetime."

At first the boys were more than half joking, but after they had been at
the camp a few days and had begun to get acquainted, they let drop hints
regarding Jimmy's prowess that aroused the interest of the lumbermen. He
was covertly watched at meal times, and as the bracing woodland air and
long hikes combined to give an added edge to his appetite, his ability
began to command attention. There were several among the woodsmen who
had a reputation for large capacity, but it was soon evident that Jimmy
was not to be easily outdistanced in his own particular department.

At length interest became so keen that it was decided to stage a real
old-fashioned pie-eating contest, to determine whether the champions of
the camp were to be outdistanced by a visitor from the city. The cook
was approached, and agreed to make all the pies that, in all human
probability, would be needed.

"Jimmy, you're in for it now!" exclaimed Herb, dancing ecstatically
about his plump friend. "Here's your chance to make good on all the
claims we've ever advanced for you. You're up against a strong field,
but my confidence in you is unshaken."

"It simply isn't possible that our own Jimmy could lose," grinned Bob.
"I've seen him wade into pies before this, and I know what he can do."

"I appreciate your confidence, believe me," said Jimmy. "But I don't
care much whether I win or not. I know I'll get enough pie for once in
my life, and that's the main thing."

The time for the contest was set for the following evening, the third of
their stay. Five lumbermen had been put forward to uphold the reputation
of the camp, and they and Jimmy ate no supper that night, waiting until
the others had finished. Then the board was cleared, and the cook and
his helper entered, bringing in several dozen big pies of all varieties.
One of these was placed before each of the contestants, and they could
help themselves to as many more as their capacity would admit.

The cook, as having the best knowledge of matters culinary, was
appointed judge, and was provided with a pad and pencil to check up each
contestant. A time limit of two hours was set, the one having consumed
the greatest amount of pie in that time to be declared the winner.

The cook gave the signal to start, and the contest was on.

The lumbermen started off at high speed, and at first wrought tremendous
havoc among the pies, while Jimmy ate in his usual calm and placid
manner, evidently enjoying himself immensely. Each of the lumbermen had
his following, who cheered him on and urged him to fresh endeavors. Bob
and Joe and Herb said little, for they had observed Jimmy's prowess over
a period of several years, and knew his staying qualities.

At the end of the first half hour their friend was badly outdistanced,
but the other contestants had slowed up noticeably, while Jimmy still
ate calmly on, no faster and no slower than when he had started. He was
only starting on his second pie when all the others were finishing
theirs, but the confidence of his three comrades remained unshaken. They
observed that the lumbermen chose their third pies very carefully, and
started to eat them in a languid way. They were only about half through
when Jimmy disposed of his second one, and started on a third.

"How do you feel, Jimmy?" asked Herb, with a grin. "Are you still
hungry?"

"No, not exactly hungry, but it still tastes good," replied Jimmy
calmly. "You sure can make good pies, Cook."

The other contestants essayed feeble grins, but it was easy to see that
their pies no longer tasted good to them. More and more slowly they ate,
while Jimmy kept placidly on, his original gait hardly slackened. He
finished the third pie and started nonchalantly on a fourth. At sight of
this, and his confident bearing, two of the other contestants threw up
their hands and admitted themselves beaten.

"I used to like pie," groaned one, "but now I hope never to see one
again. That youngster must be made of rubber."

"I've often said the same thing myself," chortled Bob. "Just look at
him! I believe he's good for a couple more yet."

Excitement ran high when two of the remaining lumbermen were forced out
toward the middle of their fourth pie, leaving only Jimmy and a jolly
man of large girth, who before the start had been picked by his
companions as the undoubted winner.

"Go to it, Jack!" the lumbermen shouted now. "Don't let the youngster
beat you out. He's pretty near his limit now."

It was true that flaky pie crust and luscious filling had lost their
charm for Jimmy, but his opponent was in even worse plight. He managed
to finish his fourth pie, but when the cook handed him a fifth, the task
proved to be beyond him.

"I've reached my limit, fellers," he declared. "If the youngster can go
pie number five, he'll be champion of the camp."

Excitement ran high as Jimmy slowly finished the last crumbs of his
fourth pie, and the cook handed him a fifth. Would he take it, or would
the contest prove to be a draw?




CHAPTER XVII

THE BULLY GETS A DUCKING


"Our man doesn't have to eat another whole pie," protested Bob. "If he
just eats some of it he'll win, Mr. Judge."

"That's right," nodded the cook. "How about you, young feller? Are you
able to tackle it?"

"Sure thing," responded Jimmy. "Hand it over."

He forced himself to cut and eat a small piece, and when he had
finished, pandemonium broke loose. The judge declared him undisputed
champion of the camp, and he was caught up and elevated to broad
shoulders while an impromptu triumphal procession was organized that
circled the camp with much laughter and many jokes at the expense of the
defeated aspirants for the title.

After this was over, the boys held a little private jubilation of their
own in the little cabin where they were quartered with Mr. Fennington.
He had been away during the contest, but he returned shortly afterward,
and laughingly congratulated Jimmy on his newly won honors.

"How do you feel?" he inquired. "Do you think you could manage another
piece of pie? I'll see that you have a large piece if you think you
can."

"No, sir! I've had enough pie to last me for a good while to come,"
declared Jimmy positively. "I'll be ashamed to look a pie in the face.
For the next week or so I'll have to stick to my favorite doughnuts for
dessert."

"Well, you did nobly, Doughnuts, and I love you more than ever,"
declared Bob. "You were up against a field that anybody might be proud
to beat."

"And the best part of it, to me, is the feeling that our confidence in
Jimmy's eating powers was justified," declared Joe. "After all the
wonderful exhibitions he's given in the past, it would have been
terrible if he hadn't come up to scratch to-night."

"The way that fellow they call Jack started off, I never thought you had
a chance, Jimmy," confessed Herb.

"If he could have held that pace, I wouldn't have had a look-in,"
admitted Jimmy. "I figured he'd have to slow down pretty soon, though.
'Slow but sure' is my motto."

"How would you like to take a nice three-mile sprint now?" asked Herb
mischievously.

"Three mile nothing!" exclaimed Jimmy scornfully. "I couldn't run three
yards right now. I think I'll lie down and give my digestion a chance,"
and in a few minutes he was peacefully snoring.

The next morning he showed no ill effects from the prodigious feast, but
ate his usual hearty breakfast. The others were forced to the conclusion
that his table ability was even greater than they had suspected, and
from that time on they firmly believed him to be invincible in his
particular department.

By this time they were thoroughly familiar with the camp, and decided to
make an excursion into the woods the following day, taking lunch with
them and making it a day's outing. The cook so far departed from his
usual iron-clad rules as to make them up a fine lunch, making due
allowance for Jimmy's proven capacity.

They started out immediately after breakfast. Not being particular as to
direction, they followed the first old logging road that they came to.
It led them deeper and deeper into the forest that was alive with the
sounds and scents of spring. Last year's fallen leaves made a springy
carpet underfoot, while robins sang their spring song in the budding
branches overhead.

For some time the boys tramped in silence, breathing deeply of the
exhilarating pine and balsam atmosphere and at peace with all the world.
Soon there was a glint of water through the trees, and the boys, with
one accord, diverged from the faint trail that they had been following
and were a few minutes later standing at the water's edge.

They found themselves on the shore of a large lake. It was ringed about
with big trees, many of which leaned far out over it as though to gaze
at their reflections in the water. The ripples lapped gently on a
sloping sandy beach, and the invitation to swim proved irresistible to
all but Jimmy.

"I know what lake water is like at this time of year," he said. "You
fellows can go in and freeze yourselves all you like, but I'll stay
right here and look after the things. Just dive right in and enjoy
yourselves."

"Well, we won't coax you," said Bob. "But that water looks too good to
miss. It is pretty cold, but I guess that won't kill us."

Off came their clothes, and with shouts and laughter they splashed
through the shallow water and struck out manfully. The icy water made
them gasp at first, but soon the reaction came, and they thoroughly
enjoyed their swim. They tried to coax Jimmy in, but he lay flat on his
back under a tree and was adamant to all their pleadings.

The others did not stay in very long, but emerged glowing from the
effects of exercise and the cold water. As they were getting into their
clothes they heard voices coming toward them, and they had hardly
finished dressing when the voices' owners came crashing through the
underbrush close to where the boys were standing.

The two groups stared in astonishment for a few moments, for the
newcomers were none other than Carl Lutz, Buck Looker, Terry Mooney, and
another older fellow, who was a stranger to the radio boys.

Buck's expression of surprise quickly gave place to an ugly sneer, and
he turned to his friends.

"Look who's here!" he cried, in a nasty tone. "I wonder what they're up
to now, Carl?"

"We're not hiding from the cops because we broke a plate glass window
and were afraid to own up to it," Bob told him.

"Who broke a window?" demanded Buck. "You can't prove that it wasn't a
snowball that one of your own bunch threw that broke that window."

"We don't throw that kind of snowballs," said Joe.

"What do you mean by that?" asked Buck.

"Are you trying to say that we put stones in our snowballs?"

"I don't have to say it," retorted Joe. "You just said it yourself."

Too late Buck realized his mistake, and his coarse red face grew purple
as Herb and Jimmy grinned at him in maddening fashion.

"Don't you laugh at me, Jimmy Plummer!" he exclaimed, picking on Jimmy
as being the least warlike of the radio boys. "I'll make you laugh out
of the other side of your mouth in a minute," and he started to dash
past Bob to reach his victim.

But to do so he had to pass between Bob and the bank of the lake, which
just at this point was a foot or so above the water.

As he rushed past, Bob adroitly shot out a muscular arm and his elbow
caught the bully fair in the side. Buck staggered, made a wild effort to
regain his balance, and with a prodigious splash disappeared in the icy
waters of the lake.

For a few seconds friend and enemy gazed anxiously at the spot where he
had gone under, but he soon came to the surface, and, sputtering and
fuming, struck out for the shore and dragged himself out on to dry land.

He made such a ludicrous figure that even his cronies could not forbear
laughing, but he turned on them furiously and their laughter suddenly
ceased. Then he turned to Bob.

"If I didn't have these wet clothes on, I'd make you pay for that right
now, Bob Layton," he sputtered. "I'll make you sorry for that before
you're much older."

"Why not settle it right now?" offered Bob. "Your clothes will dry soon
enough, don't worry about that."

"Yes, I know you'd like nothing better than to see me get pneumonia,"
said Buck. "You wait here till I go home and get dry clothes on, and
I'll come and give you the licking that you deserve."

"That's only a bluff, and you know it," said Bob contemptuously. "But if
any of your friends would like to take your place, why, here I am. How
about you, Lutz?"

But Carl muttered something unintelligible, and backed away. The others
likewise seemed discouraged by the mischance to their leader, for they
turned and followed his retreating form without another word.

"Some sports!" commented Joe.

"Game as a mouse," supplemented Herb.

"That was a swell ducking you gave Buck," chuckled Jimmy. "Just when he
was going to pick on me, too. I owe you something for that, Bob."

"Pay me when you get rich and famous," laughed his friend. "You don't
owe me anything, anyway. It was a pleasure to shove Buck into the lake.
I'm perfectly willing to do it again any time I get the chance."

"Oh, it's my turn next time," said Joe. "I can't let you hog all the
fun, Bob."

"All right," replied his friend. "If we run into him again, I'll leave
him to your tender mercies. But I don't imagine he or his friends will
bother us any more to-day, so why not have lunch?"

"I was thinking the same thing," remarked Jimmy, and they forthwith set
to work to prepare what Jimmy termed a "bang-up lunch."




CHAPTER XVIII

A STARTLING DISCOVERY


The cook had supplied the radio boys with a lavish hand, but their long
walk and the swim had given them ravenous appetites, and by the time
they finished there was little left of the lunch. Even this little was
soon disposed of by the bright-eyed birds that ventured close in pursuit
of the tempting bits. By sitting as still as statues the boys succeeded
in enticing the little fellows almost within arm's length, and derived
no little amusement at the evident struggle between greed and caution.

But soon the last crumb was gone, and after a short rest the lads began
to think of returning to camp. They did not want to go back by the same
road over which they had come, however, so decided to follow the shores
of the lake until they should find some other path. This was, of course,
a roundabout way of getting home, but they had the better part of the
afternoon before them, and were in no particular hurry.

"Come on over to the north," suggested Joe. "I think there is another
trail in that direction."

"Yes, and I imagine the walking is better," put in Herb.

"Say, you don't want to go too far out of the way," came hastily from
Jimmy. "We've got to walk back remember."

"Forward it is!" cried Bob. "Come on, Jimmy, you've got to walk off that
big lunch you stowed away."

"Gee, if I walk too far I'll be hungry again before I get home," sighed
the stout youth.

"Wow! hear Jimmy complain," burst out Joe. "He hardly has one meal down
than he's thinking of another."

To find another trail was not as simple a matter as it had seemed, and
they must have traveled over two miles before Bob's keen eyes detected a
slight break in the dry underbrush that might denote a path such as they
sought. They found a dim trail leading in the general direction in which
they wished to go, and set out at a brisk pace, even Jimmy being willing
to hurry as visions of the loaded supper table floated before him.

Gradually the path widened out, as others ran into it, until it became a
fairly well-defined woods road. It was thickly strewn with last year's
soft and rotting leaves, and the boys made little sound in spite of the
rapidity of their pace. Bob and Joe and Herb were striding along in a
group, Jimmy having dropped behind while he fixed a refractory shoe
lace, when suddenly Bob halted abruptly and held up a warning hand. The
others, scenting something amiss, stopped likewise, looking inquiringly
at Bob.

Silently he pointed to a spot slightly ahead of them and several paces
off the road. Even as the others gazed wonderingly, Bob beckoned them to
follow and slipped silently into the brush that lined the road.

On the other side stood a big tree, its trunk and branches sharply
outlined against the clear sky. At the base of this tree, with his back
toward them, stood a man. Now, the surprising part of it all, and that
which had caused the boys to proceed so cautiously, was the fact that
the man wore headphones and was evidently receiving a message of some
kind. Fastened to the tree was a box, which evidently contained
telephonic apparatus. At first the boys thought he must be listening at
an ordinary telephone, but the fact that he had no transmitter indicated
that he was listening in on a radio receiving set.

The boys had hardly reached their place of concealment when the man
turned sharply about, darting furtive glances here and there, evidently
in search of possible intruders. The boys crouched lower behind the
bushes and prayed fervently that Jimmy would not arrive before the man
had gone. The fellow was of fair size, with a deeply tanned face, and
wore a moustache. Fortunately, after they had been watching him a few
minutes, he removed the earphones, placed them in the box, and, after
locking it, started into the woods, following a dimly marked footpath.

It was well that he left when he did, for not two minutes later Jimmy
came puffing along, looking anxiously for the others. He stopped in
amazement when he saw his friends emerge from the bushes, and was about
to raise his voice in vehement questionings when Bob leaped at him and
clapped a hand over his mouth.

"Be quiet!" he hissed into his ear. "There's some funny work going on
here, and we want to find out what it is."

Thus admonished, Jimmy was released, and in low tones the others told
him of what they had seen and showed him the box fastened to the tree.
While they were about it, they made a hasty search for the antenna, and
found it strung close to the trunk of the tree, extending from the top
almost to the roots. After this discovery they hurried after the man
with the moustache, fearful lest they should lose his trail.

It was no easy matter to follow the dimly marked path, for it passed at
times over stony ground and big boulders, where often it took much
searching here and there before they picked up its continuation.

"We may be taking all this trouble for nothing," said Bob, after one of
these searches. "Maybe he's just a lumberman receiving instruction by
wireless from his employers. Big business firms are using radio more and
more for such purposes."

"I didn't like the way he kept looking about him, as though he had
something to conceal," objected Joe. "It can't do any harm to see where
he goes, anyway. We may find out something important."

"His hands weren't those of a lumberman," observed Herb. "Those hands
never saw rough work nor, judging from the man's face and manner, honest
work. Come on, fellows."

Accordingly the boys followed the difficult trail with untiring
patience, and at last their perseverance was rewarded. The path widened
out into a little clearing, and at the further side of this was a rough
log cabin. The little shack had two small windows, and with infinite
caution the boys approached until they could see into the nearest one.

The interior was rudely furnished with a heavy table and two crudely
fashioned chairs, while in the corner furthest from them two bunks had
been built, one above the other. In another corner was a compact radio
transmitting set.

At the table was seated the man with the moustache, intently studying a
notebook propped up before him. From this he made notes on a sheet of
paper, scowling at times like one engaged in a difficult task. At length
he shoved back his chair, rose to his feet, and, striding across the
little shack, carefully placed the notebook under a board on a shelf.
Luckily he was so absorbed in what he was doing that he did not even
glance toward the window where the radio boys were observing his every
motion.

But Bob now judged that they had seen enough, and he wished to run no
unnecessary risk of detection. At a signal from him they made for the
underbrush at the edge of the clearing, where they could command a view
of the door, and waited to see if the mysterious stranger would emerge.

In a few minutes the door opened and the man stepped out, stopping to
fasten it securely behind him. Then, with a quick glance about the
little clearing, he made for the path leading to the main road and in a
short time the sound of his going died away.

The boys waited a few minutes, thinking that possibly he might return
for something forgotten, but no further sound came from the path. At
length they ventured to approach the deserted cabin.

The door had been fastened with a heavy padlock, but this was not
sufficient to deter the radio boys. Searching through their pockets for
some implement with which they could undo the lock, Jimmy discovered a
stout fish-hook, and after they had ground off the barbs against a flat
stone this made an ideal tool. With it Bob probed about in the interior
of the padlock, and at length, with a sharp click, it sprung open.
Ordinarily he would not have done this, but he had every reason to
believe that he was dealing with a criminal and that he was justified in
the interest of law and order in taking steps that would prevent any
further depredations against society.

"More ways than one of killing a cat," remarked Bob, as he pushed open
the heavy door and entered the cabin. "We've got to know what's in that
notebook before we leave this place. Let's have a look."

The boys quickly brought the book from its place of concealment and
carried it to the table, where they bent eagerly over it as Bob turned
the pages.

"It doesn't look like sense to me," complained Jimmy. "I never saw such
a lot of fool words jumbled together."

"Yes, but something tells me there's method in this madness," said Bob,
his brows knit as he concentrated on the problem before him. "Say,
fellows!" he exclaimed, as sudden excitement gripped him, "do you
remember those nights we were listening to our big set and we heard the
mysterious messages? They were just a lot of words, and we couldn't make
anything out of them at the time."

"You bet I remember!" exclaimed Joe. "I think I could even tell you most
of the words. Why, there's some of them in that book, right now!"

"Exactly," replied Bob, nodding. "I remember them, too, and this must be
the key to the code. My stars, what luck! Let's see how close we can
recall the words we caught, and then we'll see if we can make sense of
them with the help of this key."

"I'll tell you the words as I remember them, and you check me up,"
suggested Joe, and this they accordingly did.

Between them they managed to get it straight, just as they had heard it,
"Corn-hay-six-paint-water-slow-sick-jelly."

"I think that's right," said Bob. "Anyway, we'll see if it comes right
with the key. You read the words, Joe, and I'll find them in this
notebook and you can write them down. Shoot the first one."

"Corn," said Joe.

Bob hunted rapidly down the columns of code words and their equivalents,
and soon found the one he was after.

"Motor truck," he read out.

"That sounds promising!" exclaimed Joe. "The next word I've got is
'hay.' What's the answer to that?"

"Silk," said Bob, after a shorter search this time.

"Six," read Joe.

"Castleton Road!" exclaimed Bob, his voice shaking with excitement as he
traced down the columns of words. Herb and Jimmy were also excited;
especially the former, as he realized better than the others how serious
a loss the theft of his father's truckload of silk had been and now
thought he saw some clue in this message that might throw light on the
whereabouts of the stolen goods.




CHAPTER XIX

THE ROBBERS' CODE


"The next word is 'paint,'" said Joe. "What does that stand for, Bob?"

"Just a minute, till I find it," replied his friend, and after turning
over several pages found the word he sought.

"It means 'to-night,'" he said. "Read what we've got so far."

"Motor truck--silk--Castleton Road--to-night," read Joe. "That's clear
enough so far. The next code word is water."

"'No guards,'" said Bob. And so they went, until the completed message
read as follows:

"Motor truck--silk--Castleton Road--to-night--no guards--hold up--take
everything to usual place--notify when job is done."

"That's the message that caused the theft of my father's merchandise!"
exclaimed Herb, jumping to his feet. "If we had only had the key then,
when there was still time, we could have prevented the hold-up."

"Very likely we could," agreed Bob soberly. "But we may be able to do
the next best thing, Herb--get the stuff back again. If we make a copy
of this key and then leave the book just where we found it, the thieves
will never dream that anybody knows their secret, and they'll keep right
on using the same code."

"I see," said Herb slowly. "And then if we hear any more code messages
we can translate them with this key, and likely get on the trail of the
crooks."

"Exactly!" replied Bob. "Now, I have a notebook here, and if one of you
fellows will dictate that code, I'll copy it down and we'll get out of
here while the getting's good. There's no telling what minute some of
the gang will show up."

"I'll dictate," volunteered Joe. "But while you and I are doing that,
Bob, why can't Jimmy and Herb act as lookouts? Then if any of the gang
comes along they can give us warning and we'll clear out."

"That's good advice," agreed Bob, and Herb and Jimmy went outside and up
the path a short distance, where they crouched, listening, with every
muscle tense to warn their comrades if danger threatened.

Meanwhile, in the cabin, Bob's pencil flew at furious speed as Joe
dictated. The code was very complete, and consisted of over two hundred
words, each word, in some cases, standing for a whole phrase. Bob wrote
as he had never written before, but in spite of his utmost efforts it
took over an hour to copy the entire list. He and Joe expected every
minute to hear Herb or Jimmy give the alarm, but the woods remained calm
and peaceful, and they finished their task without interruption.

"There's the last word, Bob!" exclaimed Joe, with a sigh of relief.
"Let's put that little book back on the shelf where we found it, and
make a quick getaway."

"Yes, we've got to make tracks," agreed Bob. "It will be away after dark
now when we get back to the camp. If we don't hurry they will be
organizing searching parties for us."

With great care he placed the notebook back on the shelf, under the
board, and then gazed searchingly around the cabin to make sure that no
signs of their visit were left behind to warn the thieves. After
assuring himself that everything was exactly as they had found it, he
and Joe left the rude habitation, snapping the big padlock through the
hasp.

"That's a swell lock," observed Joe, grinning. "It looks strong enough
to discourage anybody, but Jimmy's fish-hook licked it to a frazzle in
no time."

"That's the way with a lot of padlocks," said Bob, as the two started
off in search of the others. "It would take dynamite to break them open,
but they're easy enough to pick."

"If you know how, that is," supplemented Joe, with a grin.

"Oh, that's understood," replied Bob. "It's hard to do anything without
the know-how."

They soon picked up the two sentinels, who were greatly relieved to see
them.

"I thought you were going to spend the night there," grumbled Jimmy.
"What happened? Did you both fall asleep in the middle of it?"

"You're an ungrateful rascal, Doughnuts," answered Joe. "Here Bob and I
have worked like slaves for the last hour, while all you had to do was
loaf around in the nice fresh air. Then instead of thanking us, you
growl because we took so long."

"Well, don't get sore," protested Jimmy. "I suppose we should all be so
happy over this discovery that we shouldn't mind anything. I'll bet your
father will be tickled to death, Herb."

"I guess he will," agreed Herb. "Although we're still a long way from
getting back the stolen silk. There's no doubt that we've struck a
mighty promising clue, that much is sure."

Bob was about to make some remark when he checked himself and halted in
a listening attitude.

"I think some one is coming!" he exclaimed, in a low tone. "I'm sure I
heard voices. Let's duck into the underbrush, quick!"

They were not a moment too soon, for they had hardly reached a place of
concealment behind a great fallen tree when two men appeared around a
bend in the path. One was the same whom they had followed a few hours
before, while the other was a stranger to them. This man was of a
desperate and unprepossessing appearance, and a bulge under his coat
suggested the possible presence of a weapon.

The boys congratulated themselves that this formidable looking personage
had not arrived half an hour sooner, for they were of course unarmed and
would have been hard put to it had they been caught in the cabin.

They lay snugly hidden in their retreat behind the fallen tree until the
voices of the two men had died away in the direction of the lonely
cabin. Then they returned cautiously to the path and hastened toward the
main road. This they reached without meeting any one else, and set out
for camp at a pace that caused Jimmy to cry for mercy. But the shadows
lay long athwart the path, camp was still an indefinite distance away,
and they hurried the unfortunate youth along at a great rate in spite of
his piteous protests.

"It will be the best thing in the world for you, Doughnuts," said Joe
unfeelingly. "What you need is plenty of exercise to take that fat off
you."

"Besides, think of what a fine appetite you'll have when we reach camp,"
laughed Bob.

"I've got all the appetite now that I know how to have," groaned Jimmy.
"You fellows haven't a heart between you. Where other people keep their
hearts, you've all got chunks of Vermont granite."

"Flash a little speed, and don't talk so much," advised Herb. "Be like
the tramp that the fellow met going down the street one day with an
expensive rug."

"Who wants to be like a tramp?" objected Jimmy.

"You do, when you want to loaf all the time," retorted Herb. "But now
I'll tell you a good joke to make the way seem shorter. Jimmy got me
started, and now I'll have to get it out of my system."

"Is it about a tramp?" asked Jimmy suspiciously.

"Yes. And it's a pippin," Herb assured him. "It seems this tramp was
running down the street with an expensive rug over his shoulder, and
somebody stopped him and began to ask questions.

"'Where did you steal that rug from?' asked the suspicious citizen.

"'I didn't steal it,' answered the tramp, trying to look insulted. 'A
lady in that big house down the street handed it to me and told me to
beat it, and I am.'"

"Say, that's a pretty good joke, for you, Herb," said Bob, laughing with
the others.

"Oh, that's nothing. I've got others just as good," said Herb eagerly.
"Now, here's one that I made up myself the other day, but I forgot to
tell it to you. Why----"

"Suffering tomcats!" exclaimed Joe. "Don't tell us anything that you
made up yourself, Herb! Or, at least, wait until we get back and have
supper, so that we'll be strong enough to stand it."

"That's what I say," agreed Jimmy. "I'm so hungry that I can't think of
anything but supper, anyway. I know your joke is as good as usual, Herb,
but I wouldn't be able to appreciate it just now."

"It's discouraging to a high-class humorist to have to throw away his
choice offerings on a bunch like this," said Herb, in an injured voice.
"Some day, when I am far away, you'll wish you had listened to those
gems of humor."

"I'd like to believe you, but that hardly seems possible," said Bob.
"Can you imagine the day ever coming when we'd actually want to sit down
and listen to Herb's line of humor?"

"My imagination isn't up to anything like that," replied Joe. "But, of
course, you don't really ever have to ask Herb to spill some of those
jokes. The hard thing is to keep him from doing it."

"Oh, all right," retorted Herb. "Only, remember that it is 'easier to
criticize than to create.'"

For some time after this they plodded along hoping to reach camp before
it got entirely dark. Bob was the first to see a distant point of light
through the trees, and he emitted a whoop that startled the others.




CHAPTER XX

ON THE TRAIL


"I can see the lights from the camp!" Bob exclaimed. "Use your eyes,
fellows. A little to the left of us, through the trees."

"Well, it's about time," groaned Jimmy, as they all looked in the
direction indicated. "I was just getting ready to lie down and die
peacefully. I couldn't travel another mile if you paid me for it."

"Oh, buck up, Doughnuts, and get a move on!" exclaimed Bob. "You never
know what you can do until you try. Come on, let's take it on the
double."

He and Joe and Herbert broke into a lively trot, and rather than be left
behind Jimmy overcame his reluctance for further effort, and with much
puffing and blowing and fragmentary complaint managed to hold the pace
until they arrived at the mess house.

Luckily for them, supper had been delayed owing to the failure of some
supplies to arrive on time, and the lumbermen had just started eating
when the radio boys burst in through the door.

The lumbermen stopped eating long enough to welcome their arrival, and
they found their places set as usual.

"Glory be!" exclaimed Jimmy, as he slid into his chair. "If there were a
pie-eating contest on to-night, I could show you fellows some real
class. I feel empty right down to my toes."

"It's lucky we got a head start, Champ," remarked one of the men, with a
grin. "Pass everything down this way, you amateurs. There's a
professional here wants to show us some fancy eating."

By this time Jimmy was too busily occupied to make any answer, and the
other radio boys were also showing good appetites. The long trip and the
excitement of their discovery of the secret code had sharpened their
naturally keen appetites until for once they all felt on equal terms
with the lumbermen. Jimmy surpassed himself, and great was the
admiration expressed for his ability as a trencherman.

After supper the boys sought out Mr. Fennington and told him of their
discovery in the lonely cabin. Then Bob showed him the copy he had made
of the code, and Mr. Fennington studied this a long time with knit
brows.

"There seems little doubt that you boys have unearthed an important
clue, and one that may easily lead to the discovery of the crooks who
stole my merchandise," he said, at length. "I suppose I should put this
information in the hands of the police. And yet perhaps we had better
say nothing until we learn something further. With your radio outfit you
may be able to catch another code message that would give us more
definite information, and then it would be time enough to call in the
police."

"I think that would be the best thing to do, Dad," agreed Herb. "As soon
as we get back home we'll fix it so one of us will be at the set a good
part of every afternoon and evening, and we'll be almost certain to
catch some more messages like the last one."

His father nodded, and was still considering the matter when there came
a knock at the door. Herb crossed over and opened it, and he and his
friends uttered exclamations of astonishment and delight as they
recognized the visitor. He was none other than Frank Brandon, the
government radio inspector.

On his part, he was no less pleased to see them, and they all shook
hands heartily, with many questions and explanations, after which the
radio inspector was introduced to Mr. Fennington.

"I suppose you're all wondering what I'm doing up here," he said, after
the greetings were over.

"Yes, in a way," admitted Bob. "Although we know that your position
calls you all over, and we may expect to meet you almost any old place."

"Yes, that's a fact," replied Brandon. "I'm up here on the same old
business, too. Somewhere in this neighborhood there's an unauthorized
sending station, but in these thick woods it may prove a rather
difficult place to locate exactly. However, it will only be a matter of
time when we nail it."

The boys glanced at one another, and the same thought was in all their
minds. They remembered the radio apparatus they had seen in the lonely
cabin, and had little doubt that this would prove to be the unauthorized
station of which the radio man was in search.

He must have read something of this in their expression, for he looked
searchingly from one to another.

"Looks to me as though you fellows knew something," he remarked. "I
might have known if there was anything going on in the radio line within
fifty miles of where you are that you'd know something about it."

"Well, I've got a hunch that we could lead you right to the place you're
looking for," said Bob quietly.

"What?" shouted Brandon, leaping excitedly to his feet. "Do you really
mean that? Tell me all about it."

For the second time that evening Bob recounted the happenings of their
eventful excursion, while the radio inspector listened intently,
throwing in a question here and there. When Bob had finished he made no
comment for a few minutes.

Then he took the copy of the code and examined it intently, jotting down
phrases here and there in his own notebook.

"Well," he said at length, "this looks to be a much bigger thing than I
had supposed. Of course I heard of the robbery of the motor-truck, but I
never for a moment connected that with this sending station we've been
looking for. It seems fairly evident, though, that if we can lay our
hands on the operators of the unauthorized sending outfit, we'll also
have the perpetrators of that hold-up. This is a case where we'll have
to think out every move before we act."

"Just before you arrived I was considering the advisability of putting
the matter into the hands of the police," said Mr. Fennington. "What
would you do?"

"Keep the whole thing to ourselves for the present," said Mr. Brandon
decisively. "I'll send for a couple of good men to come up here and help
me, and we'll keep a watch on that cabin for a few days. If this thing
got into the papers, it would put the crooks on their guard, and
probably spoil our chances of catching them and getting back the loot.
I've got a small but extremely efficient receiving and sending set in my
car, and if any more code messages are sent out we'll catch them."

His confidence was contagious, and the boys felt almost as though the
capture of the criminals had already been accomplished.

"What puzzles me, though," remarked Mr. Fennington, "is how you knew
that there was an unauthorized radio sending station in this
neighborhood, Mr. Brandon. I should think it would be almost impossible
to locate such a station, even approximately."

"On the contrary," replied Frank Brandon, "it is little more than a
matter of routine. Probably any of these radio fiends here could explain
the method as well as I can, but I'll try to make it plain to you.

"There is a certain type of aerial that has what we call 'directional'
properties, that is, when it is shifted around, the incoming signals
will be loudest when this loop aerial, as it is called, is directly in
line with the sending station. The receiving antenna is wound on a
square frame, and when the signals are received at their maximum
strength, we know that the frame is in a practically straight line with
the sending station we're after."

"Yes, but that still leaves you in the dark as to whether the station is
one mile away or a hundred miles," observed Mr. Fennington, as Brandon
paused.

"That's very true," answered the other. "And for that reason we can't
stop at using just one loop aerial. What we actually do is to have three
stations, each one equipped with a loop. These three stations are
located a good many miles apart. Now, with these three loops, we have
three lines of direction. We lay out these lines on a chart of the
territory, and where they intersect, is the place where the unlicensed
station is located. Is that clear?"

"Perfectly," said Mr. Fennington. "But what looks like a point on the
map may be a large space on the actual territory."

"Oh, yes, our work isn't done by any means after we have got our first
rough bearings," continued Brandon. "Having determined the approximate
position, we take the loops and receivers to what we know is a place
quite near the station we're after, and then we repeat the former
process. This time it is much more accurate. Gradually we draw the net
tighter until we find the antenna belonging to the offender, and
then--well, we make him wish he hadn't tried to fool the government."

"You certainly have it reduced to an exact science," acknowledged Mr.
Fennington. "I don't wonder that everybody interested in radio gets to
be a fanatic."

"We'll make a 'bug' out of you before we get through, Dad," declared
Herb, grinning.

"If my load of silk is recovered through the agency of radio, I'll be
enthusiastic enough over it to suit even you fellows," said his father.
"It will mean the best set that money can buy for you if I get it back."

"We'll hold you to that promise," threatened Herb. "Radio can do
anything," he added, with the conviction of a devotee.

"Well, pretty nearly everything," qualified Mr. Brandon. "A little while
ago it was considered marvelous that we could transmit the voice by
radio, and now the transmission of photographs by radio has been
successfully accomplished."

"What!" exclaimed Mr. Fennington incredulously. "Do you mean to say that
an actual recognizable photograph has been sent through the air by
radio? That seems almost too much to believe."

"Nevertheless, it has been done," insisted Frank Brandon. "I saw the
actual reproduction of one that had been sent from Italy to New York by
the wireless route, and while I can't claim that it was perfect, still
it was as plain as the average newspaper picture. And don't forget that
this is a new phase of the game, and is not past the experimental stage
yet."

"Well, after that, I am inclined to agree with Herbert that 'radio can
do anything,'" admitted Mr. Fennington.

"I don't think we'll have much trouble making a convert of you," laughed
the radio inspector. "No doubt the quickest way, though, will be to
recover your stolen shipment, so we'll start working in that direction
the first thing in the morning."

And in this he was as good as his word. He was up betimes, getting in
touch with headquarters by means of his compact portable outfit. He kept
at work until he had received the promise of two trustworthy men, who
were to report to him at the lumber camp as soon as they could get
there. Then he routed out the radio boys, and after a hasty breakfast
they all set out to locate the cabin where the boys had found the code
key.




CHAPTER XXI

THE GLIMPSE THROUGH THE WINDOW


The sun was just climbing above the treetops when the radio boys and
Frank Brandon set out over the forest road, to the accompaniment of a
full chorus of lusty feathered singers. Robin and starling and thrush
combined to make the dewy morning gladsome, and the boys whistled back
at them and wished Larry Bartlett were there to learn some new notes.

"This would be just his dish," commented Herb. "After he got warmed up,
you wouldn't be able to tell him from the birds."

"The only difference is, that he's better," declared Joe. "If he were
here now, he'd be teaching the dicky birds a new song or two. That boy
is certainly a wonder."

"He's very clever," acknowledged Brandon. "He's getting along
wonderfully well at the broadcasting station, and I understand he's had
several good offers from the big vaudeville circuits."

"Why doesn't he accept one?" questioned Joe.

"He hasn't fully recovered from the effects of the accident yet. And,
besides, he says he likes the radio work better. He can stay in one
place, and cut out all the traveling. That seems to be a strong
consideration with him."

"I don't know that I can blame him," commented Bob. "I should think that
continual jumping around from place to place would get on anybody's
nerves."

"Still, it gives one a fine chance to see the country," argued Frank
Brandon. "If any of you fellows ever get into radio work in a commercial
way, the chances are you won't be able to 'stay put' in one place very
long."

"There's one great advantage about traveling, anyway," said Jimmy.

"What's that, Doughnuts?" queried Joe. "I should think that with your
restful nature you'd rather stay in the same place and grow old and fat
in perfect comfort."

"Oh, that part of it is all right," admitted Jimmy. "But don't forget
that different parts of the country have different kinds of cooking. In
New York the specialty is shore dinners; go a little South, and you get
fried chicken and corn pone cooked by guaranteed southern mammies; go up
North, and you get venison steaks; in the West they'll feed you mutton
chops as big as a plate. And so it goes."

"You've even forgotten some places," laughed Bob. "How about a steaming
dish of beans in Boston?"

"Yes, or frijoles and chile con carne in New Mexico," suggested Herb.

"Cease, cease!" groaned Jimmy. "Why talk about such things when we're
such a long way from them? Every time you mention something new it makes
me feel hungrier."

"Hungrier!" exclaimed Mr. Brandon. "Why, it's hardly half an hour since
we finished breakfast!"

"What has breakfast got to do with it?" demanded the insatiable Jimmy.
"That's past and done with. It's time to think of lunch, now."

"You win," laughed Brandon. "Your capacity will make you famous some
day."

"It's made him famous already--at least, up here," Bob informed the
radio inspector. "Didn't you know that he is the undisputed champion pie
eater of the camp?"

"No, I didn't know that, but it doesn't surprise me in the least to hear
it," said Brandon, with a smile. "How did he gain his laurels?"

Then Bob told him about the contest, and when he had finished Mr.
Brandon laughingly congratulated Jimmy.

"I always had a sneaking idea that you could do it," he admitted. "But
after my experience with lumbermen's appetites, I realize that you must
have been on your mettle all the way."

"It was rather hard at the end," admitted Jimmy, "but take it all
together it was a real pleasure. That cook sure does know how to make
good pies," and an expression of blissful reminiscence spread over his
round countenance.

"He made a regular pig of himself, but we knew he would, and that's why
we had such confidence in him," said Joe.

"Nothing of the kind!" protested Jimmy. "You know you fellows got me
into it in the first place. You fixed it all up, and I only went in as a
favor to you. But I might know better than to expect gratitude from this
bunch."

"You'll find it in the dictionary," Joe informed him. "You ought to be
grateful to us for providing you with a feed like that. It would have
cost you a lot of money to buy all those pies back home."

"I think he came well out of it, at any rate," interposed the radio man.
"But we must now be getting somewhere near that cabin, and we'd better
go as quietly as we can. We know that there are two of the gang hanging
out in it, and there's no telling how many more there may be."

"Not so very near the cabin yet," answered Bob. "Nearer that tree to
which they had the receiving set attached."

Nevertheless, they advanced as silently as possible, keeping a sharp
lookout for any sign of the black-moustached stranger and his friend.
The woods seemed devoid of human presence other than their own, however,
and they saw nothing to arouse suspicion until at length they reached
the tree to which the receiving set was fastened. Frank Brandon examined
this with interest. The box was securely locked, but the radio man drew
a big bunch of various-sized keys from his pocket.

"I want to see what's in this box, but first I think we'd better post
sentries," he said, in a low voice. "Suppose you go back a few hundred
feet the way we came, Jimmy. You go the same distance in the other
direction, Herb. And Joe can go a little way up the path that leads
toward the cabin. You can stay here and help me get this box open, Bob.
If any of you hear some one coming, imitate a robin's note three times,
and then keep out of sight. We don't want the crooks to suspect yet that
anybody is on their trail."

The three radio boys scattered to their appointed posts, and Frank
Brandon proceeded to try key after key in the lock. He had to try fully
a dozen before at last the lock clicked and the door of the box swung
open.

Inside was a complete radio receiving set, with vacuum tube detector and
batteries in perfect working order. Between the roots of the tree an
iron pipe had been driven into the earth to act as a ground. The antenna
was strung from top to bottom of the tree on the side away from the
path, and there was nothing to differentiate the box from an ordinary
wire telephone set, except that it was slightly larger. There were a
number of regular wire telephones scattered throughout the woods, to aid
in fighting forest fires, so that anybody traveling along the path would
have been unlikely to give this outfit more than a passing glance, if
they noticed it at all. Had the radio boys not chanced to see the
black-moustached man listening, with wireless headphones over his ears,
the fact that the box contained a wireless receiving outfit might never
have been discovered.

Brandon and Bob went carefully over every article of the equipment. They
were on the lookout for another notebook such as the boys had found in
the cabin, but there was nothing of the kind in the box. When they were
satisfied of this, Mr. Brandon carefully replaced everything as he had
found it, and snapped the lock shut.

"So much for that!" he exclaimed. "Now, let's get hold of the others and
we'll see what that mysterious cabin looks like."

Joe and Herb and Jimmy were soon recalled from their sentry duty, and
all set out along the path to the cabin. When they got close to the
clearing the three sentries were again posted, while Bob and the
inspector made a detour through the woods so as to approach the cabin on
the side away from the path, where there was little likelihood of those
inside keeping a lookout. Very cautiously they advanced from the
concealment of the woods, Frank Brandon with his right hand on the butt
of a deadly looking automatic pistol. They crept close to the wall of
the cabin, and listened intently for some sign of life within.

That there was at least one man in the cabin, and that he was still
sleeping, soon became evident, for they heard the heavy breathing of one
sound asleep. Mr. Brandon cautiously raised himself as high as the
window, and peered within. From this position he could not see the
sleeper, however, and he and Bob moved silently to the other side of the
shack. From there they commanded a good view of the interior, and could
plainly see the sleeping man, who was the same whom the boys had first
encountered the day before.

His black-moustached face was toward them, and Brandon gave a start of
recognition, while his fingers tightened on his pistol. For a few
moments he stood tense, evidently deciding what to do. Then he beckoned
to Bob to follow, and made for the path where the others anxiously
awaited them.

"I know that man in there!" exclaimed Brandon excitedly. "He is known as
'Black' Donegan, on account of his black hair and moustache. He's wanted
by the police of New York and Chicago, and I guess other cities, too. We
could easily get him now, but if we did, the chances are the rest of the
gang would take alarm, and we'd miss the chance of bagging them and
getting back Mr. Fennington's stolen property. It's hard to say what is
the best thing to do."

But on the instant a plan occurred to Bob, and he lost no time in
communicating it to the others.




CHAPTER XXII

A NEFARIOUS PLOT


"If this fellow in the cabin is such a bad man, we can't afford to risk
losing sight of him," said Bob. "Suppose Joe and Jimmy and I stay here,
while Herb goes back with you, Mr. Brandon. We can stay here until your
two regulars show up, and Herb can then bring them here to relieve us.
How does that strike you?"

"It's a way out of the predicament," answered Frank Brandon, his frown
vanishing. "You fellows are apt to have a long vigil, though. My men
won't get to the camp until this afternoon, and after that it takes
quite a while to reach this place."

"I guess we can stand it," said Bob. "Can't we, fellows?" he asked,
glancing at the others.

Both Joe and Jimmy agreed, although the latter had secret misgivings as
he thought regretfully of the dinner he would miss. However, such
considerations were of little weight just then, and it was finally
decided to adopt Bob's plan.

"I'll leave my pistol with you," said Brandon, as he and Herb prepared
to leave. "But whatever else you do, steer clear of this gang and don't
use firearms unless as a last resort. Remember, that if they once find
out their hiding place is discovered, our whole scheme will be ruined."

The boys promised to exercise the greatest caution, and then Mr. Brandon
and Herb started back toward camp.

Bob, after a brief inspection, dropped the deadly automatic pistol into
his pocket, and then the three friends considered how they might best
keep watch on the cabin without being discovered. First of all, at Joe's
suggestion, they armed themselves with serviceable clubs, that might
come in handy in time of necessity. Then they slipped silently into the
underbrush, and worked their way along until they had attained a
position where they commanded a view of the cabin's only door.

The spot they had chosen was surrounded by dense thickets, and one might
have passed within ten feet without spying them. Bob carefully parted
the bushes and broke off twigs here and there until they could see
plainly enough, and yet were securely hidden from the cabin. This done,
the boys made themselves as comfortable as possible under the
circumstances, and prepared for a long vigil.

They had been in their retreat less than half an hour when the door of
the shack was flung open, and the black-moustached man appeared on the
threshold. He gazed searchingly about the little clearing, then glanced
up at the mounting sun and stretched prodigiously. At length, apparently
satisfied that all was as it should be, he turned back into the cabin,
and soon the aroma of bacon and coffee came floating down the wind to
where the boys lay. Jimmy's nose twitched and his mouth watered, but he
thought of the importance of the mission that had been intrusted to them
by the radio inspector and stifled his longings.

The man in the cabin ate a leisurely breakfast, and apparently was in no
hurry. Indeed, from the way he loitered over the meal, the boys rather
suspected that he was awaiting the arrival of some other members of the
gang. Nor were they mistaken. After a time the lads could hear the sound
of approaching voices, and soon three men entered the clearing and made
for the cabin. At the first sound of their voices, the man inside had
stepped swiftly to the door, one hand in the bulging pocket of his coat;
but when he recognized the others an ugly grin spread over his face,
while his hand dropped to his side.

"So you have got here at last, eh?" he snarled. "I'm glad to find you
didn't hurry yourselves any. I thought I sent you a wireless message to
get here early."

"So you did, chief," spoke up one of the newcomers. "But we couldn't get
here no sooner."

"You couldn't?" snapped the other. "Why couldn't you?"

"We got word that one of the government radio inspectors was at the
lumber camp, so we had to come here by the long way. We were afraid he
might recognize one of us if we happened to bump into him."

"Well, the cops have photoed all of you so often that I don't wonder
you're shy," sneered the leader. "But come on inside. There's no use of
standing chinning here."

Two of the men muttered sullenly to themselves, but ceased abruptly as
the leader's frowning gaze fell on them. They all shuffled into the
cabin, and the black-moustached man shut the door with a bang.

"Say," whispered Bob, "we've got to listen in on this pow-wow, fellows.
I'm going to sneak up to the window and try to hear what they're saying.
They must have some purpose in meeting here like this."

"Well, be mighty careful, Bob," said Joe anxiously. "They're a tough
crowd, and we've got to watch our step. If they discover you, head for
here, and if we can't get away we'll put up a battle."

"If I have any kind of luck, they won't discover me," Bob assured him.
"Just sit tight, and I'll be back in a jiffy."

Very cautiously he crept through the underbrush toward the cabin. In
spite of all his care a branch snapped under him and the second time the
door was flung wide and the ill-favored leader of the gang stepped out
and peered about him.

Bob flattened out as close to the ground as he could get and lay tense,
while the outlaw gazed suspiciously at the bushes amid which he was
concealed.

"What's the matter, Blackie?" called one of the gang. "Did you think you
heard somethin'?"

"I know I did!" exclaimed the other. "But I suppose it was only some
animal prowling around."

"Bein' alone in this shack has got on your nerves, maybe," taunted one
of the gang.

"Nerves, my eye!" exclaimed the other. "I don't own such things! But
I've got a notion to take a look through those bushes, anyway," and he
started in Bob's direction.

"Come on back, Blackie," urged another of the gang. "We can't be foolin'
around here all day. Be yourself, can't you?"

The others chimed in to the same effect, and their leader reluctantly
abandoned his search and returned to the cabin. Had he gone another
twenty feet he would inevitably have discovered Bob, who had been on the
point of springing to his feet and giving battle. It was a narrow
escape, and the radio boys heaved sighs of relief as the door of the
cabin closed on the formidable figure of the leader. They knew that
these men were desperate criminals, heavily armed, who would not
hesitate at murder to avoid capture.

Bob resumed his advance, an inch at a time, and at length reached the
edge of the clearing. Before him lay a stretch of perhaps twenty feet of
open ground, and should one of the desperados chance to open the door
while he was crossing this space, discovery would be certain. However,
this was a chance that Bob knew he must take, and without hesitation he
sprang to his feet and ran swiftly but silently toward the cabin.

Fortunately he reached it unobserved, and crouched close to the wall
beneath one of the little windows. There were numerous cracks in the
side of the rude structure, and he had no difficulty in hearing what was
going on inside.

The crooks were engaged in a heated debate, but soon the voice of their
leader spoke out commandingly and the others fell silent.

"I tell you we haven't had a chance to get rid of that last load of silk
we got near Castleton," he said, in an angry voice. "I couldn't get the
price I wanted for it, and, besides, it will be just as easy to get rid
of two loads as one, and no more risk. Now, I'm going to send out a
radio message in code to the rest of the gang, and we'll pull off the
job to-night, just as I've already told you."

There were no dissenting voices, and presently Bob heard the whirr of
the sending set, followed by the voice of the leader.

"HDEA' HDEA'," he called again and again, switching over to the
receiving set to get an answer. At length he evidently reached the
station he was after, for he listened intently for a few minutes. Then
the generator hummed again, and Bob heard the black-moustached man
speaking again.

"Get this, and get it right," he commanded, and there followed a string
of words that would have been mere gibberish to Bob had he not held the
key to their meaning. He searched frantically in his pockets for a
pencil, and scribbled the words down as the man spoke them. When he had
finished, the leader of the gang shut down the generator, and turned to
the others.

"That's fixed," he said. "There won't be much to do for the rest of the
day but look over your guns and make sure they're in good working order.
Since we got that last truck they've been putting guards on them, and we
want to be prepared to shoot before they do."

There was a general pushing back of chairs, and Bob realized that at any
moment the door might open. His mind worked quickly, and instead of
going back to his friends the way he had come, he made a rush for the
woods on the opposite side of the clearing. In this way the "blind," or
windowless, end of the cabin was toward him, so that he would not be
likely to be detected unless the robbers came out and walked around the
house.

Lucky it was for Bob that he acted as he did, because he had barely
started when the door was flung open and those inside came streaming
out. For a few moments they stood in a group in front of the door,
talking, and then scattered, some walking about, while others threw
themselves on the ground and smoked.

But by this time Bob had reached the cover of the woods undiscovered,
and set out to rejoin his friends. This necessitated a long detour, and
it was a full hour later that he crept silently into their hiding place.
So quietly did he come that Jimmy was on the point of uttering a
startled exclamation, but checked himself just in time.




CHAPTER XXIII

PREPARING AN AMBUSH


"Say, you came as quietly as a shadow," whispered the plump youth. "How
do you ever do it?"

"You don't expect me to blow a whistle under the circumstances, do you?"
asked Bob.

"Never mind that, but tell us what you heard," said Joe impatiently.
"What are they up to, Bob?"

"I can't tell you until I compare what I copied down with the code key,"
said Bob, as he fished in his pocket for the bit of paper on which he
had noted down the robber's message. Having found this, he and Joe
searched through the key and soon had the following message pieced
together:

"Truck--silk--Barberton Road--to-night. Meet me and others--Hicks
Bridge--eight o'clock. Truck due--ten o'clock."

Having deciphered the message, the boys gazed questioningly at one
another.

"That doesn't give us much time to act," said Joe. "If we wait here it
may be close to eight o'clock before the others come to relieve us, and
then it will be too late to prevent the robbery."

"The answer is, that we won't wait here," said Bob decisively. "As long
as we know their plans up until this evening, there's no need of
watching this cabin any longer, anyway. We'd better start back right
away, and tell Mr. Brandon what we've found out. He'll know the best
thing to do then."

"That sounds all right to me," said Joe, and as Jimmy saw a chance of
getting back to camp in time for dinner, he put in no objections.

"Now, for the love of butter, try to go quietly, Jimmy," warned Bob. "If
those fellows hear a sound from this direction, they'll be right after
us, because their suspicions are already aroused."

"I'll do the best I can," promised his rotund friend. "But I'm heavier
than you fellows, and I can't slide around so easily."

"Well, go easy, anyway," said Bob. "Now, are we all ready?"

With infinite caution the boys wormed their way through the brushwood,
Bob leading. By luck rather than good management Jimmy managed to be as
quiet as his friends, and after almost an hour of this slow progress Bob
judged that they were far enough away from the cabin to risk a faster
pace. The shack was out of sight among the trees when he sprang to his
feet, followed by the others, and in a short time they had reached the
path leading to the main road. Here it was still necessary to be
extremely careful, for they never knew at what moment some turn in the
path would bring them face to face with some of the robber band.
Fortunately nothing of the kind happened, and soon they reached the main
road and started at high speed for camp.

"I wonder if we can't take some sort of a short cut," came from Joe as
they raced along.

"That's the talk," puffed poor Jimmy, who had great difficulty in
keeping up with his chums. "The shorter the better."

"We won't dare risk it," returned Bob. "Why we might get lost."

"Who's afraid of getting lost?"

"We are, for we might lose too much time and all our plans would go to
smash. No, we've got to stick to the main road."

"How much further have we to go?"

"I don't know."

"We've got to chase along until we reach camp," put in Joe. "Hustle now,
every minute may be precious."

"I can't hustle any more than I am hustling," panted poor Jimmy. "Do you
want me to drop down of heart failure or something like that?"

"Maybe we'd better go along and leave Jimmy behind," suggested Joe, with
a wink at Bob.

"Not much," cried the stout youth, and after that did his best to keep
up with the others.

Not a great while later they came in sight of camp, much to their
relief.

Mr. Brandon was astonished to see them back so soon, but as briefly as
possible Bob told him of what they had learned and showed him the code
message.

"You fellows have done a clever bit of detective work, and with
reasonable luck it ought to be possible to bag the whole gang to-night,"
said Brandon. "I know where Hicks Bridge is. It's about five miles this
side of Barberton, and an ideal place for an ambuscade. The road runs
between high banks just before it gets to the bridge, and some of the
gang posted on those banks could command the road from either direction.
But I'll get in communication with the chief of police of Barberton, and
we'll see if we can't catch the thieves in their own trap."

"I suppose the two men you were expecting haven't arrived yet, have
they?" inquired Bob.

"No. And I'm afraid we won't be able to wait for them, either," said
Brandon. "I could radio to the Barberton chief, but I'm afraid the
message might be intercepted by the crooks, if one of them happened to
be listening. I guess it will be better to go by way of my automobile,
although I hate to lose the time that it will take."

"Isn't there a telephone line from the camp?" suggested Joe.

"No, unfortunately, one hasn't been installed yet," replied the
inspector. "But we can do the trick with the car if we start right away.
I suppose there's no need of asking if you fellows would like to come
with me?"

"None whatever," answered Bob, grinning. "Just give us a chance to go in
and snatch a little grub off the table, and we'll eat it on the way."

Frank Brandon nodded, and the three boys dashed into the mess hall and
caught up anything in the way of eatables that came nearest to hand,
Jimmy, of course, specializing on his favorite doughnuts. Then they
hurried out, and found Mr. Brandon waiting for them, with the motor
running. After a short search they found Herb fast asleep in his bunk,
and roused him unceremoniously, hustling him out before he was fairly
awake.

"What's it all about?" he questioned, rubbing his eyes. "Has the camp
caught fire, or do you just want to borrow some money from me?"

"Never mind the funny business now, we'll tell you all about it while
we're traveling," said Bob, as they reached the automobile. "In you go,
Herb."

Before they could find seats Mr. Brandon had let in the clutch, and the
car started with a jerk that landed them in a heap on the cushions.
Regardless of the rough road, he kept picking up speed, and soon it was
all they could do to stay in the car at all. Barberton was about thirty
miles from the camp, and to reach it they had to cross Hicks Bridge. All
looked calm and peaceful just then, and it was hard to believe that in a
few short hours a desperate fight might be raging between the high banks
that flanked the road. The bridge was some two hundred feet long, and
passed over a deep cut between two hills. In spite of its present
peaceful appearance it was easy to see that the place would be an ideal
one to perpetrate such a crime as the robbers contemplated, and after
they had passed over the bridge Mr. Brandon opened the throttle wider in
his impatience to reach Barberton.

They slowed down to go through the streets of the town, and as they drew
up in front of the police station, Brandon shut off his motor and leaped
to the sidewalk.

"Come on in, boys, and we'll tell the chief about the little party
scheduled for this evening," he said, and the boys followed him into the
police station.

Fortunately the chief of police, Mr. Durand, was in, and he greeted Mr.
Brandon with a heartiness that showed they were old friends.

After they had shaken hands, Brandon introduced the radio boys, and then
proceeded to acquaint the chief with the details of the plot they had
discovered. As Mr. Durand listened a dark frown gathered between his
bushy eyebrows, and his fingers drummed angrily on the table before him.
When Mr. Brandon had finished, the chief jumped to his feet and strode
fiercely up and down the room.

"This won't be the first trouble we've had with those rascals!" he
exclaimed wrathfully. "Members of the same gang have held up and robbed
stores in this town, and we have two of them doing their bit in jail
right now. And if we have any luck to-night we'll have the whole gang
under lock and key before the morning. These young fellows must have
been right on the job from start to finish, Frank."

"Yes, I guess they were," replied Brandon. "If we land this gang, we'll
have them to thank for it. But now what are your plans for capturing the
crooks?"

For answer the chief pressed a button, and a capable looking police
lieutenant appeared.

"Get together ten of our best men," he directed, "and put them into two
automobiles. When they are ready to start, report to me."

The lieutenant saluted, and left the room.

"According to the code message, the robbers won't be at Hicks Bridge
much before eight o'clock, which is after dark these days," said the
chief. "We'll get there a lot earlier than that, and I'll conceal my men
in the woods. Then I'll leave orders here to stop the motor truck as it
comes through, and replace its crew with a few picked men from my force.
When the robbers try to hold up that truck, they'll have a big surprise
in store for them."

"It might be a good plan," suggested Bob, "to mount a searchlight or two
on the motor truck. At the right minute you could turn these on the
crooks, and while it would confuse them, it would give your men in the
woods a big advantage, as they'd be able to see the hold-up men plainly
without being seen themselves."

"Young man, that's a first-rate suggestion!" exclaimed the chief, eyeing
him appraisingly, "and you can believe we'll take advantage of it. I'll
commandeer a couple from the Electric Light Company in readiness to
mount on the truck when it comes along. I wish we could persuade you and
your friends to join the Barberton police force."

"We'll be pretty nearly a part of it until those crooks are captured, if
you'll let us," said Bob. "We all want to be in at the finish."

"It will be a dangerous business, and bullets may fly thick," the chief
warned him. "You fellows have done more than your full duty already, and
we can hardly call on you to do any more."

"Just the same, we'll come along if you don't mind," insisted Bob.

"Oh, I'll be very glad to have you, as far as I'm concerned," said Mr.
Durand. "I suppose you'll want to be in on it, too, Frank?"

"You're dead right," Brandon assured him emphatically. "I've gone too
far with this to want to drop out now."

At this point the lieutenant appeared and reported that the men were in
the automobiles, ready to start. Picking up the telephone, the chief
ordered his own car. He invited Mr. Brandon and the radio boys to ride
with him.

"You can leave your car in the police garage, Frank," he said, and
Brandon was not slow in availing himself of this offer. In a short time
he returned, and the three automobiles started for the scene of the
projected hold-up, the chief's car leading and the other two following
close behind.




CHAPTER XXIV

LYING IN WAIT


"Doesn't look as though there's going to be much monotony in our young
lives to-night," remarked Bob, as, tightly packed in the tonneau of the
car, the boys rode on through the gathering darkness.

"For that matter there hasn't been much for several days past," chuckled
Joe, who sat at his right. "A fellow would have to be a glutton to want
more adventure than we've had since we came to Braxton Woods. What with
Buck Looker and Black Donegan, we ought to be pretty well satisfied."

"I only hope Cassey will be in the gang that is rounded up to-night,"
observed Herb. "It would be too bad if only the rest were captured and
that all-around scoundrel slipped through the meshes."

"I guess Cassey is the brains of the whole bunch," put in Jimmy.
"Probably the others didn't know anything about radio until he put them
on to it. He'll be there all right. And he's likely to put up a pretty
stiff fight before he lets himself be captured, for he knows what it
means to him to be sent back to prison. With a new sentence tacked on to
the old one it'll probably mean that he'll be in for life."

In a little while they reached the scene of the proposed robbery. They
were well in advance of the time set by the plotters, and the chief took
his time in carefully disposing his forces, availing himself of Frank
Brandon's advice in doing this.

The bridge stretched between two hills at the bottom of which was a
small stream, about a hundred feet below. On each side, almost down to
the bridge itself, extended trees and shrubbery that afforded excellent
hiding places. The only trouble was that both the outlaws and the
officers who were trying to apprehend them were likely to seek the same
shelter and might in this way stumble across each other before the trap
was ready to be sprung.

This, however, was a contingency that had to be faced, and preparations
were made accordingly. The men were placed at strategic points on both
sides of the bridge. Whether the attempt at hold-up would be made at the
entrance to the bridge or on the further side was a matter of
speculation. The chief went on the theory, however, that it would
probably take place at the entrance, and there he placed the majority of
the men under him.

The radio boys hinted that there was where they would like to be also,
but in this the chief was adamant.

"I've stretched a point in letting you young fire-eaters come along at
all," he said. "As it is, I may have a hard time explaining to your
parents. And I hate to think what my position would be if anything
happened to you. So I am going to put you where I think you'll be
comparatively out of danger. You're just to be lookers on at this
shindig. And if the bullets begin to fly, you just lie flat on the
ground behind the trees until they stop. It may not be so glorious, but
it's likely to be a mighty sight more healthy."

So, much against their will, the boys were compelled to obey orders and
take the place assigned to them which was on the further side of the
bridge.

"Putting us up in the gallery when we ought to have seats in the
orchestra," grumbled Joe, as the boys ensconced themselves in a thicket
behind a big clump of trees.

"Cheer up, you old gloom hound," chaffed Bob. "We may get in on this
yet. At any rate, if we are in the gallery, we have a good view of the
stage. Or at least we shall have, when the searchlight gets busy."

The darkness deepened until the night became as black as Egypt. There
was no moon, and even the stars were obscured by clouds that heavily
veiled the sky. The night was chill, and the boys buttoned their coats
tightly about them as they sat waiting for developments.

They had perhaps an hour to wait, but it was not known but that some of
the robbers would be on the ground at an earlier time than had been set,
and every sense was on the alert as all strained their ears for the
slightest sound and peered into the darkness on the chance that they
might catch glimpses of shadowy forms. After the first few moments they
had not ventured to talk for fear that they might be overheard. But this
did not debar them from thinking, and they thrilled with excitement as
they pictured each to himself the struggle that seemed about to take
place on the road.

The minutes dragged along interminably, and in the intense silence the
lads could almost hear the beating of their hearts. Then at a little
distance a twig cracked and sent the blood racing madly through their
veins.

Soon footsteps were heard approaching, and the lads crouched still lower
in their hiding place. The sounds came nearer, and they could detect the
tread of two men. They were approaching without any excessive degree of
caution, as they had no reason to believe that their plans had been
discovered. As they drew closer, the boys could hear them conversing in
low tones.

"I tell you it's all right," said a rough voice, which they recognized
as that of Black Donegan. "All the fellows are tipped off and know just
what they've got to do. Jake and Toppy will do the holding up, and then
the rest of us will jump in if the driver cuts up rough. If he does,
there'll be one more dead driver."

The boys waited for the answer that seemed to be long in coming. What
they heard finally was a whistle that made them jump. They had heard
that whistle before!

"Cassey!" whispered Bob to Joe. "Cassey, as sure as you're born!"

The next instant his belief became a thrilling certainty.

"It-t-t-t isn't the d-d-driver." The voice came out, with an explosive
quality. "It's the g-g-guards he may have w-w-with him. The p-p-police
are getting pretty l-l-leary about all the robberies t-t-t-that have
been taking place around here lately, and they've g-g-g-," again came
the whistle, "g-got to do something or lose their jobs. At any rate
t-t-this is the last thing we're g-g-going to pull off around here----"

"I guess he's right about that," Joe whispered to Bob.

"----and j-j-just as soon as we're through with this, w-w-we'd better
p-pull up stakes and try somewhere else."

The voice was now so close at hand that if the boys had reached out of
the thicket they would almost have touched the speaker. At this thought
Jimmy and Herb, especially, felt a thrill of excitement.




CHAPTER XXV

AN EXCITING STRUGGLE


"I think myself that we've hung round this neck o' the woods about long
enough," agreed Donegan. "And I ain't any too well pleased to have that
radio inspector snooping around the woods. He ain't up to any good if
you ask me. But brace up, Cassey, for this last haul. You ain't
generally chicken-hearted."

"You'll f-f-find that I have my n-n-nerve with me when the pinch comes,"
replied Cassey. "I'd rather be k-k-killed by a bullet than g-g-g-go back
to prison."

The voices receded as the men went on, and soon the sound of their
footsteps ceased. It was evident they were searching for the most
advantageous place for the crime that they contemplated.

"I told you that I had a hunch that that villain would be here,"
whispered Jimmy, when they felt that it would be safe to speak.

"Good thing, too," said Bob grimly. "Cassey'll get to-night what's
coming to him."

Half an hour passed--an hour--an hour and a half. Then far in the
distance the boys heard the hum of a motor engine and the rumble of a
heavy truck.

"There it comes!" ejaculated Joe, throwing caution to the winds in his
excitement.

The rumbling grew louder, and soon the boys knew that it must be close
to the bridge. Then they saw the lamps of an auto truck sending out
their beams of light a hundred feet in advance, and could just discern
above them the massive body of the truck.

It came on at a moderate rate of speed, slowing up somewhat as it struck
the bridge.

Suddenly shots rang out and the boys could see two dark figures standing
on the bridge and waving their hands at the driver, as they bellowed out
orders to stop. At the same time, as though the shots had been a signal,
three other figures came rushing from other directions.

It was impossible for the boys to keep still, and they too sprang to
their feet and started for the scene of the hold-up, running at the top
of their speed.

Just as they left their covert there was a blinding flash that made the
whole bridge as bright as day. A searchlight had been turned on from the
top of the truck full in the faces of the robbers. They staggered as
though they had been struck, and at the same instant there came a volley
of shots and the police were upon the hold-up men.

There was a wild mélée of struggling men, as they swayed back and
forth in a desperate struggle. The robbers had been taken completely by
surprise and were outnumbered two to one. There were shouts and the
crack of revolvers, and the thud of pistol butts.

But the battle, though fierce, was of short duration. In a few minutes
the robbers had been subdued. One lay stunned on the bridge and another
lay by him wounded. Two more were held in the grasp of officers.

One, however, tore himself away from the officer who had grappled with
him, and came rushing in the direction of the radio boys. In the glare
from the searchlight they recognized Cassey.

He saw them, too, and fired his revolver at them. The shot went wild. He
pressed the trigger again but with no result. Then, realizing that his
weapon was empty, he hurled it at Bob, who was nearest to him.

Bob dodged, and the next instant grabbed at Cassey's legs. The
expertness that had made him the star of his football team stood him in
good stead. His arms closed round Cassey in a flying tackle, and they
came heavily to the bridge together.

Cassey struggled desperately to rise, but Bob held him in an unbreakable
grip, and a second later his comrades had come to his assistance and the
scoundrel was overpowered and delivered over to the police, who came
rushing up.

The robbers were securely bound and bundled into the auto truck that
they had planned to rob. Then in high spirits the party drove back to
Barberton. The chief was jubilant, and the praises he heaped upon the
radio boys made their ears burn. They stayed long enough at his office
to see the prisoners safely jailed and then, though the hour was late,
rode back to their quarters in the woods with Mr. Brandon.

They slept long and late after their exciting experience, and it was
almost noon the next day when they awoke. Bob was somewhat surprised to
find a letter waiting for him. It bore no stamp, and had evidently been
brought there by one of the lumbermen.

He opened it curiously and glanced at the signature. Then he gave a
shout that brought his comrades quickly to his side.

"What do you think of this, fellows?" he cried. "Buck Looker's writing
to me."

There was a chorus of wondering exclamations.

The last paragraph caught Bob's eye and he read it aloud:

"As for Bob Layton and those other chumps, all we've got to do is to
stand pat. No one saw us put the stones in the snowballs, and if we just
deny it, they can't pin anything on us. They'll have to pay for the
window, and that'll even up things for what they did to us at Mountain
Pass.

                                                                "Yours,

                                                                "Buck."

Bob was utterly dumbfounded. Then he glanced at the heading of the
letter and let out a whoop.

"Oh, this is too rich!" he cried, almost choking with laughter. "This
letter is directed to Carl Lutz. You know he went home two or three days
ago. Buck has written two letters, one to Lutz and the other to
me--probably a roast--and he's put them in the wrong envelopes. Oh, how
he's given himself away!"

Bob's comrades were fairly convulsed, and Jimmy grew so purple in the
face that they had to slap him vigorously on the back. They had scarcely
got him into a calmer frame, before he threatened to go off again, for
he saw Buck Looker strolling along the road.

"Probably's come along to see how you were bearing up under the roast,"
chuckled Joe.

Bob ran over toward Buck, followed by his comrades. Buck looked alarmed
and put himself in a posture of defense.

"Oh, we're not going to hurt you," said Bob. "I only wanted to tell you
that I got your letter."

"I hope it blistered your hide," growled Buck.

"It made me nearly laugh myself to death," replied Bob. "But let me
advise you, Buck, to make sure the next time that you get the right
letter in the right envelope."

"What do you mean by that?" asked Buck, in apprehension.

"Only that I got the letter you meant for Carl Lutz," replied Bob.
"Maybe you've forgotten what you said, so I'll read the last paragraph,"
and, dwelling on every word, he read it over deliberately.

Before he had quite finished, Buck made a desperate grab at the letter,
but Bob was too quick for him.

"No, you don't!" he exclaimed, as he folded it and put it carefully into
his pocket. "That letter's going to cost you about two hundred dollars,
for that's what it will cost to pony up for the broken window. We've got
you dead to rights, and you'd better pay up and pay up quick. So long,
Buck. And do be more careful next time to get the right letter in the
right envelope."

With all his bluster knocked out of him, Buck slunk away. The boys were
not surprised to learn in the next letter from home that the insurance
company had been paid.

"Some excitement we have had here," remarked Bob. "Wonder if we'll ever
have such strenuous times again."

"Sure," declared Joe promptly, and he was right, as we shall see in the
next volume of this series, to be called, "The Radio Boys with the
Forest Rangers." In that volume we shall see how they fought a fire that
came close to ending tragically.

After a good dinner, the boys lay sprawled out on the grass basking in
the spring sunshine and utterly at peace with themselves and the world.

"Well, it's been hard work, but we've had pretty good luck at trailing a
voice," observed Bob.

"Yes," agreed Joe with a grin, "and s-s-s-such a v-v-v-voice!"

And Jimmy whistled.

THE END



      *      *      *      *      *      *



THE RADIO BOYS SERIES
(Trademark Registered)

By ALLEN CHAPMAN
Author of the "Railroad Series," Etc.

Illustrated. Individual Colored Wrappers For Each Story.
Every Volume Complete in Itself.

A new series for boys giving full details of radio work, both in sending
and receiving--telling how small and large amateur sets can be made and
operated, and how some boys got a lot of fun and adventure out of what
they did. Each volume from first to last is so thoroughly fascinating,
so strictly up-to-date and accurate, we feel sure all lads will peruse
them with great delight.

Each volume has a Foreword by Jack Binns, the well-known radio expert of
the New York Tribune.

THE RADIO BOYS' FIRST WIRELESS;
Or, Winning the Ferberton Prize.

THE RADIO BOYS AT OCEAN POINT;
Or, The Message That Saved the Ship.

THE RADIO BOYS AT THE SENDING STATION;
Or, Making Good in the Wireless Room.

THE RADIO BOYS AT MOUNTAIN PASS;
Or, The Midnight Call for Assistance.

THE RADIO BOYS TRAILING A VOICE;
Or, Solving a Wireless Mystery.

THE RADIO BOYS WITH THE FOREST RANGERS;
Or, The Great Fire on Spruce Mountain.

THE RADIO BOYS WITH THE ICEBERG PATROL;
Or, Making Safe the Ocean Lanes.

Grosset & Dunlap, Publishers, New York

      *      *      *      *      *      *

THE TOM SWIFT SERIES
By VICTOR APPLETON

Uniform Style of Binding.
Individual Colored Wrappers For Each Story.
Every Volume Complete in Itself.

Every boy possesses some form of inventive genius. Tom Swift is a bright,
ingenious boy and his inventions and adventures make the most interesting
kind of reading.

TOM SWIFT AND HIS MOTOR CYCLE
TOM SWIFT AND HIS MOTOR BOAT
TOM SWIFT AND HIS AIRSHIP
TOM SWIFT AND HIS SUBMARINE BOAT
TOM SWIFT AND HIS ELECTRIC RUNABOUT
TOM SWIFT AND HIS WIRELESS MESSAGE
TOM SWIFT AMONG THE DIAMOND MAKERS
TOM SWIFT IN THE CAVES OF ICE
TOM SWIFT AND HIS SKY RACER
TOM SWIFT AND HIS ELECTRIC RIFLE
TOM SWIFT IN THE CITY OF GOLD
TOM SWIFT AND HIS AIR GLIDER
TOM SWIFT IN CAPTIVITY
TOM SWIFT AND HIS WIZARD CAMERA
TOM SWIFT AND HIS GREAT SEARCHLIGHT
TOM SWIFT AND HIS GIANT CANNON
TOM SWIFT AND HIS PHOTO TELEPHONE
TOM SWIFT AND HIS AERIAL WARSHIP
TOM SWIFT AND HIS BIG TUNNEL
TOM SWIFT IN THE LAND OF WONDERS
TOM SWIFT AND HIS WAR TANK
TOM SWIFT AND HIS AIR SCOUT
TOM SWIFT AND HIS UNDERSEA SEARCH
TOM SWIFT AMONG THE FIRE FIGHTERS
TOM SWIFT AND HIS ELECTRIC LOCOMOTIVE
TOM SWIFT AND HIS FLYING BOAT
TOM SWIFT AND HIS GREAT OIL GUSHER

Grosset & Dunlap, Publishers, New York

      *      *      *      *      *      *

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS SERIES
By CAPTAIN QUINCY ALLEN

The outdoor chums are four wide-awake lads, sons of wealthy men of a
small city located on a lake. The boys love outdoor life, and are
greatly interested in hunting, fishing, and picture taking. They have
motor cycles, motor boats, canoes, etc., and during their vacations go
everywhere and have all sorts of thrilling adventures. The stories give
full directions for camping out, how to fish, how to hunt wild animals
and prepare the skins for stuffing, how to manage a canoe, how to swim,
etc.
Full of the spirit of outdoor life.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS
Or The First Tour of the Rod, Gun and Camera Club.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS ON THE LAKE
Or Lively Adventures on Wildcat Island.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS IN THE FOREST
Or Laying the Ghost of Oak Ridge.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS ON THE GULF
Or Rescuing the Lost Balloonists.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS AFTER BIG GAME
Or Perilous Adventures in the Wilderness.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS ON A HOUSEBOAT
Or The Rivals of the Mississippi.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS IN THE BIG WOODS
Or The Rival Hunters at Lumber Run.

THE OUTDOOR CHUMS AT CABIN POINT
Or The Golden Cup Mystery.

12mo. Averaging 240 pages. Illustrated. Handsomely bound in Cloth.

Grosset & Dunlap, Publishers, New York

      *      *      *      *      *      *

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH SERIES
By GRAHAM B. FORBES

Never was there a cleaner, brighter, more manly boy than Frank Allen, the
hero of this series of boys' tales, and never was there a better crowd of
lads to associate with than the students of the School. All boys will read
these stories with deep interest. The rivalry between the towns along the
river was of the keenest, and plots and counterplots to win the champions,
at baseball, at football, at boat racing, at track athletics, and at ice
hockey, were without number. Any lad reading one volume of this series
will surely want the others.

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH
Or The All Around Rivals of the School

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH ON THE DIAMOND
Or Winning Out by Pluck

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH ON THE RIVER
Or The Boat Race Plot that Failed

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH ON THE GRIDIRON
Or The Struggle for the Silver Cup

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH ON THE ICE
Or Out for the Hockey Championship

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH IN TRACK ATHLETICS
Or A Long Run that Won

THE BOYS OF COLUMBIA HIGH IN WINTER SPORTS
Or Stirring Doings on Skates and Iceboats

12mo. Illustrated.
Handsomely bound in cloth, with cover design and wrappers in colors.

Grosset & Dunlap, Publishers, New York

      *      *      *      *      *      *

THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS SERIES
BY VICTOR APPLETON

UNIFORM STYLE OF BINDING. INDIVIDUAL COLORED WRAPPERS.

Moving pictures and photo plays are famous the world over, and in this
line of books the reader is given a full description of how the films are
made--the scenes of little dramas, indoors and out, trick pictures to
satisfy the curious, soul-stirring pictures of city affairs, life in the
Wild West, among the cowboys and Indians, thrilling rescues along the
seacoast, the daring of picture hunters in the jungle among savage beasts,
and the great risks run in picturing conditions in a land of earthquakes.
The volumes teem with adventures and will be found interesting from first
chapter to last.

THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS IN THE WEST
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS ON THE COAST
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS IN THE JUNGLE
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS IN EARTHQUAKE LAND
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS AND THE FLOOD
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS AT PANAMA
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS UNDER THE SEA
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS ON THE WAR FRONT
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS ON FRENCH BATTLEFIELDS
MOVING PICTURE BOYS' FIRST SHOWHOUSE
MOVING PICTURE BOYS AT SEASIDE PARK
MOVING PICTURE BOYS ON BROADWAY
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS' OUTDOOR EXHIBITION
THE MOVING PICTURE BOYS' NEW IDEA

Grosset & Dunlap, Publishers, New York

      *      *      *      *      *      *

THE FAMOUS ROVER BOYS SERIES
BY ARTHUR M. WINFIELD
(Edward Stratemeyer)

OVER THREE MILLION COPIES SOLD OF THIS SERIES
Uniform Style of Binding. Colored Wrappers.
Every Volume Complete in Itself.

THE ROVER BOYS AT SCHOOL
THE ROVER BOYS ON THE OCEAN
THE ROVER BOYS IN THE JUNGLE
THE ROVER BOYS OUT WEST
THE ROVER BOYS ON THE GREAT LAKES
THE ROVER BOYS IN THE MOUNTAINS
THE ROVER BOYS ON LAND AND SEA
THE ROVER BOYS IN CAMP
THE ROVER BOYS ON THE RIVER
THE ROVER BOYS ON THE PLAINS
THE ROVER BOYS IN SOUTHERN WATERS
THE ROVER BOYS ON THE FARM
THE ROVER BOYS ON TREASURE ISLE
THE ROVER BOYS AT COLLEGE
THE ROVER BOYS DOWN EAST
THE ROVER BOYS IN THE AIR
THE ROVER BOYS IN NEW YORK
THE ROVER BOYS IN ALASKA
THE ROVER BOYS IN BUSINESS
THE ROVER BOYS ON A TOUR
THE ROVER BOYS AT COLBY HALL
THE ROVER BOYS ON SNOWSHOE ISLAND
THE ROVER BOYS UNDER CANVAS
THE ROVER BOYS ON A HUNT
THE ROVER BOYS IN THE LAND OF LUCK
THE ROVER BOYS AT BIG HORN RANCH
THE ROVER BOYS AT BIG BEAR LAKE
THE ROVER BOYS SHIPWRECKED

Grosset & Dunlap, Publishers, New York

      *      *      *      *      *      *

THE PUTNAM HALL STORIES

Companion Stories to the Famous Rover Boys Series

By ARTHUR M. WINFIELD
(Edward Stratemeyer)

UNIFORM STYLE OF BINDING. INDIVIDUAL COLORED WRAPPERS.

Being the adventures of lively young fellows at a Military Academy. Open
air sports have always been popular with boys and these stories that
mingle adventure with fact will appeal to every manly boy.

THE MYSTERY OF PUTNAM HALL
  Or The School Chums' Strange Discovery

The particulars of the mystery and the solution of it are very interesting
reading.

CAMPING OUT DAYS AT PUTNAM HALL
  Or The Secret of the Old Mill

A story full of vim and vigor, telling what the cadets did during the
summer encampment, including a visit to a mysterious old mill, said to be
haunted. The book has a wealth of fun in it.

THE REBELLION AT PUTNAM HALL
  Or The Rival Runaways

The boys had good reasons for running away during Captain Putnam's
absence. They had plenty of fun and several queer adventures.

THE CHAMPIONS OF PUTNAM HALL
  Or Bound to Win Out

In this volume the Cadets of Putnam Hall show what they can do in various
keen rivalries on the athletic field and elsewhere. There is one victory
which leads to a most unlooked-for discovery.

THE CADETS OF PUTNAM HALL
  Or Good Times in School and Out

The cadets are lively, flesh-and-blood fellows, bound to make friends from
the start. There are some keen rivalries, in school and out, and something
is told of a remarkable midnight feast and a hazing with an unexpected
ending.

THE RIVALS OF PUTNAM HALL
  Or Fun and Sport Afloat and Ashore

It is a lively, rattling, breezy story of school life in this country,
written by one who knows all about its pleasures and its perplexities, its
glorious excitements, and its chilling disappointments.

Grosset & Dunlap, Publishers, New York

      *      *      *      *      *      *

THE RAILROAD SERIES
By ALLEN CHAPMAN

Author of the Radio Boys, Etc.

Illustrated. Handsomely Bound in Cloth.
Every Volume Complete in Itself.

In this line of books there is revealed the whole workings of a great
American railroad system. There are adventures in abundance--railroad
wrecks, dashes through forest fires, the pursuit of a "wildcat"
locomotive, the disappearance of a pay car with a large sum of money on
board--but there is much more than this--the intense rivalry among
railroads and railroad men, the working out of running schedules, the
getting through "on time" in spite of all obstacles, and the manipulation
of railroad securities by evil men who wish to rule or ruin.

RALPH OF THE ROUND HOUSE;
  Or, Bound to Become a Railroad Man.

RALPH IN THE SWITCH TOWER;
  Or, Clearing the Track.

RALPH ON THE ENGINE;
  Or, The Young Fireman of the Limited Mail.

RALPH ON THE OVERLAND EXPRESS;
  Or, The Trials and Triumphs of a Young Engineer.

RALPH, THE TRAIN DISPATCHER;
  Or, The Mystery of the Pay Car.

RALPH ON THE ARMY TRAIN;
  Or, The Young Railroader's Most Daring Exploit.

RALPH ON THE MIDNIGHT FLYER;
  Or, The Wreck at Shadow Valley.

RALPH AND THE MISSING MAIL POUCH;
  Or, The Stolen Government Bonds.

GROSSET & DUNLAP, Publishers, NEW YORK



***END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE RADIO BOYS TRAILING A VOICE***


******* This file should be named 25858-8.txt or 25858-8.zip *******


This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
http://www.gutenberg.org/dirs/2/5/8/5/25858



Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License (available with this file or online at
http://www.gutenberg.org/license).


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH F3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need, is critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation web page at http://www.gutenberg.org/fundraising/pglaf.


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
809 North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
business@pglaf.org.  Email contact links and up to date contact
information can be found at the Foundation's web site and official
page at http://www.gutenberg.org/about/contact

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit http://www.gutenberg.org/fundraising/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit:
http://www.gutenberg.org/fundraising/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For thirty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     http://www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
